(lp0
V\u000aIn virtue of the fact that it's a story told via a sequence of recorded images projected in swift succession to give the illusion of movement, Step Up 3D can be classified as a film.
p1
aVBut it's certainly not the type of thing we're normally talking about when we talk about a film.
p2
aVIt's more like a circus, or a West End musical, mixed with the cliches of sports movies and rom-coms into a cheese-infused broth of doubtful artistic value.
p3
aVA decent script, believable characters, acting ability - measured against any of these traditional benchmarks, Step Up 3D is horrendous.
p4
aVBut, as with many classic action movies, these things are simply irrelevant to Step Up 3D.
p5
aVIn place of the one-note characters, ridiculous plotting and spectacular explosions offered by said action movies, Step Up 3D offers one-note characters, ridiculous plotting and spectacular 3D dance sequences.
p6
aVIf the idea of spectacular 3D dance sequences thrills you, this is your movie.
p7
aVIf it does not, you now know all you need to know about Step Up 3D and can leave this page.
p8
aVPerhaps you'd like to read about some world cinema?
p9
aVOther current cinema releases?
p10
aVOr maybe have a look at what's on telly?
p11
aVEnjoy.
p12
aVSo anyway, spectacle fans, now the player haters have left, let's jam.
p13
aVThe first five minutes of Step Up 3D are everything you might fear.
p14
aVInside these first minutes, people talk super earnestly to camera, saying things like "dance has vocabulary", "everybody's a dancer" and "maybe we're all plugged into the same song."
p15
aVYuck.
p16
aVDon't worry, minutes later we're plunged into a New York breakdance sequence that transfers us - via a police chase conducted using the medium of dance-inflected parkour (used for no good reason to jump through a hotdog stand) - to the warehouse/nightclub that our lead hunk o' bland (Rick Malambri) introduces thusly: "Welcome to my house.
p17
aVThe house of pirates."
p18
aVThis is, needless to say, hilarious, and once you realise you're essentially watching a kind of latter day JM Barrie's Lost Boys with a penchant for limited edition gun-metal Nikes and implausible dance routines, the whole thing makes sense and you can sit back, soak up the audacious choreography and wee yourself laughing at the overblown cliches, camp dialogue and utter seriousness with which the actors appear to be taking this arrant nonsense.
p19
aVHow can you not find a space in your heart for a 21st century villain saddled with the name Julien?
p20
aVOr with the guy tasked with hissing "What are you doing here, Julien?"
p21
aVwith a straight face.
p22
aVThis is pure tosh, but in such a goofy, harebrained way that I found it impossible to dislike.
p23
aVIn a nutshell: It's called Step Up 3D, and entirely lives up to what that title  promises.
p24
aVIn the parlance of the dancers, it's totally B.FAB.
p25
aVThat's  'born from a boombox', for those of us not fortunate enough to count the  boombox amongst our progenitors.
p26
aVBy Catherine Bray\u000a
p27
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aEyebrows were raised when Martin Scorsese\u2019s real-life drama was nominated for a Golden Globe for Best Motion Picture, Musical Or Comedy.
p28
aVAlthough the soundtrack (including covers of Goldfinger and Mrs Robinson) is excellent, and it is Scorsese\u2019s funniest film by some distance, Wolf is neither musical nor comedy, more a riotously dayglo Goodfellas.
p29
aVBeginning in a whir of crashing helicopters and tossed dwarves, it\u2019s a filthy, fizzy ride following the spectacular rise and predictable fall of 1980s stock market fraudster Jordan Belfort (Leonardo DiCaprio).
p30
aVBut between the cameos (Matthew McConaughey, Joanna Lumley, Spike Jonze), globetrotting (London, Las Vegas, Auckland) and endless debauchery, there\u2019s a scabrous joie de vivre that\u2019s impossible to resist.
p31
aVOne scene sees Belfort vividly miming anal sex while closing a sale with a clueless client.
p32
aVAnother has him and his colleagues enjoying themselves on a coke-and-hooker-filled private jet.
p33
aVMultiply that by 180 minutes and you have some idea what you\u2019re getting into.
p34
aVThough brilliantly written (by Boardwalk Empire\u2018s Terence Winter), acted and directed, Wolf is dangerously overlong.
p35
aVThis is especially galling because Belfort often speaks directly to the audience to speed the action on.
p36
aVCouldn\u2019t he have whizzed us through the details of his downfall the same way?
p37
aVThe only excuse is that the material is just too juicy to cut, and everyone, from a career-best DiCaprio, to his crack-smoking sidekick Jonah Hill, to Scorsese himself is having too good a time to stop.
p38
aVFor at least two of the three hours, you will be too.
p39
aVMaybe those Golden Globe guys were on to something after all.
p40
aV\u2018The Wolf of Wall Street\u2019 movie times\u000a\u000a
p41
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aIf anyone's going to succeed in demonstrating how fresh-faced recruits can be reduced to machines during military training, it's Stanley Kubrick, a director not known for warm, fuzzy portrayals of humanity.
p42
aVWeirdly, by delivering this message so unflinchingly, Full Metal Jacket emerges as one of Kubrick's most engaging films, never letting us forget precisely what its lead characters have lost.
p43
aVFollowing a perfunctory title card, we get straight down to business with a montage of recruits getting their heads shaved in no-nonsense fashion.
p44
aVGiven Kubrick's reputation for endless retakes, it's a wonder this scene didn't take several years as actors waited for their hair to grow back.
p45
aVSignificantly, we're given no character backstory, no call-up papers, tearful farewells or lonely sunsets - our first glimpse of the leads is two rows of identical bald bodies with Sergeant Hartman (real-life marine drill instructor Ermey) barking out his intention of breaking the men down, while employing an impressive lexicon of florid insults.
p46
aVAll of this establishes the film's atmosphere as nightmarish black comedy, dispelling comparisons with its more ponderous contemporary Platoon.
p47
aVErmey's performance as the foul-mouthed Hartman is justly celebrated and it's difficult to imagine the film working anything like as effectively without him.
p48
aVWatching the relentless bullying of useless gutbucket Pyle (D'Onofrio) is simultaneously heartbreaking and hilarious thanks to the barrage of abuse coming from the exasperated Hartman.
p49
aVModine's Joker (most of the characters are referred to solely by nicknames in a further de-humanising touch) is the film's focus, maintaining a sarcastic attitude throughout while being constantly aware of the horrendous situation he's living through.
p50
aVIt's a considerable achievement that Joker can flip between appalling John Wayne impersonations and potentially toe-curling mediations such as "the dead know only one thing: it is better to be alive," while remaining a consistent, believable character.Despite assurances from those involved in its making that Full Metal Jacket was subject to Kubrick's typically extended shooting schedule and attention to detail, there's a willingness to move things along with none of the leisurely pacing that can make a viewing of 2001 or Barry Lyndon such a daunting prospect.
p51
aVInstead, the recruits' cliched transformation via montage into a team of precision drilled troops is rapidly turned around, provoking a sense of despair rather than triumph; their journey accompanied by a selection of crude, sex-based call-and-response marching songs as opposed to Survivor's 'Eye Of The Tiger'.
p52
aVThe training portion of the film is far more striking than second and longer section which re-creates the savage 1968 Tet offensive.
p53
aVDue to his fear of flying, Kubrick famously recreated his Saigon in East London's Isle of Dogs using derelict buildings and a few imported palm trees.
p54
aVAdmittedly, the ploy works a treat (the grey English sky is unmistakable, an effect which makes the battlefield appear unearthly) and the first sign that we're in Blighty comes when the British film industry's favourite Yank in residence, Bruce Boa - famous for demanding a Waldorf salad in 'Fawlty Towers' - crops up, demanding to know why Joker wears a peace badge while his helmet bears the legend 'Born to Kill'.
p55
aVComments about the duality of man fall on predictably deaf ears.
p56
aVThat the film comes to such an abrupt halt is also something of a surprise, especially given its running time of a very un-Kubrickian 112 minutes.
p57
aVThat's not to suggest Full Metal Jacket feels either rushed or unfinished; if anything, it demonstrates just how clear and precise the director's vision could be when he resisted a fatal tendency for indulgence.
p58
aVThe true story of Sam 'Ace' Rothstein (Robert De Niro), a shrewd, Mafia-connected casino operator, whose assured, mannered existence is undone by his devotion to his flighty wife, Ginger and his boyhood friend Nicky (Joe Pesci), a wild card who fancies his chances on Ace's patch.
p59
aVDe Niro and Pesci narrate the extended opening, detailing the mechanics of skimming money from the casino to pass onto the bosses back home.
p60
aVThis sequence ends with the glorious introduction of Sharon Stone's showgirl hustler Ginger, all fur, jewels and blonde ambition, who casts gambling chips into the air.
p61
aVOn a security monitor, De Niro watches her exuberant transgression, and falls in love.
p62
aVSo begins his downfall, and the end of Mob rule in Vegas.
p63
aVWhere GoodFellas explored the allure of being a Brooklyn wise guy, with a hair-trigger comic sensibility, Casino emphasises the remorseless fear and grind of a mobster's life, all its attraction purged in two horrifically violent set-pieces.
p64
aVOne, a torture scene with a vice, has been rightly condemned as gratuitous - but it is the closing beating that truly disturbs, two men brutally disfigured by repeated whacks with metallic bats that, as they are tipped into the grave, their featureless faces frozen in a contorted howl, it's almost as if a new species has emerged from the violence, only to be suddenly, cruelly, aborted.
p65
aVThere is no romanticism in this view of the Mafia.
p66
aVScorsese making a gangster film with Joe Pesci and Robert De Niro raised no eyebrows, and led some critics to accuse him of hitting a rut.
p67
aVAll the same, with its ferocity and maturity, particularly in the responsibilities weighing upon the wise guys, Casino can be seen a closing chapter in the evolution of a gangster community, from its street heyday in Mean Streets to its adjustment to the new drug trade in Goodfellas to its final giving way to the power of  the corporations in the eighties.
p68
aV\u000aSome new recruits for Britain\u2019s super secret spy agency, \u201cKingsman.\u201d\u000aDoes \u201cKingsman: The Secret Service\u201d have a secret right-wing agenda?
p69
aVI couldn\u2019t get that thought out of my mind while watching this visually taxing and noisy spy spoof.
p70
aVCertainly, there is plenty going on in this send up of the British spy genre, not all of it good.
p71
aVColin Firth stars as secret agent Harry Hart, one of a select group of highly trained operatives, known collectively as Kingsman.
p72
aVThe bureau recruits British youth to join them, when there\u2019s a rare opening caused by an agent dying in the line of duty.
p73
aVEggsy (Taron Egerton) a twenty-something who dresses like rap star Eminem, is asked by Harry to try his luck at the rigorous training program.
p74
aVMuch of the film concerns the indoctrination procedures, and I found that to be strike one.
p75
aVThe dull preliminaries seemed to last for almost the film\u2019s length.
p76
aVToo much training and not enough story.
p77
aVGet on with it.
p78
aVWhen the story finally gets going, we learn that billionaire Richmond Valentine (Samuel L. Jackson) has a plan to combat global warming and it\u2019s not exactly people-friendly.
p79
aVWhy is the master villain someone who recognizes climate change as a problem that needs to be addressed?
p80
aVWere the producers pushing some redneck buttons by making the bad guy a believer in earth sciences?
p81
aVStrike two.
p82
aVBefore launching his plan, Valentine seeks to control the world\u2019s political leaders by inserting an explosive charge into each of their necks, meaning, step out of line, and your head will burst.
p83
aVMany luminaries go along with Valentine\u2019s plan, agreeing to the implants.
p84
aVOne of those leaders is apparently President Obama (America\u2019s favorite racial target).
p85
aVIt\u2019s possible that the actors didn\u2019t know about the director\u2019s plans to kill the Obama lookalike and his cabinet.
p86
aVThese scenes were filmed separately.
p87
aVI can\u2019t see Sam Jackson going along with this, but perhaps he did.
p88
aVThe film wasn\u2019t funny in the first place.
p89
aVNow, it was downright Rupert Murdochian.
p90
aVThe very conservative Murdoch owns Fox News and 20th Century Fox, the company that released the film.
p91
aVWhat kind of political message were they sending movie audiences?
p92
aVThe scenes in question admittedly happen very fast.
p93
aVPerhaps they were looking for a subliminal effect.
p94
aVStrike three.
p95
aVNow, I wasn\u2019t having a very good time to start with, so perhaps the political messages stood out more with me than your average moviegover.
p96
aVI found \u201cKingsman: The Secret Service\u201d to be derivative, loud and overly broad.
p97
aVJackson\u2019s lisping billionaire was fun for a while, but then started to get on my nerves.
p98
aVFirth was downright dull.
p99
aVAnd, Egerton displayed nothing to recommend a future career in acting.
p100
aVSpy spoofs should be fun.
p101
aVWhat happened?
p102
aVGrade: D+\u000aWhere\u2019s Q Branch when you need it?
p103
aVThe spies in \u201cKingsman: The Secret Service\u201d apparently use the same gadgets over and over.
p104
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p105
aVIt's rare for a sequel to outstrip its predecessor, but Toy Story 2 succeeds admirably.
p106
aVThe characters - cowboy doll Woody, space ranger Buzz Lightyear and their plaything sidekicks - are comfortable and familiar now.
p107
aVThe story, however, moves up a gear - Woody is bought to complete a set of rare collectibles and is torn between returning to his child owner or being shipped off to Japan (the one major fault with the film can be found here - a seemingly anti-Japanese, pro-American sub-text that leaves something of a nasty taste).
p108
aVThe makers provide the sort of broad knockabout humour and gobsmacking effects (the finale is scintillating) that you've come to expect from this franchise.
p109
aVMeanwhile, director Lasseter tugs the heartstrings by posing the question of what happens to broken toys, or those whose owners have outgrown them, while managing to make the first film's central joke (Buzz's conviction that he is a real space ranger) even funnier this time round.
p110
aVAnd what of the 3D version, released January 2010?
p111
aVAs you'd expect from this studio, it's a treat for the eyes, with standout sequences including an opening scene that zooms through Zurg's perilous fortress with what would be deadly speed and cunning camerawork if it were real.
p112
aVAs is, it drips with the panache and humour that put Pixar ahead of the competition.
p113
aVThe 3D on offer throughout is done with style, making this a perfect present for Pixar fans looking for a pre-meal appetiser ahead of the anticipated visual feast of Toy Story 3 in July 2010.
p114
aVIf you're a parent to children young enough not to have seen Toy Story 2 in cinemas the first time around, this is quite simply a must.
p115
aVClick here to read a history of Pixar\u000aClick here for the top ten 3D moments in Toy Story 2
p116
aV\u000aLike pretty much all anime, Princess Mononoke builds toward cataclysm.
p117
aVIt's understandable that mass destruction is a recurrent theme - after all, Japan is the only country to have suffered the atomic bomb first hand.
p118
aVHowever, whereas most anime films feature high-tech battles in modern cities, Princess Mononoke's climactic destruction has a refreshingly different setting - a mythologised 14th century landscape.
p119
aVThis setting is brought to life with utter magnificence by anime master Hayao Miyazaki - who has been praised in no uncertain terms by the likes of Toy Story creator John Lasseter ("Not a day goes by that I do not utilize the tools learned from studying his films").
p120
aVDespite the period setting, the themes of the film are pertinent and modern: the effects of the human drive to better ourselves through technology, and the environmental repercussions of such ambition.
p121
aVThe hero of the piece is Ashitaka (voiced in Neil Gaiman's English translation by Billy Crudup), a young warrior prince who contracts a terminal infection while protecting his village from a horrifying marauding demon.
p122
aVAshitaka discovers that a war is being waged between humanity and nature when he meets Lady Eboshi (Minnie Driver), a matriarch who has founded a city to smelt iron and manufacture firearms.
p123
aVEboshi's chief enemy is San, or Princess Mononoke (voiced with inappropriate brattiness by Claire Danes), the adopted human daughter of Moro (Gillian Anderson), a wolf god, whose clan, along with the boar clan and the other forest creatures, is suffering from Eboshi's ruthless deforestation.
p124
aVAvoiding pastoral sentimentality and a simple condemnation of human technological progress, Princess Mononoke is a complex, intriguing moral tale.
p125
aVWith her reliance on iron and gunpowder, Eboshi exemplifies human drive at the expense of the environment.
p126
aVBut even she has a moral dimension - her employees are women she liberates from a life in brothels, lepers and other outcasts, whose dignity she restores.
p127
aVHer actions and ambitions challenge the supremacy of the traditional feudal overlords.
p128
aVEven the hero, Ashitaka, is ambivalent - he's loyal to neither the humans nor the magic animals, instead he tries to mediate ("What I want is for the humans and the forest to live together in peace," he says with earnest simplicity.)
p129
aVDespite the familiar cartoon look of the characters, the film's overall artistry - which merits comparison with Terrence Malick and Akira Kurosawa in places - matches the sophistication of its story.
p130
aVIn a nutshell: All Miyazaki's films are masterpieces, but Princess Mononoke may just have the edge.
p131
aVOne of the greatest anime films ever made.
p132
aVBy Daniel Etherington\u000a
p133
aVAndrei Tarkovsky's follow-up to Mirror (aka Zerkalo, 1975) was this equally uncompromising, dark science fiction parable.
p134
aVStalker is a kind of bleak Russian spin on The Wizard Of Oz, in which the characters exist in a dreary world alternating between monochrome and washed-out colour.
p135
aVLike its predecessor, this film tells the story of a quest, here an illicit journey undertaken by the Stalker of the title (Kaidanovsky), leading two men, the Writer (Solonitsin) and the Scientist (Grinko), into 'The Zone'.
p136
aVThis is an eerie, unpopulated, mysteriously contaminated region, fenced off and guarded by the army.
p137
aVPeople who go there rarely return - unless they are guided by the oddly empathic Stalkers.
p138
aVAt the heart of The Zone lies 'The Room', where, according to legend, people's dreams can come true.
p139
aVAs the men's perilous journey progresses, however, it becomes evident that it's not so much The Zone that they have to fear, rather its their uncertainty over their deepest wishes, and the promise of them being realised.
p140
aVTarkovsky pared down the source novel, 'Roadside Picnic' by esteemed Russian science fiction authors the brothers Arkady and Boris Strugatsky, eliminating its narrative clarity and defined resolution.
p141
aVHe created instead an opaque work of art filled with powerful, unsettling images and not, as he insisted, symbols - although it is almost impossible to read certain images and themes as bearing anything other than specifically Christian significance.
p142
aVOne particularly telling scene involves the men's wary transition of the antechamber to The Room; it's a large space covered with miniature sand dunes and scattered weapons, money, needles and religious items - all symbols of human power, longing and escape.
p143
aVAs in all Tarkovsky's films, Stalker requires patience and an acceptance of its easy pace.
p144
aVOnce you surrender yourself to the insistent rhythm of this profound, starkly beautiful film you will be further persuaded that Tarkovsky is one of cinema's true poets.\u000a																
p145
aV\u000aIn the imagination of filmmakers, there is something about the horrors of the Spanish Civil War and its immediate aftermath that lends itself to the innocent, often fanciful perspective of a child.
p146
aVSo Victor Erice's The Spirit Of The Beehive (1973) presented an idyllic Spanish postwar countryside through the eyes of a girl obsessed with James Whale's Frankenstein, and Guillermo Del Toro's The Devil's Backbone (2001) seamlessly merged the inexorable advance of fascism with a ghost story unfolding in a rural school for boys.
p147
aVPan's Labyrinth is a sister film to The Devil's Backbone, and similarly blends historical realism with more genre-bound fantasy elements to create an expansive, visionary and moving examination of Spain's darkest chapter of the last century.
p148
aVIt is 1944, at the end of the Civil War, a time when idealism and innocence are taking their final, doomed stand.
p149
aVWith her father dead, bookish young Ofélia (Ivana Baquero) is brought to the country outpost of her pregnant mother's new man, the fascist Captain Vidal (Sergi López), who is ruthlessly engaged in rooting out the last remnants of a ragtag guerrilla group hidden in the neighbouring woods.
p150
aVVidal's head housekeeper (Maribel Verdú) and doctor (Álex Angulo) are both secretly helping the resistance as best they can, and Ofélia too defies Vidal's monolithic worldview by retreating into her own fairytale imagination.
p151
aVAfter following a locust-like fairy into an ancient labyrinth bordering the estate, Ofélia meets the forest spirit Pan (Doug Jones), who sets her three tasks involving a giant greedy toad, the terrifying Pale Man (who devours children and holds his eyes in the palms of his hands), and the shedding of innocent blood.
p152
aVMeanwhile outside, an altogether more real monster awaits, torturing and murdering anyone who stands in his way.
p153
aV"You'll see that life is not like your fairy tales."
p154
aVSo Ofélia is told by her mother Carmen (played by the appropriately named Ariadna Gil), in one of several attempts to wean the young innocent off the high ideals and straightforward morality of her beloved fiction, where bravery and purity are rewarded with living happily ever after.
p155
aVCarmen has, after all, allowed herself to become inextricably compromised, marrying her own and her children's fates to the rise of fascism.
p156
aVYet in Pan's Labyrinth, the world of Ofélia's imagination and the realities of Falangist Spain run in curious parallel as two different, ideologically opposed ways of telling the same story - a story of tyranny, resistance and the timeless struggle between good and evil.Ofélia's trials may be fanciful, but the woodland strife, mythical beasts, heroic acts, purloined keys, forbidden feasts and troubled births that constitute their essential furniture all reflect, through a glass darkly, the actual conflicts taking place around her, while the deadly reality of the dangers faced by the girl and others is never in any doubt.
p157
aVThe result is a Franco-era Brazil, where events outside and inside the mind gradually become indistinguishable as each allegorises and informs the other, so that the ending can be regarded as both horrifically tragic and redemptively triumphant at the same time - all depending on the limits of the viewer's own imagination.
p158
aVFrom Cronos to Mimic to Blade II to Hellboy, Del Toro has always been associated with horror, but even if Pan's Labyrinth has its fair share of grotesquerie, brutality and visceral shocks, it is a film unbounded by genre, all at once children's fantasy, adult parable, historical drama and more, located at a magical crossroads where Labyrinth meets The Shining and Land And Freedom meets Ichi The Killer.
p159
aVDel Toro and his effects crew have crafted an exquisite fairytale world whose phantasmagorical spectacle is never anything less than integral to the film.
p160
aVThe performances are flawless (especially López as the clean-shaven face of horror), the transitions from reality to fantasy and back again are beguiling, and the viewer always has the sense of watching something not just gripping, but also of vital importance.\u000a
p161
aVTelling its story of a recently retired marshal who finds himself friendless and alone to face four desperadoes on his wedding day, this gripping western respects the unities of time and place.
p162
aVThe pulsating action coincides exactly with the 85 minutes' running time, as well as brilliantly setting the marshal in isolation among the ominous wooden buildings and dusty streets of a small frontier town.It was the high point of Fred Zinnemann's career, and Gary Cooper, in his Oscar-winning role - at 51, his handsome face lined and drawn - gives possibly the most poignant and profound performance to be found in any western.No doubt Sergio Leone remembered the movie (in which Leone star Van Cleef makes his debut) when he embarked on his homages to the American West, while Ennio Morricone has echoed the effective use of the 'Do Not Forsake Me, Oh My Darling' song on the soundtrack.
p163
aVFollowing on from the huge success of Butch Cassidy And The Sundance Kid, Paul Newman and Robert Redford teamed up once again with director George Roy Hill to make this slick crime caper.
p164
aVFirst released in 1973, the joke at the time was that the stars had simply swapped moustaches since The Sting was, to all intents and purposes, a reinterpretation of their earlier outlaw roles as Butch and Sundance.
p165
aVHowever, massive box office takings and seven Academy Awards (it trounced The Exorcist in most categories) quickly conferred classic status upon it.
p166
aVWas such acclaim deserved?
p167
aVNot really, but given the subject matter there's a delicious irony in the fact that such a good-looking, efficiently constructed and commercially-oriented film pulled a fast one over the critics and Academy voters.Set in Chicago in 1936, Redford stars as short-con operator Johnny Hooker who, together with long-term mentor Luther (Jones), unwittingly rips off $5000 from menacing Irish mobster Lonegan (Shaw).
p168
aVWhen Lonegan's henchmen kill Luther, Johnny wants revenge and seeks out Henry Gondorff (Newman), a washed-up, but still wily, confidence trickster to help him take Lonegan for half-a-million dollars.
p169
aVWorking from a tightly constructed script by David S Ward, both leads have an easygoing chemistry that Hill exploits with a lightness of touch that keeps proceedings moving at a brisk pace.
p170
aVThe anachronistic ragtime score, sepia-tinged cinematography and romanticised period details gave the film a deliberately old fashioned feel back in 1973, with means that it hasn't dated.
p171
aVWatched now, it's still an exhilarating film that delights in showing us the machinations of the con, yet keeps its cards close enough to its chest to keep us guessing right up to the final reel.
p172
aVAn exquisite example of an empty genre, its influence can be seen most obviously in Steven Soderbergh's lovable crook caper Ocean's Eleven, not to mention a raft of inferior heist movies.
p173
aVJapanese animation - anime - repeatedly comes back to the same debate: about the perils of advances in technology; and the same motifs: social decay, the vast metropolis, the human-like robot, the cataclysmic disaster.
p174
aVAll these elements are present and correct in Metropolis.
p175
aVNot surprisingly, as it's adapted by Katsuhiro Ôtomo, the creator of the benchmark Akira manga and anime and is based on 1949 manga created by Osama Tezuka, a godfather figure for these key Japanese media.
p176
aVBut there's more history to this film than that - Tezuka's manga was, of course, inspired by Fritz Lang's 1926 classic film, which casts a long shadow over much subsequent sci-fi.
p177
aVThe city-state of Metropolis is a giant, hi-tech, multi-layered place - imagine modern Singapore, Hong Kong or Tokyo reimagined by a 20s or 30s sci-fi visionary.
p178
aVDespite a puppet president, the city is actually ruled by the devious Duke Red (Ishida) and a fascistic militia led by his gun-toting adopted son, Rock (Okada).
p179
aVAs in Lang's Metropolis, beneath the wealth and achievement there exists an underclass - humans disenfranchised by robot labourers, themselves another marginalised group.
p180
aVThe robot-hating Rock is perturbed when he discovers Red is employing renegade scientist Dr Laughton to create a "superhuman" robot modelled on Red's dead daughter.
p181
aVJapanese detective Shunsuka Ban (Tomita) and his nephew sidekick, Kenichi (Kobayashi), who are seeking Laughton, arrive on the scene just after Rock has trashed Laughton's lab.
p182
aVIn the confusion, Kenichi falls in with the 'newborn' robot, Tima (Imoto), who slowly learns about her nature and destiny.
p183
aVEven sci-fi fans may be confounded by the fevered riffing on anime's favourite themes.
p184
aVRobots believing they are human is a familiar scenario, notably from Spielberg's A.I..
p185
aVBut the issues arising from the threat of rampant technology are confusing - particularly in the paradox that sentient robots personify the threat of technology to humanity, but are themselves victims.
p186
aVThere's also a problem with the style of the characters.
p187
aVRather than opting for the proportionate style of Akira or Ghost In A Shell, the humans here are in the more childish, 'classic' manga style - which evolved from early Disney cartoons - and look like squashed 'Tin Tin' characters.
p188
aVPresumably this is in keeping with the retro-futurism of the whole affair, however it jars with the settings, which, realised through a combination of CG and cel animation, are magnificent, atmospheric, highly detailed and sometimes photorealistic.
p189
aVIndeed, the film works best for this sheer spectacle. 
p190
aVBen (Rogen) is an internet movie geek and slacker.
p191
aVAlong with his mates, he is making a quixotic attempt to catalogue instances of star nudity in cinema, unaware that website Mr Skin has already been there, watched it and noted the glimpse of tit.
p192
aVAlison (Heigl) has just got her big break as a TV presenter for the E!
p193
aVchannel, working the red carpet for the pseudo-journalism of entertainment industry.
p194
aVOut clubbing to celebrate her promotion, Alison has too much to drink, falls for Ben's dopey moves and takes him back to their place for sex: "It's a good job I am drunk - this is taking forever," exclaims Ben, revealing a little too much of the inner monologue of a man holding up his end of the one-night-stand bargain.
p195
aVIf only he had focused more on putting on a condom.
p196
aVAlison falls pregnant, decides not to abort the unborn child, and her and Ben embark upon a relationship.
p197
aVAlison stays in the house of her sister Debbie (Mann, wife of director Judd Apatow) and husband Pete (Rudd), who are living the American middle class dream - except that Debbie is getting a little too old to go to nightclubs anymore and Paul is trudging around in his Tom Waits' T-shirt wondering where his dreams have gone.
p198
aVThis older, but not wiser, couple are a premonition of what Alison and Ben may become - in a clever twist, it's an argument over her sister's marriage that first drives our young lovers apart.
p199
aVRevolutions in comedy come when new talent shows that this is how it is and makes us feel like fools for laughing at the old jokes of the establishment.
p200
aVLenny Bruce and Richard Pryor did it in the 1960s, Monty Python and David Nobbs in the 1970s.
p201
aVAs pioneered by the Comic Strip troupe in the UK, 1980s alternative comedy argued against the bullying observations peddled by the working men's club crowd.
p202
aVRicky Gervais tore up the sitcom with 'The Office', using the conceit of docusoap to explore the gap between David Brent's image of himself and the reality.
p203
aVLikewise 'The Royle Family' - it's easy to forget how appalled commentators were at the first episodes of Caroline Aherne's series, utterly shocked by its realistic depiction of working class family for laughs as opposed to kitchen sink tragedy.
p204
aVIn 2006, Sacha Baron Cohen took a direct route to comic realism, throwing himself upon the mercy of the real world for Borat, incurring various legal suits for exposing the unflattering opinions of the people caught up in his prank.If groundbreaking comedy is about telling it like it is, instead of telling it like it was, then Knocked Up makes it halfway to classic status.
p205
aVThe 40 Year-Old Virgin was sweet but had - at its heart - the unbelievable conceit of Steve Carell going through adulthood without getting laid.
p206
aVElsewhere in Hollywood, post-American Pie gross-out has worn out its gag reflex.
p207
aVThe Wayans brothers are presumably working on Little Man 2.
p208
aVWith Blades Of Glory Will Ferrell and Co's improvisations finally disappeared off into a hyperreality of indulgence (Apatow was producer on Anchorman: The Legend Of Ron Burgundy and Talladega Nights: The Ballad Of Ricky Bobby but did not write the scripts).
p209
aVWedding Crashers and its ilk run out of steam as soon as their set-ups are done.
p210
aVSomeone, somewhere is rubbing more talc into Eddie Murphy's fat suit.
p211
aVKnocked Up comes closer to the truth, is funnier as a consequence, and will reinvigorate the mainstream romantic comedy (yes, that is a good thing).
p212
aVIt captures the barely-restrained panic of the delivery suite, where stressed doctors and expectant fathers clash.
p213
aVWe are introduced to the male anxieties around pregnancy sex.
p214
aVWith wry sadness, it charts the day a man must put aside his bong and get a job.
p215
aVMore surprisingly, it interrogates the over-planned domesticity of the middle class marriage, with Susan's remark that her younger sister "must train him" nailing the mutual oppression couples can fall into.
p216
aVA 'Newsweek' article by Jennie Yabroff identified Knocked Up as indicative of a cultural trend toward beta males.
p217
aVOnly in America's ruthless 'Rules'-inspired dating culture would two thousand words about post-9/11 cultural deflation and the national humiliation of Iraq be required to explain why a successful media hottie could end up with a doofus with love handles.
p218
aVBen may have moobs and no job, but at least he is sweet and nurturing - an underrated quality in Hollywood (as Alison quivers, at the height of her vulnerability, "don't fuck me over").
p219
aVIn 'Curb Your Enthusiasm' Larry David used improvisation within a strict structure to combine realism with the comic rewards of the reverses and twists of tight plotting.
p220
aVDirector Judd Apatow transfers that formula to the big screen.
p221
aVThe downside is all those improvised blind alleys that get shoehorned into the DVD release so that the distributors can boast of "40 minutes of unused material" - the lengthy DVD cut of The 40 Year Old Virgin drags its feet like a month without sex.
p222
aVIn Knocked Up, there is a magic mushrooms in Vegas interlude that shows us how useless men are when left to indulge themselves that scores cheap drug gags at the expense of the hard-won relationship humour that represent the film's comic triumph.
p223
aVOtherwise, this is the birth of something special.
p224
aVWith TV threatening cinema's entertainment hegemony in the 1950s, movie producers reacted by making films bigger, longer, grander, extraordinarily expensive and packing them with exciting spectacle.
p225
aVOf course, the historical epic had always been an element of movie-makers' output, but its popularity had come and gone.
p226
aVThe coming of sound and the Depression had seen Hollywood decrease its production of bloated spectacle films in the 1930s, but the time was ripe again in the 1950s.
p227
aVThe advent of a suitably grand new cinema technology - widescreen - was central to the overall fattening of the movie experience as represented by the historical epic event movies.
p228
aV1953's The Robe had introduced Fox's patented CinemaScope; the other studios soon followed suit, all grasping at developments that would keep the threat of TV at bay.
p229
aVMGM's Ben-Hur is the quintessential product of this atmosphere of panic and conscious excess.Based on the 19th century bestseller, and influenced by MGM's silent version of the story from 1925, Ben-Hur recounts, in almost four hours, the travails of Judah Ben-Hur (Heston).
p230
aVA Jewish prince at the time of Christ, Ben-Hur comes into conflict with childhood friend Messala (Boyd), a Roman who is in command of the Roman legions that are holding Judah's people in subjugation.
p231
aVCue a patchy odyssey that sees our hero surviving sea battles as a galley slave, being adopted by a Roman noble and returning to challenge Messala in the mother of all chariot races.
p232
aVOh, and along the way having passing encounters with Christ.
p233
aVDespite being tweaked by such literary honoraries as Gore Vidal and Christopher Fry, the dialogue of Ben-Hur encompasses leadenness, pomposity and sanctimony.
p234
aVBut Heston, at the height of his heavy-browed, hero-inhabiting powers, gives the film a stalwart focus, while participating in action-packed set-pieces that show 50s special effects at their most dramatic.
p235
aV\u000aBen Stiller and his friends from the American Museum of Natural History visit London in \u201cNight at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb.\u201d\u000aYou may not find many original moments in the corny humor of \u201cNight at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb.\u201d But, you will enjoy time spent with old friends in this third and final film in the series.
p236
aVBen Stiller and company create more than a few warm and fuzzies.
p237
aVThis time the fantasy premise jumps the pond to the British Museum in London.
p238
aVThe ancient Egyptian widget that keeps the exhibits alive in America is corroding, and museum guard Larry Daley (Stiller) must find out why.
p239
aVThe young pharaoh, Ahkmenrah (Rami Malek) tells Daley, he should consult with his father, Merenkahre (Ben Kingsley) at the London institution on what to do.
p240
aVMany of Daley\u2019s exhibits at the American Museum of Natural History secretly hitch a ride overseas.
p241
aVMaking the trip: Theodore Roosevelt (Robin Williams), Jedediah (Owen Wilson), Octavius (Steve Coogan), Sacagawea (Mizuo Peck) and Attila the Hun (Patrick Gallagher).
p242
aVOf course, it wouldn\u2019t be a family reunion without Ahkmenrah tagging along.
p243
aVDaley and his son, Nicky (Styler Gisondo replacing Jake Cherry), sneak into the British Museum after delivering a large crate carrying the American exhibits.
p244
aVAnd, of course, the entire institution springs to life thanks to the ancient widget, despite its oxidation.
p245
aVThey even get to meet Sir Lancelot (Dan Stevens), who amusingly doesn\u2019t understand that he never existed.
p246
aVCamelot, he is told, was just a legend.
p247
aVLance is handsome, but not too smart.
p248
aVIt doesn\u2019t register right away.
p249
aVThis character can be taxing, but ultimately he\u2019s quite entertaining.
p250
aVAs I said before, \u201cNight at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb\u201d won\u2019t draw raves for originality.
p251
aVIt\u2019s familiarity and sentimentality that rule the day.
p252
aVThis was the final film for Mickey Rooney and Robin Williams.
p253
aVBoth are greatly missed by Hollywood and the circumstances of Williams\u2019 death, in particular, make his presence more meaningful.
p254
aVPerhaps the story is contrived and the producers were out to make a few bucks.
p255
aV\u201cNight at the Museum 3\u2033 is a feel-good movie, and that counts for something.
p256
aVTech credits are fine.
p257
aVThe special effects seem a bit old-fashioned, but they work.
p258
aVThe acting is about what you\u2019d expect in a big-budget all-star vehicle.
p259
aVEveryone has their moment.
p260
aVI particularly liked Stiller playing off himself as Daley meets Laaa, a Neanderthal who could be his doppelgänger.
p261
aVSome might think that the routine goes a bit too long.
p262
aVI found the repetition is what made it funny.
p263
aVIf you\u2019re okay with the potty humor from the first two films, then you certainly won\u2019t mind the third.
p264
aVI think maybe the monkey urinating might be the most bawdy moment.
p265
aVAnd, you know kids.
p266
aVThey love that kind of stuff.
p267
aV\u201cNight at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb\u201d was a pleasant surprise.
p268
aVNothing spectacular.
p269
aVBut, a fun ride for the family.
p270
aVGrade: B\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: March 10, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 98 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cPG\u201d\u000aReleased by Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment\u000aThe British Museum comes alive in \u201cNight at the Museum: Secret of the Tomb.\u201d\u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p271
aV\u000aThere are moments, early on, when you worry if it is going to turn out alright.
p272
aVCan he pull it off?
p273
aVIs there really a happy ending to this epic, the adventures of one director and his collaborators to craft a trilogy that will not only dominate the box office of the early 21st century, not only raise the bar for blockbuster films, but in the end - for all its battles, creatures and plucky little hobbits - actually mean something?
p274
aVThis quest is imperiled early on in The Lord Of The Rings: The Return Of The King; you doubt if there are any surprises left in the bag.
p275
aVAfter the two astonishing innovations of The Lord Of The Rings: The Two Towers - Gollum and the stomping legions at the battle of Helm's Deep - the first few bars of Return Of The King still carry the echoes of the previous film.
p276
aVAragorn (Viggo Mortensen), Gandalf (Ian McKellen), Legolas (Orlando Bloom) and Gimli (John Rhys-Davies) are celebrating the victory at Helm's Deep in the halls of Rohan, while Frodo (Elijah Wood), Sam (Sean Astin) and Gollum (Andy Serkis) are still on their trek into Mordor.
p277
aVThere is a striking prologue that takes us back to the crucial moment in Gollum's life, when he was still a simple Riverfolk called Smeagol, but as we riffle through the various sub-plots and characters of the trilogy, reviving them with a scene here, a speech there, the apprehension arises that Return Of The King will disappoint.
p278
aVThere are too many slo-mos set to pan pipes, there is exposition cut against a derisory battle in the ruins of Osgilith.
p279
aVWe have been here before and the return will lack the startling novelty of our first trip.
p280
aVBut put these doubts out of your mind.
p281
aVDo not think for one minute that Return Of The King fails to meet the considerable expectations that have grown up on the back of previous instalments.
p282
aVYou could open an entire can of hyperbole over this film, and still run short of adjectives to praise its majesty.
p283
aVStill, let's try.
p284
aVNo doubt there will be a few minor spoilers along the way.
p285
aVAfter mopping up the carnage at the close of the Two Towers, the various pieces of the chess game are moved into place for the mother-of-all-battles at the Gondorian stronghold of Minas Tirith.
p286
aVPippin (Billy Boyd) is taken to the city by Gandalf after a ferocious encounter with a Palantir (a black crystal ball).
p287
aVThis shocking, searing experience of sorcery heaves us on our way; the adventure resumes.
p288
aVAs the armies of Mordor approach, the palette darkens.
p289
aVSam and Frodo exist under perpetual gloom, their pallors graying with hunger and exhaustion.
p290
aVFatalism is in the air.
p291
aVAs the fellowship embark upon their various missions, Merry admits "I just don't know what is going to happen".
p292
aVLegolas speaks of a "sleepless malice" rising against them.
p293
aVEven Gandalf admits that the odds are hopeless, death certain; "There was never much of a hope.
p294
aVJust a fool's hope."
p295
aVOverwhelmingly, this is a film about death.
p296
aVNot just in its bodycount (although the colossal battle scenes probably do set a new record for on-screen deaths, even if they are the killing of computer-generated hordes).
p297
aVThe battles - whether it is the Nazgûls swooping over the carved citadel plucking soldiers from the battlements, or horses disappearing beneath the feet of charging oliphants - turn death into spectacle.
p298
aVBut the speeches of Gandalf, and the friendship between Sam and Frodo turn that spectacle into something more telling.
p299
aVIt is there in the reaction of the steward of Gondor, Denethor (John Noble), to the killing of his beloved son Boromir (Sean Bean, way back in the first film); the only character who loses control in the face of death.
p300
aVIf these films have an overarching theme it is courage in the face of the insurmountable odds of your own mortality.
p301
aVOr as Aragorn puts it, as he leaps into an unknown, "I do not fear death".
p302
aVOr Gimli the dwarf, when regarding another suicidal mission; "Certainty of death?
p303
aVSmall chance of success?
p304
aVWhat are we waiting for?"
p305
aVThe film is at its most moving when we are watching the fear play across the faces of our heroes, and the nameless ranks of men who stand against Sauron's horrors.
p306
aVAlong with the high bodycount, there is a very high weepie count too, the sobs inspired as much by this bravery as by grief.
p307
aVOn a lighter note, the fans who have squirreled out sexual subtexts in the relationships between the hobbits as well as, say, Aragorn and Legolas, will find plenty of boxes to tick here.
p308
aVThe Fellowship look longingly at one another.
p309
aVAlso Aragorn, as he ascends to his birthright as King Of Gondor, single-handedly drags the patriarchal beard back into fashion.
p310
aVAlthough it is customary to praise the achievements of the special effects department, this trilogy's most startling achievement is its storytelling; every time the longeurs of exposition or the details of various races and myths threaten your suspension of disbelief, the three-handed scenes between Sam, Frodo and Gollum bring back intimacy and acuity of character.
p311
aVThis focus tightens around the ring itself; the very small thing at the heart of this epic that stands for a very large theme.
p312
aVA small round band of gold that magnifies the evil in every heart and represents man's inexhaustible appetite for power.
p313
aVAgainst this ubiquitous evil stands man's improbable will to persist despite the monstrous nature of his condition; born to die, yet able to face this tragedy with courage and equanimity.
p314
aVAs Gandalf puts it, "Death is just another path which we all must take."
p315
aVThe greatest cinematic event of a generation is over, leaving behind it a thoughtful silence.\u000a
p316
aV\u000aHayao Miyazaki, the master of refined and (mostly) traditional animation, probably couldn't make a bad film.
p317
aVBut with Howl's Moving Castle he fails to top his previous films, Princess Mononoke (1997) and the Oscar-winning Spirited Away (2001).
p318
aVAs with his 1986 film Castle In The Sky, Howl's Moving Castle is adapted from the work of Diana Wynne Jones, the British fantasy writer and onetime student of both JRR Tolkien and CS Lewis.
p319
aVCastle In The Sky is actually her sequel to Howl's Moving Castle, and both films are set in the same world: a land that resembles Europe around the turn of the 19th century.
p320
aVHere, industrialisation and technology are still picturesque.
p321
aVSide by side with this ordinary human society is a world of magic, which is more tangibly threatening than the new belching steam trains and cars.
p322
aVIn a city of Germanic, candy-coloured buildings lives Sophie (voiced by Emily Mortimer in the American dub), a shy, hardworking hat-maker.
p323
aVShe's flung into an adventure - as Miyazaki's young heroines generally are - when she has a back alley encounter with Howl (Christian Bale), a notorious wizard who is reputed to eat the hearts of beautiful young women.
p324
aVHe doesn't eat Sophie's heart; instead he sweeps her off as he's being pursued by mysterious shadowy creatures.
p325
aVThese are the minions of the Witch of the Waste (Lauren Bacall), a sometime employee of the royal court and former lover of Howl, who now has it in for him.
p326
aVUnluckily for Sophie, she's caught up in their battle and the Witch transforms her into an old woman (who is then voiced by Jean Simmons).
p327
aVWith consummate pragmatism, Sophie says to herself, "This isn't so bad.
p328
aVYou're still in pretty good shape and your clothes finally suit you," then heads off alone into the Wastes.
p329
aVHere, she encounters another seemingly cursed entity, a mute scarecrow she dubs Turniphead.
p330
aVHe leads her through the cold until she reaches the "moving castle" - a remarkable clanking construction that lumbers across the landscape thanks to the power of resident fire demon Calcifer (Billy Crystal).
p331
aVSophie, with nowhere else to go, sets herself up as cleaner for Howl's household, which also includes a young apprentice (Josh Hutcherson).
p332
aVBut as she grows used to her new body, and bonds grow between the members of this peculiar "family", a terrible mechanised warfare eats its way across the land and threatens the idyll.
p333
aVIt's a fabulous set-up, but unfortunately it lends itself to narrative convolutions that contrast with the immediacy of Spirited Away or Miyazaki's earlier films.
p334
aVThe royal household, led by Howl's former mentor Suliman (Blythe Danner), is caught up in the war but it's never entirely clear who is fighting whom, or why.
p335
aVPerhaps this ambiguity is intentional, highlighting a sense of the futility of conflict.
p336
aVBut as we see Howl, in the form of a giant flying bird, sweeping through fire-fights and battling other magical creatures, it's hard to fathom the implications.
p337
aVIn one battle scene, the question arises: "Is it the enemy's or one of ours".
p338
aVThe answer is, "What difference does it make?"
p339
aVAt its heart, the film is about Sophie discovering her true self, Howl discovering his, the Witch hers, and even Calcifer his.
p340
aVThe whole thing is a jumble of journeys of self discovery set against Miyazaki's beautiful, evocative worlds.
p341
aVIn one scene the old Sophie, taking a break from her chores in the castle, sits beside a mountain lake, soaking in the scenery.
p342
aVThe majesty of the mountains and the natural world is contrasted with the harshness of the society, where the seemingly benign combination of magic and industrialisation has collapsed into terrible destruction.
p343
aVThere's doubtless a subtext here about the once agrarian Japan developing into the imperial, industrialised nation that felt atomic warfare firsthand.
p344
aVThere are also themes relating to a more general disgust at the wastefulness of warfare, but again, it's not the film's greatest strength.
p345
aVThat lies in the characterisation and, more so, in the characters' relationships with both themselves and each other.
p346
aVIn a nutshell: Another work of great imagination and beauty from Hiyao Miyazaki.
p347
aVMore  muddled than his best films but charming and strangely profound.
p348
aVBy Daniel Etherington\u000a
p349
aVHulking great buildings, hulking men, hulking utterances are the blocks that Ridley Scott's film is constructed from.
p350
aVBut at the heart of Gladiator's epic recreation of the ancient Roman world sits an effectively simple tale of loyalty and love.
p351
aVMaximus (Russell Crowe) is a respected warrior, a general loyal to the visionary emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris).
p352
aVHowever, when Marcus Aurelius dies, Maximus is double-crossed by the dangerous, nay deranged, new emperor Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix).
p353
aVAll Maximus wants is to avenge his family.
p354
aVAfter being sold to gladiator trainer Proximo (Oliver Reed, serving up his final role with brute nobility), the experienced soldier fights his way up the gladiatorial league charts until he's the darling of the Colosseum.
p355
aVThe David Beckham of bloodshed.
p356
aVSoon he gets a chance to face the father-murdering, sister-loving cause of his woes - Commodus.
p357
aVRidley Scott's best film since Blade Runner, Gladiator magnificently revives a genre that seemed to have expired with Cleopatra in the mid-1960s.
p358
aVAlthough it's essentially cobbled together from 19th century neoclassical paintings, Spartacus and The Fall Of The Roman Empire, Gladiator is given added oomph with judiciously-applied CGI, a solid script from David Franzoni (Amistad), John Logan (The Aviator) and William Nicholson (Shadowlands).
p359
aVPlus, in Maximus, Russell Crowe found his best role.
p360
aVThe supporting cast is impressive too.
p361
aVJames Ellroy's complex, multi-layered novel looked untranslatable to the screen.
p362
aVDirector Curits Hanson and screenplay-writer Brian Helgeland simplified the story, stripping down the involved narrative, removing several sub-plots along the way, to create a slick, still-complex tale of Tinseltown sordidness that somehow remains completely faithful to the spirit of Ellroy.
p363
aVThe film is a procession of little miracles.
p364
aVAntipodeans Guy Pearce and Russell Crowe adopt faultless accents to play cops of varying moral rectitude.
p365
aVCrowe's tough guy Bud White falls hard for Kim Basinger's femme fatale, who bears more than a passing resemblance to Veronica Lake.
p366
aVThe film is immersed in the real fantasy world of Hollywood, and the characters rub shoulders with movie stars and lookalike hookers.LA Confidential's most pleasant surprise is Basinger's defiantly well-modulated and poignant performance.
p367
aVKevin Spacey is in fine form as crooked celebrity cop Jack Vincennes, a technical adviser to a popular TV show.
p368
aVRather than doing his accustomed job of scene-stealing, he is just another top-drawer performer in a uniformly strong cast.
p369
aVCurtis Hanson successfully made the transition from being a reliable director of formula thrillers to expertly holding together a labyrinthine plot.
p370
aVEllroy was said to have been delighted with the film.
p371
aVKenneth Anger, the chronicler of Hollywood sleaze, must have loved it too.
p372
aVMax Fischer (Jason Schwartzman) is a student at the elite Rushmore Academy.
p373
aVHe devotes all of his school time to extra-circular activities at the expense of his academic work.
p374
aVThreatened with expulsion, it is not a good time to develop a crush on a teacher (Olivia Williams) and find a mentor in a self-hating multi-millionaire (Bill Murray).
p375
aVDestructive relationships develop for all concerned.
p376
aVAn observation on what happens when the world of children and adults collide, perfectly embodied in Schwartzman's performance.
p377
aVComing across like a 10th grade Woody Allen, full of neurosis and vain arrogance, his failure to comprehend why a lonely, widowed woman would prefer to date a steel magnate to the director of the school play is priceless and tragic.
p378
aVMurray is a terrific deadpan foil, a man who's got it made, but cannot grow up, you understand his need to associate with youth.
p379
aVDisney went through a slump in the 80s, with the humdrum likes of The Fox And The Hound and The Black Cauldron.
p380
aVBut this take on fairy tale favourite Beauty And The Beast reestablished the studio as the pre-eminent cartoon feature factory, and even introduced audiences to the potential of computer animation.
p381
aVIt's a charming film.
p382
aVSpirited and intelligent village beauty Belle (O'Hara) escapes the attentions of macho village lunkhead Gaston (White) when she sets off to save her father from the noble but tortured man-beast (Benson) - a giant gorilla-cun-lion - who has him imprisoned.
p383
aVGradually, love blossoms between the two and the Beast's secret - that he is actually a bewitched man - is revealed.  
p384
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aSteven Spielberg\u2019s sci-fi, monster-movie classic re-released in 3D.
p385
aVRead more and find movie times.
p386
aVJurassic Park\u2019s once-innovative technology may have been eclipsed by more sophisticated onscreen trickery in the two decades since its release, but the film still has plenty to offer audiences as a suspenseful adventure that has stood the test of time.
p387
aVThat\u2019s not to say the last twenty years have been particularly kind to its costumes or onscreen gadgets (\u201clook, a CD-ROM!
p388
aV!\u201d), or the chaos theory pop science spouted throughout by Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum in a performance that now is plain weird \u2013 or plain awesome).
p389
aVThese aspects of the film prove vaguely snigger-inducing throughout its first act, but in a testament to Spielberg\u2019s powers \u2013 utilised here in arguably his last great adventure yarn \u2013 once the dino-doo hits the fan and giant carnivores start running amok, Jurassic Park still proves as thrilling as ever.
p390
aVThe 3D conversion seems to have been approached with the film\u2019s mid-90s aesthetic firmly in mind.
p391
aVRather than trying to drag Jurassic Park kicking and screaming into the 21st Century there\u2019s a frequent Viewmaster-like feel to the layers that have been created, some elements pulled hard into the foreground while others are banished further into the background to create an environment of great depth.
p392
aVIt\u2019s a stylistic approach rather than a realistic one, further playing up the comic book feel established by the film\u2019s early colour palette and scale of its creatures and sets.
p393
aVOnce the adventure really begins, the 3D further enhances the amusement park ride feeling the film induces, proving a welcome addition that\u2019s more than the usual thinly-veiled excuse to wring a few more box office dollars out of punters.
p394
aVYour browser does not support iFrames.\u000a\u000a
p395
aV\u000a\u000aThe 3D effects had me nearly jumping out of my seat.
p396
aVSome say Hollywood is converting too many old films to 3D.
p397
aVBut, \u201cJurassic Park\u201d was the perfect choice.
p398
aVThere\u2019s nothing more fun than sharing a seat with a snapping dinosaur.
p399
aVI can\u2019t imagine anyone not having seen this 1993 sci-fi thriller by Steven Spielberg.
p400
aVEven if you dislike this type of movie, you probably surfed by it a few times on television and maybe watched a scene or two.
p401
aVI happen to love this type of movie and can even remember where I was when I saw it for the first time.
p402
aVIt\u2019s an event movie.
p403
aVThe 3D effects are excellent.
p404
aVThere\u2019s plenty of enhanced depth perception.
p405
aVAnd, the raptor and T-Rex sequences are stunning in 3D.
p406
aVThere\u2019s one scene in particular where a raptor tries to snap at Laura Dern\u2019s butt, after she climbs into a ventilation system at the theme park\u2019s visitors center.
p407
aV\u201cJurassic Park\u201d was first released on June 11, 1993.
p408
aVAnd, it has held up over the years, a true classic.
p409
aVIt ranks as the 20th highest-grossing film in North America.
p410
aVIt\u2019s about $85 million short of hitting the one-billion dollar mark.
p411
aVI doubt if this latest theatrical release will bring that much money.
p412
aVBut, there will be plenty of folks willing to visit \u201cJurassic Park\u201d just one more time for some really cool 3D enhanced effects.
p413
aVGrade: A-\u000aBy the way, JP4 is being shot in 3D and is set for release on June 13, 2014.
p414
aVBlu-ray notes:  Well, the film is even better on 3D Blu-ray.
p415
aVThe 3D effects seem more pronounced than at the theater.
p416
aVThe brim of Bob Peck\u2019s hat came right out of my television (seemingly).
p417
aVOf course, the day scenes were better than the night scenes.
p418
aVAt night, some of the 3D effects were harder to spot and enjoy.
p419
aVBut, overall, JP3D was a first rate home theater experience.
p420
aVHighly recommended.
p421
aVFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: April 23, 2013\u000aFormat: 3D Blu-ray\u000aRuntime: 127 minutes\u000aRated: PG-13\u000aReleased by Universal Studios Home Entertainment\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p422
aVThe astounding commercial success of Spielberg's theme-park movie proved once again the power of marketing and awesome special effects to overcome a thin story line and feeble characterisation.
p423
aVAnother surprising aspect of the response was that the film seemed not to depend on a decent-sized cinema screen but proved effective when reduced to little brother telly.
p424
aVA definite tribute to the director's manipulative skill in dotting the overlong proceedings with enough shocks, scary moments and sentimentality to take up the slack.
p425
aVAmid the special effects showcasing and chases, Jurassic Park exhibits the perennial concerns of Michael Crichton - who wrote the source novel.
p426
aVSaid concern is man abusing scientific knowledge and playing God.
p427
aVThe culprit here is Attenborough's John Hammond, an entrepreneur who has used dinosaur DNA taken from blood-sucking mosquitoes that have been preserved in amber to re-create the prehistoric dinosaurs, with the intention of opening the ultimate theme-park cum nature reserve.
p428
aVTo prove that all is well with his proposed park, Hammond is forced to call in three 'experts': paleontologist Dr Alan Grant (Neill), his girlfriend paleo-botanist Dr Ellie Sattler (Dern), and chaos theoretician Dr Ian Malcolm (Goldblum).
p429
aVOh, and sadly some kids are along for the ride too - they are the target audience after all, both for Hammond and for Spielberg.After the initial splendour of viewing a brontosaurus chomping on a tree-top and the thrill of cuddling a sickly tricerotops, things inevitably go sour and the predators make their presence felt.
p430
aVT-Rex reestablishes his reign, this time as king of movie monsters (a kind of bipedal Jaws), while the smaller velociraptors prove their viciousness by hunting and chowing down on various cast members.
p431
aVMuch of the film consists of being chased by dinosaurs and trying to survive.
p432
aVIt's a simple formula, but crudely effective.
p433
aVAttenborough is preposterously bad as Hammond, with an accent as wobbly as his scientific and moral judgement; the performance is only redeemed by his twinkly eyes.
p434
aVThe rest of the cast are adequate, but hobbled by under-developed characters.
p435
aVPossibly the rather characterless leads work to the movie's advantage, since no one going to see a dazzling special effects movie needs distracting by a tame scientist's view of very untamed monsters.
p436
aVNot surprisingly, the sound and the computer-generated visuals received Oscars.
p437
aVDaydreaming farm boy Luke Skywalker (Hamill) longs for a life of adventure and finds it when two droids, one carrying a distress signal from the beautiful Princess Leia, turn up on his farm.
p438
aVSeeking out "crazy old wizard" Ben 'Obi-Wan' Kenobi (Guiness), Luke embarks on his quest to rescue Leia, enlisting the help of cynical Corellian space pirate Han Solo (Ford), his Wookie co-pilot Chewbacca (Mayhew) and the Millennium Falcon ("the ship that made the Kessel run in less than 12 parsecs") along the way.
p439
aVMade on a relatively low budget ($11m), Star Wars (or Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope to give it its full franchise title) is a relentlessly inventive film.
p440
aVThe attention to minute details gives it a rich texture; there are some fantastic set-pieces (Leia's rescue from the Death Star, the X-Wing dogfights), and Lucas binds the whole film together with a hokey religion (The Force) and fatalistic story lifted from Greek mythology.
p441
aVWhile Ford famously dismissed the script (complaining that, "You can type this shit, but you can't say it"), Lucas manages to get away with it by making everyone take it seriously - although Ford can often be seen smirking his way through some of the more clunky lines.
p442
aVThen there's the rousing score by John Williams.\u000a																
p443
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000aOr rent other films that stand the test of time now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aCameron came to this low-budget science fiction movie with a single directorial credit to his name, the silly exploitation film Piranha II: The Spawning.
p444
aVThe best that Schwarzenegger could boast from his screen career was a touching turn in Stay Hungry and an attention-grabbing appearance in the body-building documentary Pumping Iron.
p445
aVBoth would go on to bigger things, but none that would equal the imagination or vigour of this frenetic thriller.
p446
aVAlready Cameron's favourite themes are evident in this taut, economical tale of the duel between a killer robot (Schwarzenegger) and his human nemesis, Reese (Biehn), over Sarah Connor, the woman (Hamilton) whose unborn child will in the 21st century save humanity by destroying the machines that have taken over the world.
p447
aVIn Cameron's films it is always the women who are the natural leaders, the survivors.
p448
aVAlso, from a director who is famously in love with technology, the film is obsessively technophobic.
p449
aVThe secret of its success is certainly not in its originality - science fiction author Harlan Ellison threatened legal action until he was awarded a writing credit - but lies in its relentless energy, and Schwarzenegger himself as the taciturn monster, who in the course of the action delivers fewer than 100 words of dialogue.
p450
aVCrisco, a colourless, unctuously smooth brand of vegetable shortening that's a mainstay in kitchens across the United States, is a true wonder product - as useful for removing eye bags as it is for crisping up fried chicken.
p451
aVSo we are told in one scene of The Help, actor-turned-director Tate Taylor's blandly enjoyable adaptation of Kathryn Stockett's Civil Rights-themed bestseller, and there's little reason to doubt this endorsement: the entire film appears to have been made of the stuff.
p452
aVAs lily-white a tale of the black experience as could imaginably be put to screen in the 21st century, Taylor's polished period piece raises something of an if-a-tree-falls-in-the-forest question: if the story of the publication of a landmark book, one that changed attitudes to race relations in an especially bigoted corner of the Deep South, never really happened, what does it ultimately signify?
p453
aVIf the film inevitably inherits the unearned self-importance of Stockett's novel, however, it remains a hearty and stirring fiction, its over-ironed social and moral landscape lent feeling and texture by a busily stranded narrative and some empathetic performances that elegantly separate the human truths from the screenplay's homilies.
p454
aVChief among these is Viola Davis, deservedly a dead cert for Oscar recognition in 2012: as written, the relentlessly stoic, noble Aibileen should be a scarcely penetrable stereotype, yet she becomes bruised flesh and blood through Davis's rich line readings and creased body language.
p455
aVThe rest of the ensemble is a mixed bag, ranging from the wonderful Jessica Chastain, as a guilelessly liberal trophy wife, to the overly panto-ready Bryce Dallas Howard, as the queen bee of the oppressors - with a disappointingly de-amped Emma Stone, as our mostly symbolic protagonist, somewhere in between.
p456
aVIf you find your eyes getting annoyingly moist at points of this airbrushed but effective heartwarmer, give the bulk of the credit (or blame) to Davis, and try a little Crisco.
p457
aVIn lieu of waiting around forever for Mr Right, single 30-something Zoe (Jennifer Lopez) has IVF treatment in order to have a baby.
p458
aVBut when she meets the possible man of her dreams on the way out of the clinic, can they fit a relationship around her burgeoning bump?
p459
aVThe Back-up Plan is one of those rom-coms that claims to grapple with the issues facing the modern woman.
p460
aVDespite being marketed at a broad mainstream audience, it's hard to believe that successful single career women having IVF in order to become a one parent family is a situation that resonates with very many women, even today.
p461
aVMinority topic or not, it's a subject that arguably merits exploration, perhaps in a drama, or over the span of time afforded by a television series - but not much about it screams 'J-Lo comedy vehicle'.
p462
aVOf course, we and Miss Lopez are not really here to explore the issues - The Back-up plan is simply an excuse to gamely stake out a succession of weak jokes on the groundbreaking new comic territory of pregnant women's hormones, their insatiable cravings and, horror of horrors, not fitting into their old clothes (stop the hilarity, you're killing me).
p463
aVThe first half hour, in which we meet Zoe, Zoe's faintly irritating friends, and come to terms with the fact that she has a disabled dog as a comic foil, feels like a pilot for a sit-com.
p464
aVThe remainder of the 110 minute run-time feels like the other episodes in that hypothetical series compressed into an unending, unendurable laugh-free soap opera.
p465
aVIt's a film that raises the larger question of why we're seeing vehicles for high profile female stars, written by women, that nevertheless manage to be intensely patronising towards women (see also:The Bounty Hunter, Motherhood).
p466
aVPerhaps changes are made to the scripts by studios, or perhaps the writers themselves have sold out.
p467
aVSome commentators saw Kathryn Bigelow's victory as the first female director to win a Best Director Oscar as a hollow one, given her CV is dominated by films involving predominantly male characters, but if it means she can avoid directing cynical female-focussed clap-trap like The Back-up Plan, we can only endorse her approach.\u000a																
p468
aVIn Stanley Kubrick's Gothic chiller aspiring-writer Jack Torrance (Nicholson) accepts a job as a caretaker at the Overlook Hotel during an icy Oregon winter so he can write his book.
p469
aVBut the hotel has a macabre history that soon begins to worm its way into the present through the medium of his psychic son, Danny (Lloyd).
p470
aVElegantly disturbing images ensue as Jack's writer's block gives way to derangment and his son sensitivity to the paranormal peels back the layers of history.Unlike horror films which identify the terror externally - as a monster or pursuing entity - The Shining locates the horror firmly within the family.
p471
aVThe threat of violence within the domestic space is somehow even scarier than the Grand Guignol of the ghosts in the ballroom and blood in the bath.
p472
aVAs always, Kubrick dwells on the stylistic details, the use of steady-cam, and grand location and the cinematography, and the film is drenched with atmosphere.
p473
aVShelley Duvall contorts and screams up a stunning display of gruesome fear as Jack's terrified wife, Wendy.
p474
aVAnd Jack Nicholson's performance is, of course, unforgettably deranged.
p475
aVThere has never been an adequate explanation as to why this superb gangster epic didn't win 1990's Best Picture Academy Award.
p476
aVAnd why a film featuring 20 minutes of buffaloes stampeding and Kevin Costner with a 'tache (Dances With Wolves) was considered more worthy than one that featured Joe Pesci's memorable "How the fuck am I funny?"
p477
aVtirade is anyone's guess.
p478
aVGlaring goofs by the Academy aside, GoodFellas is one of the best gangster movies ever.
p479
aVThe tale of 30 years of life in the Mob, as seen through the eyes of real-life gangster Henry Hill (Ray Liotta), was based on Nicholas Pileggi's gripping book (which he and Martin Scorsese adapted for the screen) and directed with skill by Scorsese.
p480
aVThere are so many things about this movie that are great - the casting of Robert De Niro as Hill's mentor and Pesci (who won an Oscar) as the psychotic Tommy, that infamous tracking shot as Henry and his date (Lorraine Bracco) walk into the Copacabana restaurant, the soundtrack featuring everything from Tony Bennett to The Who - it's no real surprise that the movie regularly appears on critics' Top Ten lists.
p481
aVGripping, beautifully written, brilliantly directed, funny and tragic all in one - it certainly deserves to be right up there.
p482
aVFans of the cinema of Walter Salles (Central Station) will have had a cinematic initiation into the reality of Brazil's poor communities.
p483
aVBut where only half of the action in Midnight, the 1998 film co-directed by Salles, took viewers into the favelas (slums) of Rio De Janeiro, City Of God (which Salles co-produced) never leaves them.
p484
aVIt's entire narrative is saturated with the desperation and violence of Brazil's disenfranchised underclass.
p485
aVBetween 1986 and 1996, writer Paolo Lins researched the drug trade within the ironically named Cidade De Dues (City Of God), a 1960s housing project where he grew up.
p486
aVThe novel, and the fact it was based in, was potent raw material for a film.
p487
aVScreenwriter Bráulio Mantovani, director Fernando Meirelles and co-director Katia Lund have done a remarkable job of bringing this marginalised history and culture of violence to the screen.
p488
aVMeirelles talks of "a movie which was true to the book: filmed from the inside of the favela out."
p489
aVTo achieve this fidelity, the filmmakers auditioned 2,000 kids from the favelas, took 200 on to acting workshops, then improvised the scenes, free of marks, continuity control or any of the formal filmmaking strictures.
p490
aVAlthough the subject of the film is Cidade De Dues itself, the narrative is structured around Rocket, or Buscapé in the Portuguese (played by Luis Otavio as a kid in the 1960s, by Alexandre Rodrigues in the film's 1970s and 1980s segments).
p491
aVA 1960s slum kid, he observes his friends and peers opting for the gun-obsessed life of crime.
p492
aVAs young Li'l Dice, or Dadinho, (Douglas Silva) says, "We need to rob some rich guy's house, it's the only way out of here."
p493
aVRocket, however, hangs back from the endemic violence the other kids accept so readily.
p494
aVAs his older brother tells him shortly before being shot dead by Li'l Dice, "I'm a hood 'cos I've got no brain.
p495
aVBut you're smart.
p496
aVYou should study."
p497
aVDespite the lack of opportunities, Rocket aspires to be a photographer.
p498
aVIn the 1970s, Li'l Dice has become Li'l Zé (Leandro Firmino Da Hora), a remorseless hood who kills his way to the top of the heap by murdering all the drug gang leaders ("At 18, he was the most respected hood in Rio De Janero").
p499
aVAlthough Rocket wants to avenge his brother, he also wants to stay out of trouble.
p500
aVAmazingly, his career as a journalist is kicked off by accident when Zé forces him to photograph him and his gang armed to the teeth and the picture ends up on the front of the paper.
p501
aVZé's violent aspirations are spinning out of control, and when he rapes the girlfriend of bus-fare collector and ex-soldier Knockout Ned (Jorge), and kills his brother and uncle, the previously peaceable Ned joins up with gangster Carrot (Matheus Nachtergaele) and goes on the warpath.
p502
aVEvery act of vengeance generates another however, and soon the favela is a war-zone.
p503
aVWith its epic, three time period story of young men making their way, violently, in a life of crime, City Of God is like a Brazilian underclass GoodFellas.
p504
aVBut with its quintessential new-Latin-cinema energy, dynamic shooting style and complex structure of interconnected stories, it's also comparable to the Mexican Amores Perros.
p505
aVAlthough the film is too heavily reliant on voice-over from Rocket ("The ghetto had been a purgatory, now it was a hell"), otherwise it is a fascinating, powerful film, full up with angry power about the disgraceful state of Brazil urban poverty, and how it simply creates a culture of desperate greed and cyclical violence.
p506
aV\u000aWith the second instalment of the Mafia trilogy, Francis Ford Coppola  weaves the characters from The Godfather into a deeply personal film  that betters the original for pathos and sheer epic grandeur.
p507
aVThe film follows Michael Corleone (Al Pacino) as he attempts to consolidate his power and achieve respectability as the new head of the Corleone crime family.
p508
aVHowever, the strains of a government investigation and an assassination attempt on his life begin to fracture his world.
p509
aVThis sequel focuses on Michael's relationship with his nervous brother Fredo (John Cazale).
p510
aVMichael knows Fredo was involved in the assassination plot and Coppola adds depth to our understanding of this conflict (and its consequences) by telling Michael's story in tandem with that of the young Vito Corleone (Robert De Niro).
p511
aVFrom Vito escaping Sicily as a boy to the humble origins of the Corleone family in America, these scenes show the traditions and codes of honour that Michael has gradually lost sight of as an adult.
p512
aV"If anything in this life is certain, it's that we can kill anyone," he says at one point.
p513
aVHe's talking about his enemy, Hyman Roth (Lee Strasberg), but really he's justifying in his own mind his plan to kill Fredo.
p514
aVAmid the sumptuous set-pieces and bombastic scenes that have rightly become a part of cinema history, it's a subtle moment, indicating the extent to which Michael has abandoned the values instilled in him by his father.
p515
aVNever go against the family, was Marlon Brando's mantra in the original.
p516
aVBut by killing Fredo, fighting with his wife (Diane Keaton) and freezing out half-brother Tom Hagan (Robert Duvall), Michael does just that.
p517
aVThe final shot of Pacino, alone and reflective, is one of a man in purgatory.
p518
aVThis is beautiful and haunting stuff.
p519
aVIn a nutshell: A multi-generational epic that never leaves the audience less than enthralled, this is the godfather of all gangster films.\u000a\u000a
p520
aVA bittersweet, autobiographical romantic comedy, Annie Hall is the quintessential Woody Allen movie, featuring all the themes - love, relationships, neuroses, fame, guilt, pessimism, his love of New York (and dislike of LA), death and life - that we have come to expect from the man whose writing and directing career has spanned more than three decades.
p521
aVComedian Alvy Singer (Allen playing, well, Allen) relates his failed love affair with Annie (Diane Keaton), interspersing the story with asides about his two failed marriages and his Brooklyn childhood.
p522
aVKeaton changed the way a generation talked and dressed (can we ever forgive her for the manly suits and that annoying hat?)
p523
aVwith her portrayal of ditsy Annie, but it is Allen's observant and funny one-liners that remain in your head ('don't knock masturbation, it's sex with someone I love') well after the credits have rolled.
p524
aVBoth warm and witty, this is also notable for some future stars popping up in minor roles: watch for Jeff Goldblum (who gets to mutter 'I forgot my mantra!
p525
aV'), former Charlie's Angel Shelley Hack, and, at the end of the movie, Sigourney Weaver as Alvy's date.
p526
aVAs 20-year-old Shino (Kawaguchi) is first harassed, then threatened with a knife, bound with rope and sexually molested by drunken Eisuke (Sato) in the house where she works as maid, she does not scream and seems strangely resigned to her fate - even when Eisuke, passing a mirror, declares his murderous intentions with the words: "This'll be our last reflection together."
p527
aVEisuke is mistaken.
p528
aVInterrupted in his assault on Shino, he instead rapes and murders the mistress of the house before fleeing into the daylight and Shino lives to see another day.
p529
aVIn fact Shino knows Eisuke well from her past, and immediately writes to his wife, the schoolteacher Matsuko (Koyama), to denounce Eisuke's crimes - but both women choose to withhold the true identity of the serial 'phantom killer' from the investigating police inspector (Watanabe), even as more violent crimes are committed.
p530
aVA mosaic of flashbacks offers a long 'reflection' on the ties that bind together Shino, Eisuke, Matsuko and the suicide of Genji (Toura), all from the same Shinshu village, and each embodying the extremes of a nation's idealism and disillusionment, humanity and bestiality, death and survival.
p531
aVAs Eisuke continues his compulsive onslaught through the cities of Japan, it emerges that Shino and Matsuko are themselves trapped in their own repeating cycles of complicity, guilt and despair, all going back to the catastrophic collapse, several years earlier, of a collective farm on which the four had worked together.
p532
aVIf Nagisa Oshima's Night And Fog In Japan (1960), with its jaundiced view of progress, showed the first ripples of the Japanese New Wave, then the similarly themed Violence At High Noon, made just six years later, was a veritable tsunami of innovations in cinematic expression.
p533
aVBoth films feature state-of-the-nation plots that unravel through a complicated series of flashbacks and repetitions, and both films deal with political disillusionment and the eternal return of the past.
p534
aVBut where Night And Fog was dominated by the sort of long sequence shots that typified the classical cinema of Mizoguchi or Ozu, the narrative of Violence At High Noon is slashed and fractured, whether through the compulsive restlessness of Keiichi Uraoka's editing or the delirious mobility of Akira Takada's Cinemascope camerawork.
p535
aVIt is as though Eisuke's neurotic tension has infected the whole world, in a film that is dissecting the pathology of a nation as much as of any individual.
p536
aVCruel, drunken Eisuke holds up a mirror to the aggression, rapacity, misogyny and inhumanity within a society still coming to terms with both its brutal wartime conduct and its rapid post-war transition to Western-style capitalism (with all of the political compromise that such a transition entails) - and it is a mirror in which Shino, Matsuko and Eisuke all see themselves uncomfortably reflected.
p537
aVIf the past and present look bleak in Violence At High Noon, there is not much more hope for the future either.
p538
aVShino, the youngest member of the original collective farm, is last seen literally biting through a rope that binds her to another character as though she were cutting an umbilical cord - but her earlier attempts to be 'reborn' and to sever her links to the past have all ended up bringing her right back to where she started, leading her at one point to declare, "I'll never be free".
p539
aVThe best that can be said for her prospects is that she is a natural survivor (several times over).Meanwhile the next generation, as embodied by Matsuko's young school pupils, may well turn out to be just like Eisuke (who after all was himself once a pupil of Matsuko's), and they are last glimpsed standing confused in the middle of an imposing modern city where a distraught Matsuko has suddenly abandoned them with the words, "I wish you all good luck."
p540
aVOshima's film is mostly set, as its title implies, in broad daylight, but there is little brightness to be found in its message about a Japan that moves swiftly forwards but never really changes.
p541
aVViolence At High Noon may be based loosely on the real-life case of a serial rapist and murderer who was protected by his own wife and a surviving victim, but it no more resembles a conventional psychothriller than Shohei Imamura's similarly reality-based Vengeance Is Mine (1979) would a decade later.
p542
aVAny police procedural takes place entirely at the film's periphery, with the focus very much on the two women who must (and yet cannot) resolve their ambivalent feelings towards a violent criminal, and towards a past that binds them.
p543
aVIt might almost be a melodrama, save for all the political allegory, as Oshima asks how a seemingly civilised society can create and knowingly harbour a monster within.
p544
aVThe high contrast black-and-white photography looks incredible, the performances (especially Sato's menacing swagger) are excellent - but where the film will fall down, at least for today's audiences, is in the inscrutability of its characters' motivations.
p545
aVAt various points, both Shino and Matsuko declare that no one will understand the way they feel, and many viewers will be left in perplexed agreement.
p546
aVAs an exercise in New Wave stylings, Violence At High Noon is impeccable, but as an engaging, cogent story, it falls short.
p547
aVPerhaps that is inevitable in a film whose principal themes are alienation, disorientation and endless diabolical repetition.
p548
aVDirector Mary Harron (I Shot Andy Warhol) seems to press all the right buttons for this film based on Easton Ellis's fabulous but genuinely horrifying book.
p549
aVBriton Christian Bale is perfectly cast as Patrick Bateman, the titular anti-hero, a 1980s Wall Street yuppie whose self-obsession rings painfully true.
p550
aVHe's exquistely dressed and buffed to perfection, his appearance representing his values.
p551
aVWell, superficially.
p552
aVWhen he dons an apron and selects a large kitchen knife his inner identity comes to the fore.
p553
aVWhere the novel was exquisitely sick, the film version necessarily skips over Bateman's more creative ways of dispatching his victims, and his fantasies.
p554
aVArguably, this glosses over Ellis' finer points.
p555
aVHarron, who also co-scripted with Guinevere Turner, instead incorporates a fine element of slapstick in lieu of Ellis' more literal stomanch-churning descriptions (so no face-drilling; instead we're treated to the sight of Bale chasing a victim with a chainsaw).
p556
aVPlus, there's the running joke of Bateman admitting to his proclivities in conversation - but as everyone is equally self obsessed, they don't listen and no one hears ("I'm into murders and executions" he declares of his professional concerns).
p557
aVA glimpse of the book's more elaborate satire also shines, though.
p558
aVBateman's lecture on the superiority of Genesis with Phil Collins as opposed to Peter Gabriel is enough to make anyone scream in absolute terror.
p559
aVDaniel Day-Lewis turns in yet another killer performance, this time as petty thief Gerry Conlon, whose appearance in the wrong place at the wrong time led to him being implicated in the Guildford Four bombings and being thrown in jail, along with his similarly innocent father (Pete Postlethwaite).
p560
aVEmma Thompson is equally fine as the lawyer who spent more than a decade trying to prove the pair's lack of involvement, while director Sheridan chronicles the father-son relationship perfectly and also handles the courtroom confrontations skilfully without ever falling into movie melodramatics.
p561
aVPostlethwaite's Oscar nomination turned him from jobbing actor into ubiquitous supporting player.
p562
aV\u000aDie Hard makes no pretence to be anything other than constant shoot-'em-up entertainment, and is all the better for it.
p563
aVBruce Willis is a New York cop trying to get back with his estranged wife Bedelia, who's a high-flying executive in a newly acquired Japanese company.
p564
aVAs the script would have it, foul terrorists led by the camp and oh-so-evil Hans Gruber (Alan Rickman in a remarkable debut) storm the company Christmas party and it's up to Willis to dispatch the baddies and rescue his wife.
p565
aVThe marriage of Willis and director McTiernan is golden - they both understand that what an audience wants to see is a hero do lots of shooting and fighting and never be at a loss for a zinging one-liner.
p566
aVAnd if anything on the set hasn't moved for three minutes, then it's just begging to be blown up, so boom, there it goes.\u000a \u000a
p567
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aWinning kids over with its cartoonishness, adults with its wittiness, and stoned college students with its absurdness, Sponge Out of Water is an animated Monty Python movie you can take the whole family to.
p568
aVWith absolutely no interest in teaching morals or life lessons with a straight face, the film stays true to the essence of the Spongebob phenomenon: delivering pure laughs in every surreal, bonkers way it can.
p569
aVA brief description of the plot will give you a taste of the lunacy on offer: Bikini Bottom literally jump-cuts into chaos when the Krabby Patty formula goes missing.
p570
aVThe town\u2019s only hope is Spongebob, Plankton, and a time machine made from a photo-booth and day-old nachos.
p571
aVThat\u2019s the tip of this insanity iceberg, one that is filled with an impressive variety of jokes that span from delightfully childish visual gags to oddball one-liners (\u201cWelcome to the apocalypse; I hope you like leather\u201d).
p572
aVThere\u2019s even a sugar-coated reference to Stanley Kubrick\u2019s The Shining.
p573
aVThe animators have done a flawless job with the \u201cout of water\u201d leap from 2D to 3D, though it only makes up 15 minutes of the film.
p574
aVHowever, keeping human interaction to a minimum prevents it from feeling too distant from the \u2018bob world we love (an effect I call \u2018Smurfing it up\u2019).
p575
aVThe only jokes that flop with a thud are the ones that recycle material used in the series.
p576
aVThe biggest offender is a tame musical number where Spongebob teaches Plankton about teamwork, which is nowhere near as F.U.N.
p577
aVas the original song.
p578
aVBut this is merely one of a few dud bullets coming from a movie that duel-wields machine guns loaded with gags.
p579
aV\u2018The Spongebob Movie: Sponge Out of Water\u2019 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p580
aVThis is the kind of review where what we really need is a flowchart.
p581
aVHave you seen John Carpenters 1982 The Thing?
p582
aVNo?
p583
aVProceed directly to paragraph two.
p584
aVYou have?
p585
aVOk, so heres the deal.
p586
aVThis film is a sort-of prequel, sort-of remake, sort-of inspired-by beastie that borrows many of the 1982 versions aesthetic choices and basic conceits.
p587
aVJust as the monster of the title takes a unique organic original and seeks to replicate it sufficiently well that it can pass as the same type of thing in the eyes of the unwary, so this remake is both The Thing, and also not The Thing, but a deceptive copy.
p588
aVTaken on its own terms, this film provides some reasonably effective monster movie fun.
p589
aVIf you have a friend who jumps easily at horror movies, theyll be jumping at several points here.
p590
aV(Whether these jumps are all earned by the filmmakers, or more a result of suddenly ramping the volume up on a sudden visual cue is a question for more seasoned horror hounds.)
p591
aVThe filmmakers also introduce a language barrier between various characters, further exacerbating the paranoia and tension that is a hallmark of any isolated who-dunnit.
p592
aVOr in this case, who-is-it.
p593
aVUltimately what lets the 2011 incarnation of The Thing down somewhat is its state-of-the-art effects.
p594
aVWhich is ironic, when you consider that the practical latex and corn-syrup effects are one of the crowning joys of the 1982 version created almost 30 years ago.
p595
aVIts de rigeur amongst film critics to carp about CGI, but here, some moaning is justified, precisely because they use CGI very effectively in some scenes, but ridiculously in others.
p596
aVThere are moments in this film that represent the best of what CGI can accomplish and others where the sense that youre looking at a computer image overwhelms what should be the horror of the situation.
p597
aVThis team know how to do good CGI, why cant they tell the difference?
p598
aV\u000a\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aPrequels really get to me sometimes.
p599
aVGenerally speaking, I don\u2019t like them.
p600
aVThe 2011 version of \u201cThe Thing\u201d is a bit of an exception.
p601
aVNothing will ever replace the awe and horror of 1982\u2019s \u201cThe Thing\u201d by John Carpenter.
p602
aVThe special effects were state-of-the-art in the early 1980\u2019s, making a huge impression on me at the time.
p603
aVThe 2011 prequel has much more impressive effects, but the story had only one place to go, and that\u2019s to the beginning of 1982 story.
p604
aVIn other words, diehard Carpenter fans know how this all must end.
p605
aVBut, true horror afficionados can enjoy a good blood-letting all the same.
p606
aVThis new version has decent creature effects and moderately sympathetic characters.
p607
aVAnyway, a team of Norwegian and American scientists discover an alien spacecraft deep in the ice of Antarctica.
p608
aVThey also discover the remains of an alien near the ship.
p609
aVIt\u2019s the biological aspect of this dig that fascinates them.
p610
aVAmong the Americans is Kate Lloyd (Mary Elizabeth Winstead) who warns against working too fast to examine the frozen remains.
p611
aVOf course, she\u2019s ignored and all hell breaks loose.
p612
aVHey, she had to be ignored or this would have been nothing more than a boring science project.
p613
aVInstead, the creature comes alive and is really pissed off.
p614
aVOh, yes.
p615
aVThere will be blood.
p616
aVThe creature attacks by absorbing its victims and then replicates them into something that\u2019s not quite human.
p617
aVLike the Carpenter film, the question becomes \u201cwho is human and who wants to make breakfast out of your brain?\u201d\u000a\u201cThe Thing\u201d is not half as good as the Carpenter film, but it has enough shocks and scares to keep you interested.
p618
aVAnd, if you see it first, then at least you have the back story for viewing the 1982 classic.
p619
aVGore is good.
p620
aVGrade: B-\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p621
aV\u000aAs a concept, Avengers Assemble was a huge creative gamble and potential disaster.
p622
aVMultiple characters drawn together from multiple films, each with their own fairly specific vibe and an A-list actor to boot?
p623
aVSurely it couldn\u2019t be anything other than a frustrating patchwork of egos competing for screentime?
p624
aVLuckily, Marvel entrusted this particular roll of the dice to Joss Whedon, a writer-director known for his deft handling of character and his ability to judge exactly when to undercut pomp with humour and when to bring on the emotion, developed while overseeing several hundred hours of ensemble-based supernatural television.
p625
aVWhedon\u2019s Avengers Assemble is almost improbably good, considering the possible pitfalls.
p626
aVEnjoyable enough in terms of sheer adrenaline, where it really comes into its own is in how satisfying the whole thing is emotionally.
p627
aVIt\u2019s such a huge relief as a cinemagoer to be able to revel in a film like this without having to switch off your brain or check your critical faculties at the door (or worse, being told that disliking - say - a Transformers movie is somehow a failing on your part, because you didn\u2019t dumb yourself down enough in advance before watching, and what did you expect?).
p628
aVIn contrast, if you watch Avengers without your brain engaged, you\u2019ll still have a pretty good time, but you\u2019ll also miss out, since this is filmmaking as smart as it is colourful and exciting.
p629
aVSmart yes, dark, no - Avengers Assemble is also bright and funny, skilfully sidestepping the nihilism fallacy, which seeks to suggest comic book movies are somehow more valid when they\u2019re \u201cdark\u201d.
p630
aVIf Avengers Assemble has a weakness, it lies not with any of the principals, but with what they\u2019re up against.
p631
aVTom Hiddleston as Loki is of course absurdly brilliant, bringing the King Lear b-plot of embittered illegitimate sibling sharply into focus, giving Thor a personal angle on an earthbound conflict from which he might otherwise have felt distanced - what with being a god from another world and all.
p632
aVIt\u2019s just a slight shame the MacGuffin Loki has to work with is a magical space cube that threatens to unleash forgettable hordes of reptilian chaps visually recalling Doctor Who\u2019s Silurians.
p633
aVOh well.
p634
aVIt\u2019s not like we really recall the individual mooks The Joker unleashed against Batman, either.
p635
aVAnd it\u2019s certainly refreshing to find the focus here firmly on the heroes, in a genre which is always in danger of being seduced by the villains.
p636
aVYou certainly can\u2019t accuse the lizard chaps of glamorizing the way of the mook.\u000a \u000a
p637
aVQuite how Warner Bros lit on the decision to entrust the making of The Avengers to director Chechik is a mystery.
p638
aVAfter all, with such gems as Diabolique and National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation under his belt, it was almost a foregone conclusion that he would stink up - big time.
p639
aVThurman as Emma Peel is way off the money, never once capturing the essence of Emma (haughty and snobbish is not cool and calm).
p640
aVFiennes is even wider of the mark, turning debonair Steed into a pompous, buttoned-up prig.
p641
aVSensitive fable about Victorian England's most renowned "freak" from David Lynch.
p642
aVBlack and white widescreen provides a sumptuous backdrop to excellent turns from a youthful Anthony Hopkins and an unrecognisable John Hurt.
p643
aVIn unsympathetic Victorian England, John Merrick (Hurt) has been abused since childhood and forced into a freakshow because of his appalling deformity.
p644
aVFrederick Treves (Hopkins), a surgeon at the London Hospital, removes Merrick from the dingy sideshow and treats his bronchitis.
p645
aVAlthough Treves initially thinks - hopes - Merrick is no more than an imbecile and exhibits him to his fellow doctors, he is essentially a more humane keeper than Bytes (Jones), the drunk who had presented Merrick in the freakshow.
p646
aVPosh London society replaces the sideshow punters, and Merrick is essentially still on display.
p647
aVThis worsens when the hosptial night porter (Elphick) starts showing Merrick off to his drunken pub mates by night.
p648
aVHowever, while Merrick is in the care of Treves, he is treated well, both physically and psychologically, and reveals a sensitivity and intelligence that had been missed by those who do not see beyond appearances.
p649
aVHe even experiences friendship and respect.
p650
aVDavid Lynch's The Elephant Man raises myriad questions about medicine, the notion of vainglory and society's prejudices and asks us to wonder whether, over a century later, matters have improved.
p651
aVWhat astonishes most is the compassion of Lynch's direction, something not echoed widely in his other films.
p652
aVThe greatest contribution - apart from the central performances - comes from Francis, whose wonderful black and white, widescreen photography lends atmosphere and clarity to the proceedings.
p653
aV\u000aWhether your image of jazz is gleaned from Derek 'Spinal Tap' Smalls and his endless, aimless "jazz odyssey" or it brings to mind the cringeworthy blackface of Neil Diamond in The Jazz Singer, it's probably fair to say that the musical genre doesn't translate particularly well to film.
p654
aVWhiplash is different, because in Damien Chazelle's breakneck drummer drama, the music itself is almost incidental.
p655
aVIt's a near flawless movie about the human condition and our drive for perfection: the obsession in question \u2013 jazz drumming \u2013 is unimportant.
p656
aVThankfully, it just so happens that the soundtrack is tremendous, whether you enjoy jazz or merely tolerate it from the other side of walls.
p657
aVWe open on a long shot of college kid Andrew Neyman (Miles Teller), playing drums to an audience of one.
p658
aVAs Chazelle's camera slowly draws down the corridor, we can see the look of determination on Andrew's face, the speed of his reactions, the sweat on his brow.
p659
aVNeyman's audience doubles thanks to the appearance of near-mythical jazz teacher Fletcher (JK Simmons), and even though he's nonchalantly chewed out with roughly the same manners a dog affords a slipper, our young protagonist is flushed with reason anew to bang those drums.
p660
aVThere on in, Chazelle gives an insight into what it means to want something so bad you're willing to be pushed to the brink of insanity to get it.
p661
aVWhiplash is decked with outstanding performances from both Teller and Simmons.
p662
aVTeller starts the movie playing a lump of clay and ends it as if carved out of stone, literally shedding blood, sweat and tears in the transformation.
p663
aVIt feels like a watershed role for Teller, so far dramatically untested by the likes of Footloose and Zac Efron romantic comedies, but utterly lost in craft here; you feel every ounce of determination shared between actor and character.
p664
aVConversely, Simmons creates a memorable menace with minimal effort; a monstrous motivator not above trying to decapitate his students if they're unable to keep pace ("There are no two words in the English language more harmful than 'good job'," he growls).
p665
aVThe movie doesn't work without heat between teacher and student, but Teller and Simmons strike fire \u2013 they make for an abusive relationship but hell if they don't make beautiful music together.
p666
aVAnd oh, that music \u2013 sublime soul music custom-built to get you moving.
p667
aVHere's a trick: when watching Whiplash with a friend who claims to hate jazz, glance down at their feet and I guarantee that come the movie's triumphant final scene \u2013 the cinematic equivalent of punching the air \u2013 said friend will be spasmodically tapping their feet to something approaching the beat.
p668
aVEven those allergic to turbo-charged tempos will find something to love: with drama taut as a drum and a head-on collision of two unflinching performances, Whiplash is car-crash cinema of the most wonderful kind.
p669
aVIn a nutshell: Judged on its own merits, Whiplash is superb: slick, authentic and infectious.
p670
aVFactor in a first-time director who's under 30 and it's an achievement that borders on the obscene.
p671
aVBy Ali Gray\u000a
p672
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aAs a stress-inducing exercise in cinematic asphyxiation, Whiplash is this year\u2019s Gravity.
p673
aVWhere Alfonso Cuarón\u2019s film placed an astronaut into merciless space, writer-director Damien Chazelle chucks 19-year-old jazz drummer Andrew (Miles Teller) into the merciless grasp of a brutal music instructor (JK Simmons).
p674
aVAnd just like Gravity, Whiplash is bound for Oscars.
p675
aVTeller\u2019s performance transcends his previous roles, infusing Andrew with natural innocence slowly warped by a necessary arrogance as he seeks to \u201cbe the best\u201d.
p676
aVThis passion drives him, but also traps him in the torturous tutelage of Fletcher, played by the brilliantly frightening Simmons.
p677
aVAndrew wants to please Fletcher, but Fletcher keeps the bar drastically out of reach by implementing physical and psychological cruelty that is not only sickening, it\u2019s calculated \u2013 a method he\u2019s refined to an abusive art-form.
p678
aVThe tension comes from how far Andrew is willing to stretch himself to get to that impossible bar, and whether or not he\u2019ll snap in the process.
p679
aVAdding elements of claustrophobia to Fletcher\u2019s fearful classroom, Chazelle confines his shots to confronting close-ups and superb macro-photography of sweat-covered cymbals and Andrew\u2019s bleeding hands.
p680
aVOutside of practice, the filmmaking simplifies, creating a contrasting sense of ease.
p681
aVA rigid subset of audiences may not accept the plausibility of the scenarios (again, like Gravity), but those who submit to the film will be treated to a masterful finale that stills the lungs and silences the mind.
p682
aVAt its last beat of the drum, Whiplash allows you to exhale, only to force you into another quandary: do you applaud in admiration or quiver in horror?
p683
aV\u2018Whiplash\u2019 plays nationwide Thursday, October 23\u000a\u000a
p684
aV\u000aThe wisdom of shooting all three The Lord Of The Rings films back-to-back becomes immediately apparent as you settle into The Two Towers.
p685
aVThe continuity is so smooth you could be picking up a book you put aside a year earlier.
p686
aVOn the return to Middle-earth, we find it darker, heavier, with a plot that forks along three paths, and as such is more satisfying than the linear fight-march-fight-march of The Fellowship Of The Ring.
p687
aVOn their quest to Mordor, hobbits Frodo (Elijah Wood) and Sam (Sean Astin) encounter the stinking Gollum (Andy Serkis), whose soul has been twisted and divided by the malign aura of the Ring.
p688
aVThe tale demands and gets a substantial performance from this new character, conjured out of CGI and voiced superbly by Serkis (who also performed the role on set as a guide for the animators).
p689
aVMeanwhile, Aragorn (Viggo Mortensen), Legolas the elf (Orlando Bloom) and Gimli the dwarf (John Rhys-Davies) are helping the people of Rohan prepare for an assault by the forces of evil wizard Saruman (Christopher Lee).
p690
aVHaving just escaped their Uruk-hai captors, the third part of the fellowship, Merry (Dominic Monaghan) and Pippin (Billy Boyd), hang out up an ancient living tree, called Treebeard (voiced by Rhys-Davies).
p691
aVOut of these three strands, it is the troubles of Rohan that dominate our attention, as King Théoden (Bernard Hill) moves his people to the mountain fortress of Helm's Deep, where soon over 10,000 of Saruman's monstrous Uruk-hai warriors and other hideous Orcs will lay siege, providing the epic battle that closes the film.
p692
aVWhile many contemporary blockbusters leave a stink in your skull, as if an entire marketing department has dumped in your brain, The Lord Of The Rings films have been crafted by Peter Jackson as works of integrity that deepen as they unfold.
p693
aVThe Fellowship Of The Ring was impressive, but it could not be accused of profundity.
p694
aVThe Two Towers is genuinely moving, however.
p695
aVThe courage of King Théoden and his followers in the battle of Helm's Deep, the women and children cowering in the caves as the Uruks stamp and bellow outside, will swell your tear ducts.
p696
aVJackson has also added welcome comic moments to this dark tale, most of them coming from dwarf Gimli, who at one point has to be tossed into battle.
p697
aVHis repartee with elf Legolas is warming up nicely; having run for three days and three nights in pursuit of the Uruk-hai who have taken Merry and Pippin, he mutters "Dwarves are wasted on cross-country, we're natural sprinters you know".
p698
aVAlso, the Orcs have now got cockney accents, a great touch.
p699
aVAlso, where Fellowship Of The Ring was glorious but felt strangely irrelevant, sealed off in its own little world, The Two Towers connects with the present day, and not merely because of its unfortunate title.
p700
aVTolkien's concerns with industrialisation sweeping away the old rural life are also more apparent here.
p701
aVSaruman says "the old world shall burn in the fire of industry".
p702
aVAlso, the tree people, the ancient Ents, are stirred from their indifference by the destruction of their woodland ("There is no curse in Elfish, Entish or all the tongues of man for this treachery," he says when faced by the wasteland Saruman has created from a once great forest).
p703
aVEssentially, the war of Middle-earth is a struggle of diverse peoples to survive under the cosh of mass production, a theme that inspires long after the special effects have faded from view.\u000a
p704
aV\u000aAfter the gothic monster-movie in space that was Ridley Scott's seminal masterpiece Alien, James Cameron had the bright idea of subtly shifting genre for the sequel.
p705
aVThe result, Aliens, re-casts the Vietnam-style war drama in deep space, having taken a heavy cue from Robert Heinlein's novel 'Starship Troopers' (itself later adapted by Paul Verhoeven).
p706
aVSigourney Weaver reprises the role of intergalactic extra-terrestrial basher Ellen Ripley.
p707
aVPicking up from where Alien left off - with Ripley the sole survivor of the crew of the Nostromo - Aliens takes us back to 'LV-426', the planet where the chain of events had started.
p708
aVContact has been lost with the terraforming colony there, so the Colonial Marines (a gung-ho bunch) are sent in to investigate, with Ripley as a "consultant".
p709
aVInevitably, Ripley ends up taking control, battling hordes of the nasty 'xenomorphs', which have bred using the unsuspecting colonists as incubators.
p710
aVA genuinely exhilarating, exhausting experience, Aliens leaps from one edge-of-the-seat setpiece to another with barely a pause for breath (just when you think it's all over it manages to pull another horrifying surprise out of the bag).
p711
aVIt even manages to squeeze in a human angle in the shape of the planet's sole survivor, the orphaned pre-teen Newt (Henn), whom Ripley rescues and protects throughout, creating a kind of curiously poignant mother-daughter bond that not only gives more of an insight into the true character of our butt-kicking heroine but also acts as an interesting contrast to the movie's main monster foe - the mother of all the nasty vicious critters, the giant-sized Alien Queen.\u000a \u000a
p712
aVMore or less successful attempt to pair the balletic, sweet-natured Chan with the jabbering, swaggering Tucker - and thus circumvent the problem of the Hong Kong action star's inability to deliver English dialogue.
p713
aVChan is undoubtedly the natural successor to Keaton and Lloyd - so he should have learned from Lloyd's disastrous flirtation with back projection in Mad Wednesday (1947).
p714
aVThe fuzz of technical trickery mars the finale of Ratner's movie.
p715
aVFor years this biopic of the great Indian statesman was director Attenborough's pet project and when he finally got the chance to make the film he pulled out all the stops in terms of cast and crew.
p716
aVIt's certainly visually stunning - the teeming beauty of India coming alive thanks to the cinematography of Williams and Taylor.
p717
aVYet there's a feeling perhaps that Attenborough should have taken a few steps back from the material before commencing filming - as far too much is glossed over or left unexplained by the screenplay.
p718
aVIt's safe to say that if you knew nothing about Gandhi before going in to the movie, you wouldn't know a whole lot more coming out.
p719
aVThe decision to cast British actor Kingsley as the lead role was a controversial one.
p720
aVThere is no definitive Batman.
p721
aVBob Kane's character, created way back in the late 1930s, has been through the hands of innumerable creative talents for his adventures in comic books, on TV and in feature films.
p722
aVSome of these focus on the caped crime fighter's capacity as a detective, some on his activities as a violent vigilante, while others just fixated on his codpiece.
p723
aVRemember Batman Forever (the one with Jim Carrey as The Riddler) and Batman & Robin) (the one with Arnold Schwarzenegger as Mr Freeze)?
p724
aVIt was these camp incarnations that killed off Warner Brothers' once lucrative superhero franchise in 1997.
p725
aVHaving started strongly with Tim Burton's dark fairytale vision of Batman, the superhero became a soft-drink peddling, Day-Glo nightmare in the hands of director Joel Schumacher.
p726
aVSubsequent to these official Warners films, there was an unofficial live action short - 2003's Batman: Dead End - which for many fans was the finest cinematic evocation of the character yet.
p727
aVWith this history in mind, the big challenge for Warners (owners of DC Comics, the home of Batman, Superman, Wonder Woman etc) was to put some credibility back into Batman, satisfying both fans and the wider audience for summer blockbusters.
p728
aVIn the years following Batman & Robin, there were several aborted reinventions; first Kevin Smith (Clerks) then Wolfgang Peterson (The Perfect Storm) were attached to Superman Vs Batman; abrasive arthouse talent Darren Aronofsky (Requiem For A Dream) was lined-up to adapt Frank Miller's and David Mazzuchelli's essential 1987 graphic novel 'Batman: Year One', a sober prequel to the former's 1986 landmark title 'Batman: The Dark Knight Returns'.
p729
aVWarners were clearly taking the character very seriously.
p730
aVThe considerable thought and attention of this production history pays off in Batman Begins.
p731
aVThe action starts in an east Asian prison, where Bruce Wayne (Bale) is "exploring the criminal fraternity" according to a dapper, mysterious figure (Neeson) who appears and offers him a way out.
p732
aVHe says he can give Wayne a chance to "devote yourself to an ideal".
p733
aVThis suits Wayne, who "seeks a means to fight injustice, to turn fear upon those who prey on the fearful."
p734
aVWhy is he so driven?
p735
aVBecause, as we're shown in flashbacks, his childhood was destroyed by the slaying of his philanthropic parents (Roach and Stewart) by a random mugger in a Gotham City back alley.
p736
aVNeeson's character, who calls himself Ducard, mentors Wayne, a man driven by anger but also naive and undisciplined.
p737
aVDucard is involved with the League Of Shadows, a kind of Templar / Illuminati organisation that has worked as "a check against human corruption for thousands of years".
p738
aVNeeson gets a bit Jedi while recruiting Wayne, telling him, "Your anger gives you great power, but if you let it, it will destroy you".
p739
aVThe training strengthens Wayne, hones his skills and philosophies.
p740
aV"To conquer fear you must become fear," Ducard tells him.
p741
aVAnd what is our hero most afraid of?
p742
aVBats, after an encounter with them in childhood left him terrified and troubled by recurrent nightmares.
p743
aVWhen Wayne finally returns to Gotham, to his family home and avuncular butler Alfred (Caine), he finds the city in a terrible state.
p744
aVAccording to Rachel (Holmes), a childhood friend of Wayne's who's now assistant district attorney, "this city is rotting", because of gang lord Falcone (an oddly cast Wilkinson) who "keeps the bad people rich and the good people scared".
p745
aVWith his new-found sense of purpose, Wayne vows to transform the city.
p746
aVBut he won't be able to do it alone.
p747
aVOne of the more considered elements of the film is how Wayne could realistically (well, realistically-ish) become Batman.
p748
aVHere, he amasses his arsenal, costume, kit and vehicle through his connections with his father's company, Wayne Enterprises.
p749
aVA former friend of his father, Lucius Fox (Freeman), has been buried in the Applied Sciences Division by the corporate-minded CEO Richard Earle (Hauer).
p750
aVIt's through Fox that Wayne acquires his remarkable body armour, surveillance equipment and kit for enabling him to negotiate the alleys and rooftops of Gotham.
p751
aVWayne also makes a connection with detective Jim Gordon (Oldman), one of the only straight cops in the Gotham police.
p752
aVLike Richard Donner's Superman and Sam Raimi's Spider-Man, Batman Begins has two distinct halves.
p753
aVWe get the story of the hero's origins, then his first big adventure.
p754
aVIt's a slightly awkward blend, breaking the classical three act structure, and Nolan doesn't pull it off entirely gracefully.
p755
aVIndeed, things get a bit silly in the second half with novelty bad guys (Cillian Murphy's Dr Jonathan Crane aka The Scarecrow), and a plot involving a stolen microwave emitter and "weaponised hallucinogens".
p756
aVIndeed, any film that includes the line "It's gonna blow!"
p757
aVneeds to be taken with a pinch of salt.
p758
aVBut the second half also involves some great action - notably a car chase that involves the monstrous Batmobile driving across rooftops - and striking images - such as Batman perceived as a demonic figure with glowing red eyes by those who've succumbed to the aforementioned drug.
p759
aVHere Batman is a figure of horror, designed to strike fear.
p760
aVOne perennially interesting strain of the Batman mythology is the tension between Bruce Wayne and the dark Batman.
p761
aVEffectively, the real Bruce Wayne is the one who is subsumed into the "monster" he creates, while the playboy the public sees is a ruse, a feint.
p762
aVAt the core of Batman is a moral dilemma, and questions about the distinctions between justice and revenge.
p763
aVWayne is motivated entirely by anger, but his thirst for vengeance is expressed by a desire to uphold the law, despite him bending it with his nocturnal activities.
p764
aVHere, Alfred is explicitly Wayne's moral compass, who keeps Bale's character a step away from being another American Psycho.
p765
aVOur hero also stays on the ethically straight-and-narrow through his association with the benign Fox, and both Rachel and Gordon, figures within the legal structure who remain uncorrupted.
p766
aVThe fact that this interesting characterisation is framed within a suitably broody, handsome and dynamic film makes it all the better.\u000a																
p767
aVCould Tarantino fulfil the promise of his debut film?
p768
aVThe answer was an emphatic, exhilarating yes.
p769
aVWhere Reservoir Dogs was, for all its energy and action, an oddly theatrical thriller, Pulp Fiction is a resolutely cinematic work, awash, like its predecessor, with homages to Jean-Luc Godard and film noir, boasting a knockout, highly quotable screenplay and a cool, eclectic soundtrack.
p770
aVIn this genuinely original piece of cinema, Tim Roth and Amanda Plummer are hopeless romantics and hopeless villains holding up a diner.
p771
aVBruce Willis is a boxer invoking the rage of his employer Marsellus (Ving Rhames) when he refuses to take a fall in his latest bout.
p772
aVJohn Travolta, in a career-reviving role, and Samuel L Jackson are two enforcers.
p773
aVThe former has a dangerous dalliance with Marsellus's wife Uma Thurman, while the latter contemplates going straight after what he takes to be a spot of divine intervention in his violent life.
p774
aVTarantino expertly interweaves these individually simple stories, developed with old sparring partner Roger Avary, and creates a complex, sophisticated and hilarious whole.
p775
aVThe only serious low point comes with the mercifully brief cameo from Tarantino himself, with the hipster director proving once again that he really should stay behind the camera.
p776
aV\u000aEssentially, Memento is a straightforward revenge flick with Guy Pearce's Leonard tracking down the man who raped and murdered his wife.
p777
aVBut this standard plot comes with an ingenious twist.
p778
aVBrain damage Leonard sustained during the attack has left him with the memory of a goldfish.
p779
aVHe forgets conversations he had two minutes ago.
p780
aVHe doesn't know if the man sitting next to him is his best friend or sworn enemy.
p781
aVHe can't even remember if the bottle of Scotch he's clutching is to get him pissed or to bash over the head of his assailant.
p782
aVWhat assailant?
p783
aVExactly.
p784
aVHis confusion intensifies when he gets caught up with drug dealers who readily abuse his condition.
p785
aVHe's developed a system of cataloguing events and characters from his investigations with Polaroids, charts and tattoos (allowing for repeated exposure of the Pearce torso) but these are just as susceptible to manipulation, and finding the real killer becomes increasingly tricky.
p786
aVChristopher Nolan's audacious conceit necessitates the plot to run backwards, starting with Leonard killing the man he thinks is guilty and slowly revealing whether or not he picked the right target.\u000a
p787
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000aOr rent other films that stand the test of time now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aWho'd have thought?
p788
aVAn absurd-sounding tale of a serial killer basing his crimes around the seven deadly sins, directed by the man behind the mess that was Alien3, turning out to be one of the most chilling and original thrillers of the 1990s.
p789
aVFrom the outset, through the film's brilliantly designed deliberate under-lighting - we see very little blood and guts - and muffled sound, the audience is encouraged to lean towards the screen, immerse itself in the film's unbearably grim world.
p790
aVPitt is in career-making form as Mills, a simple cop moving with his sweet young wife (Paltrow) to a grim, anonymous city, determined to make a difference, to do some good.
p791
aVHe is assigned to track down a vengeful killer, and works alongside Somerset (Freeman), a jaded, wise policeman on the verge of retirement.
p792
aVThe two are that modern movie cliché - the mismatched pair thrown together by circumstance, who gradually learn mutual respect.
p793
aVBut Fincher and Walker take these hackneyed ingredients, play with them in the context of a brilliantly cohesive plot, and present something consistently fresh - the police finding themselves with too much evidence, the premature unmasking of the killer - and very, very dark.
p794
aVWatch more movies by great directors on Film4oD
p795
aV\u000aOscar Isaac and Jessica Chastain have time for some great scenes in \u201cA Most Violent Year.\u201d They\u2019ve got all the time in the world in a film that never ends.
p796
aV\u201cA Most Violent Year\u201d crackles with good acting, but fizzles from its slow pacing.
p797
aVMost of all, it reminds you of better films from the 1970\u2019s and 80\u2019s.
p798
aVOscar Isaac and Jessica Chastain are the husband-and-wife owners of a small, but growing, fuel oil business in New York City, 1981.
p799
aVIt\u2019s explained that 1981 was one of the most violent years in the city\u2019s history.
p800
aVAnd, a growing source of tension is the highly competitive fuel oil business.
p801
aVDespite the seemingly endless hijackings of his vehicles, Abel Morales (Isaac) is determined not to respond in kind.
p802
aVHe wants peace and prosperity, but it seems like one or more of his competitors wants to drive him out of business.
p803
aVThe financial strain and an ongoing investigation of his company by a local prosecutor adds to the pressure.
p804
aVMorales finds little moral support in his wife, Anna (Chastain).
p805
aVHer late father ran the company like the people he was in business with.
p806
aVSomeone hits you, you hit back.
p807
aVHer husband\u2019s attempts to take the high ground are doubted by not only his wife, but his employees.
p808
aVMorales, nevertheless, attempts to persevere against the violence, decay and corruption.
p809
aVYou would think a film entitled \u201cA Most Violent Year\u201d would bring suspense and action to its intriguing premise, but instead it stubbornly insists on slowing things down to the point that you start thinking about similar films, the Sydney Lumet classic, \u201cSerpico,\u201d for example.
p810
aVIsaac just can\u2019t compete with someone like Al Pacino in his prime, at least not with this dull material.
p811
aVAnd, it\u2019s not his fault.
p812
aVIsaac and Chastain will both get kudos for their performances and deserve it.
p813
aVBut, overall, the journey is disappointing for the audience.
p814
aVWe also have a stake in this.
p815
aVI should also mention David Oyelowo as the prosecutor and Albert Brooks as Morales\u2019 attorney and family friend have great scenes in \u201cA Most Violent Year.\u201d There\u2019s no shortage of excellent actors.
p816
aVWriter-director J. C. Chandor shows great promise.
p817
aVIt\u2019s only his third feature film.
p818
aV\u201cAll is lost\u201d had pacing problems, but the novelty of Robert Redford as a distressed sailor in a disabled boat adrift hundreds of miles from any port lowered our expectations.
p819
aVIt was an experimental film, even.
p820
aVChandor can continue to sail in his own direction.
p821
aVThere will always be an audience.
p822
aVBut, the sluggishness of his stories will take him only so far with some of us.
p823
aVGrade: C\u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p824
aVWinner of five Oscars, three BAFTAs and three Golden Globes The Apartment is a true classic.
p825
aVIt's about advancement, ambition, corruption and adultery, and it operates as both a satire and a sorrowful romance.
p826
aVDirector Wilder and co-writer Diamond reunited with star Jack Lemmon after the three of them had worked on 1959's Some Like It Hot, setting sights set on something more intense.
p827
aVThe Apartment is defined by its scabrousness, sleaze and the sadness arising from one central character, Lemmon's put-upon CC Baxter, who spends most of the film looking on while his boss beds the woman he loves.
p828
aVThat woman, Shirley MacLaine's Fran Kubelik, is herself the victim of exploitation by that boss, Fred MacMurray's amiably obnoxious Mr Sheldrake, a heartless patriarch if ever there was one.
p829
aVWithout getting into the nitty gritty of how much both Baxter and Fran suffer, and the odiousness of their male colleagues, the bottom line with The Apartment is that no one (bar maybe Clifford Odets with Sweet Smell Of Success) wrote dialogue as smart, incisive and witty as Wilder and Diamond, and The Apartment is the prime period of their collaboration.
p830
aVAs well as providing a lot of smart laughs and a touching romance, they don't pull any punches in their portrait of married corporate men, merrily conforming to the odious stereotypes in their infidelity and abuse of underlings.How about Sheldrake trying to defend his philandering?
p831
aV"Ya know, you see a girl a couple of times a week, just for laughs, and right away they think you're gonna divorce your wife.
p832
aVNow I ask you, is that fair?"
p833
aVto which Baxter replies, "No, sir, it's very unfair.
p834
aVEspecially to your wife."
p835
aVOf course, it's not just about the writing itself, it's that alchemical process where the right actors are handling it, and Lemmon is particularly adept at bringing it to life.
p836
aVMacLaine and MacMurray are no slouches either.
p837
aVThe Apartment is a film laden with bittersweet desperation, as the nice but pathetic Baxter longs for Fran but can't quite stand up to his bosses.
p838
aVThere would be no moral in the story if "Buddy" Baxter didn't come good in the end.
p839
aVHowever, the happy ending is a long time coming, as Wilder and Diamond wring out every last drop of humanity from Sheldrake and his grotesque comrades presenting their case about their horrendous ethics. 
p840
aV\u000aThe story and the soundtrack you know about.
p841
aVThe hype and controversy too.
p842
aVTrainspotting, with its exhilarating approach to desperation, addiction and death, was one of the most vital British movies of the 1990s.
p843
aVUnlike previous films dealing with heroin culture - Christiane F, The Basketball Diaries - Danny Boyle's film has a comic strain so potent it deserves a health warning all its own.
p844
aVThe plot itself is profoundly bleak but with kinetic style and relentless energy Boyle finds sympathy for Irvine Welsh's hopeless, drug-hungry scamsters.
p845
aVInitial reaction, it's worth remembering, wasn't favourable and the film was criticised for glamorising smack.
p846
aVIt doesn't.
p847
aVEwan McGregor's Renton, amiable but morally ambivalent, succeeds - sort of - on the back of his sorry, selfish charm.
p848
aVHis mates fare far, far worse.
p849
aVThere's the corruption of Tommy (Kevin McKidd), the death of Allison's (Susan Vidler) baby and Renton's grim response.
p850
aV("I'm cooking up.")
p851
aVRobert Carlyle visibly vibrates as the violent Begbie and Johnny Lee Miller's Sean Connery-obsessed Sick Boy introduces a degree of knowing comedy.
p852
aVBoyle's slightly longer cut of the film on the 'Definitive Edition' DVD also provides a chance to follow the fate of Mother Superior/Swanney (Peter Mullan), whose intravenous habit costs him significantly more than in the original theatrical release.
p853
aVNo one gets off lightly, and though early scenes celebrate the uneasy camaraderie of outlaw drug buddies, by the end everything and everyone is screwed.
p854
aVPivotal to Trainspotting's success is its use of music to echo and emphasise these characters' trajectories.
p855
aVIggy Pop and Lou Reed knew all about the cyclical monotony of a life reduced to crave, hit and crave.
p856
aVAt the film's heart however is the synthetic pulse of Underworld's 'Born Slippy' and the final scene blends image and tune to devastating effect.
p857
aVTrainspotting set the style for an era, and seemed to herald a new age of British cinema.
p858
aVIt's interesting now to compare Trainspotting's energy, style and structure with Boyle's Oscar-nabbing Slumdog Millionaire - there are distinct similarities.
p859
aVAll involved here give class-A performances, Boyle's direction is brilliantly ingenious and whole stretches of the script remain burned upon the brain.
p860
aVTrainspotting provides ample evidence that even the grimmest subject matter can make a great film.
p861
aVIt's just a question of how you harness that raw power.\u000a
p862
aVIdentity.
p863
aVSupremacy.
p864
aVUltimatum.
p865
aVThe titles of the Bourne films reflect their terse, taciturn character Jason Bourne.
p866
aVHe's the ex-CIA assassin who was plucked from the Mediterranean as an amnesiac in The Bourne Identity and saw his fugitive hopes of domesticity destroyed in The Bourne Supremacy.
p867
aVThe who-am-I?
p868
aVimpetus propelled those first two instalments and it's no surprise that it crops up again here in what various sources have claimed is the final entry in the Bourne saga.
p869
aVBut although Jason Bourne discovers his real name and retraces his first steps into the CIA's shady Treadstone programme, it's fair to say he's still a mystery by the time the credits roll.
p870
aVAnd that's what gives this classy thriller its smarts.
p871
aVIn 2007's summer of jaded Hollywood sequels, remakes and multi-million dollar adverts for toys The Bourne Ultimatum is something special: a blockbuster with brains as well as brawn.
p872
aVSticking close to the original movies (though deviating wildly from Robert Ludlum's novels), it's a threequel that manages to retain its freshness by dint of its craftsmanship, not gimmicks.
p873
aVUsing his over-the-shoulder shaky-cams, British director Paul Greengrass stages the action with balls, employing real locations and a small crew to deliver the kind of verite he put to different use in Bloody Sunday and United 93.
p874
aVAn early nerve-fraying sequence in London's Waterloo Station sets the taut, credible tone as Bourne (Matt Damon) meets whistle-blowing reporter Simon Ross (Paddy Considine) from the 'Guardian', who's running a story on the CIA's Treadstone programme.
p875
aVThe ensuing game of cat and mouse plays out with nerve-fraying tension as Bourne dodges covert operatives on the station concourse, while CIA/NSA suits led by agency mandarin Noah Vosen (David Strathairn) run the show in real-time from behind banks of monitors halfway around the world.
p876
aVIt's like a steroid-abusing version of '24' and begs the question: how much did the original films inspire the clock-ticking TV drama?
p877
aVThe series has always had a keen sense of the division of labour in the spy industry, as senior suits wash their hands of the dirty business that happens on the ground.
p878
aVThe screenplay plays that expediency to the hilt and adds a muted political dimension to Jason Bourne and his reasons for joining the CIA.
p879
aVThe revelation and flashbacks that show his initiation make him a morally ambivalent figure whose hero status seems to be eroding with each new instalment.
p880
aVThere's a subversive undercurrent at work here and the film's understated take on the limits of patriotism is surprisingly daring - although so underplayed that many may overlook it.
p881
aVGreengrass keeps such concerns simmering under the surface but doesn't forget he's supposed to deliver an action blockbuster.
p882
aVThe results are exhilarating: the Waterloo opening gives way to a motorbike/foot chase through a Tangier market; a Manhattan car chase with Damon behind the wheel of a NYPD cruiser.
p883
aVThe shooting style is immersive.
p884
aVYou flinch, tense and dodge as Damon unleashes Bourne's inimitable Krav Maga moves, the bone-crunching sound effects expressing every snapped wrist, every choke hold.
p885
aVMatt Damon's intimated that this may well be his last outing in the role.
p886
aVWith three films already under his belt that may be the smartest move to make, especially since it's debatable how much more plot and CIA double-crosses the franchise can credibly sustain.
p887
aVIf it ends here, it'll end on a high note.
p888
aVTrue, there'll still be more questions than answers - but the mystery of Bourne was always part of his dangerous, disorienting allure.
p889
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aMarvel\u2019s latest gamble shows the studio is riding a wave of self-confidence across mountains of cash in the wake of successfully defying Hollywood common sense by hiring directors like cult favourite Shane Black (Iron Man 3) and a couple of guys best known for TV\u2019s Arrested Development and Community (Captain America: The Winter Soldier) to look after some of their most lucrative properties.
p890
aVThey\u2019ve upped the stakes here by pairing James Gunn, director of Slither and Super \u2013 neither of which troubled box office bean counters \u2013 with some of Marvel\u2019s craziest characters in the form of Guardians of the Galaxy, and the result is an exciting thrill-ride that strikes a brilliant balance between jaw-dropping space scenes, anarchic wit and bountiful belly laughs.
p891
aVComing across as perhaps the least shackled by the requirements of a typical origin story of any Marvel film to date, Guardians of the Galaxy quickly dispenses with its dramatic back story right up front, before picking up years later with Peter Quill (the wisecracking Chris Pratt) embarking on a futuristic Indiana Jones-like heist prologue that sets the visually spectacular, quip-heavy tone.
p892
aVFrom here, Gunn\u2019s universe-building proves assured, quickly rolling out all manner of crazy-coloured, CGI and prosthetic-wearing aliens free of any need to keep things grounded for simple Earthlings.
p893
aVBy the time a raccoon and a walking tree turn up and talk to each other it\u2019s just the latest oddity to behold, and the pair become crucial elements of the film\u2019s quintet of heroes (alongside Zoe Saldana and Dave Bautista), all of whom boast scene-stealing moments and the charisma to balance Pratt\u2019s star turn.
p894
aVWhile it may lack a great villain, there\u2019s so much awesomeness going on with Guardians that there\u2019s almost no room for one.
p895
aVI\u2019m gunning for part two.
p896
aV\u2018Guardians of the Galaxy\u2019 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p897
aV\u000a\u201cDo we scare you?
p898
aVYes, we should.\u201d CGI effects create two central characters in \u201cGuardians of the Galaxy.\u201d\u000aAre you making \u201cGuardians of the Galaxy\u201d for Marvel Comics fans?
p899
aVOr, do you want everyone to come along for the ride?
p900
aVI asked myself those questions and more during a promotional screening of this sure-to-be late summer hit.
p901
aVThe answers left me less than impressed.
p902
aVWhat distinguishes a great adaptation from a mediocre film is its ability to stand apart from the source material.
p903
aV\u201cGuardians of the Galaxy\u201d relied too much on the audience already knowing the Marvel mythology.
p904
aVCall it, in my opinion, an unacceptable shorthand.
p905
aVThe filmmakers substituted mindless action for a good fleshing-out of the story.
p906
aV\u201cGalaxy\u201d opens with the reasonably touching scene of a boy losing his mother to cancer.
p907
aVThe kid has trouble saying goodbye to his mom on her deathbed and instead retreats to his \u201cSony Walkman\u201d mix tape of hits from the 1970\u2019s.
p908
aVCut to 26 years later and the exploits of a Han Solo/Indiana Jones hybrid out to steal a mysterious orb from an alien planet.
p909
aVWe learn very little about the central character, Peter Quill (Chris Pratt).
p910
aVJust go with it, right?
p911
aVHe\u2019s a righteous space dude who loves 70\u2019s music.
p912
aVYeah, that\u2019s it.
p913
aVWe also learn precious little about the other characters who unite to become the \u201cGuardians of the Galaxy.\u201d A few lines of dialogue for each principal.
p914
aVSorry.
p915
aVNo time, folks.
p916
aVWe have at least a dozen villains you need to meet.
p917
aVThe story overflows with characters, all vying for a big onscreen moment.
p918
aVThe cast is pretty good, actually.
p919
aVPratt brings a goofball charm to his Han Solo clone.
p920
aVZoe Saldana goes from the blue makeup of \u201cAvatar\u201d to the amazingly different green makeup of Gamora.
p921
aVUh, okay.
p922
aVDave Bautista wasn\u2019t bad as Drax the Destroyer, a space alien who only understands literal references (similar to Spock in \u201cStar Trek.\u201d) Vin Diesel (box office poison for any movie that doesn\u2019t have the word \u201cfast\u201d in the title) supplies the voice of Groot, a tree-like humanoid.
p923
aVBradley Cooper provides the comic relief as Rocket, a genetically modified raccoon.
p924
aVThe villains are such generic comic-book stereotypes, I won\u2019t even bother mentioning.
p925
aVOn the positive side, the film has an above-average sense of humor.
p926
aVThe talking raccoon was amusing at times, but annoying at other times.
p927
aVA few of the special effects shots were impressive.
p928
aVBut, they often crowded the story.
p929
aVLess is more sometimes.
p930
aVThe 3D conversion was also above average.
p931
aVOn the negative side, why wasn\u2019t there more of an original score?
p932
aVI realize Quill enjoys his 70\u2019s music.
p933
aVAnd, personally, it\u2019s my favorite decade.
p934
aVBut, it\u2019s lazy to let established pop hits of decades past to stand in for first-rate original music.
p935
aVMusic should help tell the story.
p936
aVEstablished hit singles bring too much baggage.
p937
aVDespite what I might think of the finished product, \u201cGuardians of the Galaxy\u201d will be a huge box office hit.
p938
aVAnd, it will likely break August box office records.
p939
aVAs mindless fun, it works.
p940
aVGrade: C\u000aIt\u2019s like \u201cStar Wars\u201d without the Death Star.
p941
aVOh, and about everything else that \u201cStar Wars had going for it.
p942
aV\u201cGuardians of the Galaxy\u201d is just a wannabe sci-fi classic.
p943
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p944
aVStrangers On The Train is not a very profound film.
p945
aVIt is, however, extremely entertaining and, 50 years after its release, still full of suspense and surprises.
p946
aVRobert Walker is Bruno Antony - effete, charming, and psychopathically insane.
p947
aVHe decides to 'swap' murders with tennis ace and society climber Guy Haines (Farley Granger) during an encounter on a train.
p948
aVHaines thinks nothing of it until his wife has been strangled (with him as suspect number one) and Antony is stalking him, demanding that he kill his father.
p949
aVHitchcock cranks up the suspense with consummate skill; with his trademark race against time culminating in the tensest tennis match ever committed to celluloid.
p950
aVThe dialogue is razor-sharp (master of the one-liner Raymond Chandler had a hand in writing the script), and the script is a lesson in economy and directness while managing to weave an air of provocative ambiguity - particularly around camp killer Antony.
p951
aVThe acting is universally delightful and it's all topped off with one of the hairiest fairground rides you could ever hope to not go on.
p952
aVThe idea of Lawrence (O'Toole) as a wilfully self-destructive character is established in the credit sequence which presents his death in a motor-bike crash as something close to suicide.
p953
aVWe flash back to Lawrence as a young, energetic, slightly mad man stuck in a job as a military cartographer, desperate to put his knowledge of and passion for all things Arabian to practical use.
p954
aVThen in a breathtaking cut we move from a lit match to the sun burning over the film's real star, the Arabian desert.
p955
aVLean and cinematographer Young clearly fell for the desert as much as Lawrence himself, and they ensure that the audience shares their love.
p956
aVThe film strips down the story to its basics, following the struggle of the unhinged anti-hero to help establish a united Arab nation.
p957
aVO'Toole is wonderfully intense in the lead, but his characterization of a man of unfathomable motivations gets lost in the grandeur of his surroundings - the vast, exquisitely composed desertscapes and breathtaking battle scenes.
p958
aVSharif is served better by a more conventional role and, emerging like a shimmering mirage on the horizon and slowly approaching the camera, is given one of cinema's great first appearances.
p959
aV\u000aAfter his inspired take in 1992 on The Last Of The Mohicans, writer-director Michael Mann turned his prodigious but occasionally unwieldy talent back to crime and punishment, and Heat ranks among the best and most sophisticated of the 1990s' (many, many) heist dramas.
p960
aVMuch has been made of the pairing of Al Pacino, as the obsessed cop Vincent Hanna, and Robert De Niro, as his rival, crime gang leader Neil McCauley.
p961
aVThey are great, but as is usual with Mann - famous for the demands he makes of his cast - the entire line-up fizzes with energy, investing Mann's writing with a compelling rawness and depth.
p962
aVThe central story of a heist that turns vicious is the basis for numerous sub-plots and characters, with moments of melancholy and dark comedy.
p963
aVQuite rightly, this confirmed Mann as one of Hollywood's smartest, most stylish and emotionally articulate directors.
p964
aVIn a nutshell: Powerful, sophisticated and magnificently stylish crime drama.
p965
aVMann  steers it with intensity and intelligence, and the two icons at its  centre exhibit an irresistible magnetism.\u000a
p966
aVMike Nichols could not have been served better in his choice of a directorial debut.
p967
aVEdward Albee's play was hot property, its subject matter playing with a number of Hollywood taboos, its language both vulgar and poetic.
p968
aVBest of all, though, are the searing, unforgettable performances from Burton and Taylor, a married couple in meltdown who invite a younger couple (Segal and Dennis) in for a late night drink.
p969
aVSoon, the younger couple becomes involved in the feuding pair's drama, as they are used like the bitter words Burton and Taylor throw out to hurt each other.
p970
aVAuthor Thomas Keneally won a Booker Prize for 'Schindler's Ark', but it took Spielberg to tell the story of shady Nazi industrialist Schindler who saved hundreds of Jews from the death camps to a worldwide audience.
p971
aVIt was very much a personal project for Spielberg.
p972
aVAfter the success of Jurassic Park he was able to make any film he wanted, and has said that he didn't expect many people would want to see a Jewish story.
p973
aVHowever, in Neeson's flawed hero Oskar Schindler, Kingsley's quietly desperate Jewish administrator Itzhak Stern and Fiennes's bloatedly evil concentration camp commandant Amon Goeth, Spielberg had a dramatic engine that pulls an audience along through the heartbreaking story of the enslavement and massacre of Poland's Jews.
p974
aVIt won buckets of Oscars, but its best tribute is the shocked, tearful silence of audiences everywhere.
p975
aVAn outstanding, harrowing piece of cinema.
p976
aVSince the 1989 release of Do The Right Thing, Spike Lee's seminal film on simmering inner-city race relations, convincing cinematic studies of the effects of racism have been rather light on the ground.
p977
aVJohn Singleton's underdeveloped Higher Learning didn't quite get there, leaving Russell Crowe's performance as a brutal skinhead in the 1992 Australian film Romper Stomper as the last time a film attempted to take an unflinching look at the brutal world of neo-Nazism.
p978
aVThe controversial subject matter of white supremacists and their violent tactics is tackled in 1998's powerful American History X, a film that produced a different type of controversy on its release when director Tony Kaye battled publicly with New Line Cinema over the final cut.
p979
aVPutting on more than two stone (13kg) of muscle for the role, the shaven haired and tattooed Norton is barely recognizable as the film's lead, Derek Vinyard.
p980
aVThe movie captures the tense 24-hour period after Derek is released from prison for the murder of two black men.
p981
aVThrough a series of illuminating black-and-white flashbacks, audiences are given an insight into how Derek's poisonous views are cultivated and ultimately changed after his brutal stay in prison.
p982
aVEdward Furlong (Terminator 2: Judgment Day) is Derek's younger brother Danny, a troubled teen who is tempted to follow in the jackbooted steps of his sibling.
p983
aVThe complex relationship between the two is played out against a harsh Venice Beach backdrop, a place where a violent tribalism is at play among the area's multiple racial denominations.
p984
aVOffsetting Norton's rabble-rousing racist rhetoric is Dr Bob Sweeney (Brooks), an African-American teacher who has taught both of the bright but misguided Vinyard brothers.
p985
aVSweeney acts here as the film's moral conscience, a man who illuminates American History X's commentary on the futility of unrelenting hate and bigotry.
p986
aVIt's rumoured that, during post-production, Edward Norton stepped into the editing suite, ultimately giving his character a lot more screen time.
p987
aVAlthough this move might be seen as egomaniacal even by Hollywood standards, viewers will be more than thankful since Norton delivers another one of the gripping performances that have become his signature.\u000a																
p988
aV\u000a\u201cThe Imitation Game\u201d tells the story of the eggheads who saved millions of lives by bringing World War II to an early close.
p989
aVBritish mathematician Alan Turing was a hero decades before actor Benedict Cumberbatch was born.
p990
aVBut, now Turing\u2019s place in history is elevated by the actor\u2019s amazing performance in \u201cThe Imitation Game.\u201d Turing is cool, because Cumberbatch is cool.
p991
aVThe film trumpets Turing\u2019s key role in winning World War II by breaking Nazi Germany\u2019s Enigma code.
p992
aVMillions of lives were saved by Turing and his team of eggheads at Bletchley Park, northwest of London.
p993
aVNot as well served by the film was Turing\u2019s sexuality.
p994
aVHe was criminally prosecuted for his admitted homosexuality after the war and chemically castrated, ultimately leading to his suicide.
p995
aVBut, the film glosses over his personal preferences and plays up his engagement to Joan Clarke (Keira Knightley).
p996
aVTuring was a troubled soul, but it\u2019s like the filmmakers decided to skip that part in favor of solve, solve, solve\u2026let\u2019s solve the puzzle.
p997
aVMost historians note that Turing and Clarke didn\u2019t have a great love affair.
p998
aVIt\u2019s doubtful that Turing woke up one morning, and realized he was gay.
p999
aVThe film should have acknowledged his sexuality from the start, rather than relying on hints and whispers.
p1000
aVCumberbatch is NOT one of my favorites.
p1001
aVHis Sherlock Holmes on television annoys me, and so much praise has been heaped upon the actor that it makes me resent having to watch him in this or that.
p1002
aVHe\u2019s not even that good-looking, folks.
p1003
aVAnd, his farts do NOT smell like roses.
p1004
aVBut, with that rant out of my system now, I must say he impresses as Turing.
p1005
aVThe role seems custom-made.
p1006
aVHis arrogant, but endearing, style makes Turing\u2019s efforts to break the code as fascinating as an original Sherlock Holmes mystery.
p1007
aVAnd, despite any shortcomings with the historical accuracy, the top-notch screenplay allows Cumberbatch to nail down every last scene.
p1008
aVIt\u2019s remarkable.
p1009
aV\u201cThe Imitation Game\u2019s\u201d supporting cast shines, particularly Charles Dance and Mark Strong.
p1010
aVThe direction by Norway\u2019s Morten Tyldum is excellent.
p1011
aVIt\u2019s his first English-language film.
p1012
aVIf you\u2019ve never seen \u201cHeadhunters,\u201d please do.
p1013
aVTyldum has a nice touch.
p1014
aVI look forward to his future films.
p1015
aVAs for \u201cThe Imitation Game,\u201d you can\u2019t go wrong.
p1016
aVA bracing film with excellent production values and a fine cast.
p1017
aVGrade: A\u000aBenedict Cumberbatch leads an excellent ensemble cast in \u201cThe Imitation Game.\u201d\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1018
aVA young cub is born into the jungle royal family.
p1019
aVWhen his father is killed, his evil uncle Scar, scheming to usurp the title of king, convinces him that it was his fault.
p1020
aVThe death of a parent as a plot device brings to mind Bambi, but mostly this is a film in keeping with the Disney renaissance of the 90s: slick and action-packed, with vain attempts to be seen as 'with it'.
p1021
aVThere's also the inevitable right-wing American conformist sub-text that has made Disney the pariah of liberals everywhere.
p1022
aVThe sickly Elton John and Tim Rice songs ruin any attempts at hipness, the excruciating 'Circle of Life' bagging quite a few gongs, nonetheless.Bizarrely, the film became something of an after clubbing favourite in the late 90s, its lush visuals and crude emotionalism having an unexpectedly profound effect on the chemically susceptible.
p1023
aVWalt Disney would be turning in his grave.
p1024
aVJanet Leigh plays Marion Crane, a clerical worker bored with her job and frustrated by her relationship with earnest lover Sam Loomis (John Gavin).
p1025
aVShe absconds with $40,000 of her company's money and heads out of her home town, Phoenix.
p1026
aVCaught in a sudden downpour at night on a dark road, she seeks refuge in a roadside motel run by shy amateur taxidermist Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins).
p1027
aVThe rest - especially the legendary shower scene - is Hollywood history.
p1028
aVHitchcock approached this as a quick, cheap production - using the crew from his TV show to knock off an adaptation of Robert Bloch's moderately successful, pulp fiction novel.
p1029
aVThe result was a superb thriller unlike anything he or anyone else had ever done; one that continues to have a profound influence on countless filmmakers.
p1030
aVHitchcock decreed 'no entry' once screenings of the movie were under way to preserve the build up to the shock ending.
p1031
aVHe was right in demanding respect for this beautifully constructed and achieved movie.
p1032
aVJoining halfway would be like building a house of cards from the centre.
p1033
aVImpossible.
p1034
aVNow that it's part of movie consciousness the revelation about the engaging, yet gruesome, Norman matters no more than the known outcome to A Man Escaped: it's the journey  that counts.
p1035
aVPsycho spawned several belated and inferior sequels, and Gus Van Sant's entirely redundant near frame-by-frame remake.
p1036
aVThere was also a missed chance for a gay remake, where Marion should have become Mark, justifying the complications of the first section and flight and his fascination for mummy's boy Norman. 
p1037
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000aOr rent other films that stand the test of time from Film4oD\u000a \u000aKevin Spacey gives a trophy-grabbing, barnstorming performance as mid-life crisis victim Lester Burnham, who copes with his middle age rut and asexual marriage (to Annette Bening's marvellously uptight socialite) by reverting back to all manner of peculiar adolescent behaviour; he quits his job in spectacular fashion, starts smoking pot supplied by his weirdo neighbour (Wes Bentley) and begins chasing his daughter's jailbait buddy (Mena Suvari).An edgily hilarious and marvellously astute portrayal of the American dream gone horribly wrong, with unilaterally superb dialogue, direction and performances from the leads (not forgetting Chris Cooper's terrifyingly militaristic neighbour and Alison Janney as his downtrodden, almost silent wife).
p1038
aVBrowse our reviews of other arresting directorial debuts
p1039
aV\u000aThe penguins from \u201cMadagascar\u201d get their own movie, but it\u2019s not much fun for adults.
p1040
aVAn animated film should entertain kids, while at the same time, appeal to adults.
p1041
aVFrequently, adults are left out of the equation.
p1042
aVAnd, sometimes the action is so frenetic, that only anklebiters get anything out of it.
p1043
aVSuch is the case with \u201cPenguins of Madagascar.\u201d\u000aYes, penguins are cute.
p1044
aVBut, the ones coming out of Dreamworks are also obnoxious and headache-producing.
p1045
aVThe mad pacing in \u201cPenguins of Madagascar\u201d exposes a lack of wit and substance.
p1046
aVIt is to be endured, not enjoyed.
p1047
aVUnless, of course, you are very young.
p1048
aVToddlers to ten.
p1049
aVThese are the penguins from the \u201cMadagascar\u201d franchise, of course.
p1050
aVSkipper (Tom McGrath), Kowalski (Chris Miller), Rico (Conrad Vernon) and Private (Christopher Knights), the rookie.
p1051
aVAfter an opening sequence set in Antarctica, the birds break into Fort Knox to find a vending machine with a discontinued hard-to-find snack.
p1052
aVNever mind the gold reserves.
p1053
aVPenguins move on their stomachs.
p1054
aVAfter consuming their fill of the cheesy snacks, the quartet is kidnapped by a talking squid known as Dave.
p1055
aVDave despises penguins.
p1056
aVThey constantly steal the show away from his inkness, getting him kicked out of zoos all over the world.
p1057
aVIt seems Dave used to be the favorite.
p1058
aVI don\u2019t know how that happened since penguins have always been around.
p1059
aVWhat zoo was Dave at, where he was the main attraction?
p1060
aVDave plots to kidnap all zoo penguins and turn them into mutants as revenge for his falling into disfavor.
p1061
aVThat\u2019s all you need to know, since the story goes at such a furibund pace, there\u2019s little time to absorb plot points.
p1062
aVForget about the story.
p1063
aVJust let the kids look at the pretty pictures.
p1064
aVWhat would I have done to make \u201cPenguins of Madagascar\u201d more palatable?
p1065
aVEasy.
p1066
aVSlow things down and concentrate on the jokes.
p1067
aVUse the Marx Brothers as a pattern with Skipper as Groucho, Kowalski as Chico, Rico as Harpo and Private as Zeppo (who knows?)
p1068
aVMaybe write Private out of the story.
p1069
aVInstead of the usual mad scientist (Dave) routine, find something original and funny to write about.
p1070
aVUse some wit and fancy, and stop worrying about ADHD.
p1071
aVToday\u2019s children will get it.
p1072
aVAnd, if they don\u2019t, then concentrate on sending films like \u201cPenguins of Madagascar\u201d direct to cable TV or home entertainment venues.
p1073
aVSpare the adults.
p1074
aVGrade: D+\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: March 17, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 92 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cPG\u201d\u000aReleased by Fox Home Entertainment\u000aIn \u201cPenguins of Madagascar,\u201d our flightless friends get help from an animal spy agency called \u201cNorth Wind.\u201d\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1075
aV\u000a"I reject nature!"
p1076
aVdeclares young penguin Skipper (voiced by Tom McGrath) in the Antarctic.
p1077
aVNot one to leave any penguin behind, he, Kowalski (Chris Miller) and Rico (Conrad Vernon) stray from the colony to rescue an imperilled egg, and end up zoo exhibits, escape artists and elite agents.
p1078
aVYet if the third film in the Madagascar series took place in a circus, the surreal-jiving penguins have always played sideshow freaks to the lion, giraffe, hippo and zebra who are the franchise's main attractions.
p1079
aVNow, after a dry run in several dedicated cartoon shows for television, these strange birds get their first solo flight of fancy in Penguins Of Madagascar, hoping to be recognised in their own right - much as their buddy Private (Christopher Knights) longs to be regarded as a valued member of the team rather than merely as a cute 'sidekick/mascot' to the other penguins.
p1080
aVThe plot, involving a vengeful octopus (voiced by John Malkovich!)
p1081
aVwith a mutant-monster-making ray gun, is an entirely disposable Bond parody (including the most insane Venice canal chase you will ever see) - and not so very different from the story in Despicable Me 2, whose cute chorus of Minions is soon also to get its own feature.
p1082
aVBetter to watch Penguins Of Madagascar for its breakneck banter, manic mayhem, postmodern pastiche and terrible puns - all of which is no less disposable, but infectiously hilarious.
p1083
aVWith their irrepressible can-do spirit and eschewal of gravity's laws, these fast-talking waddlers deviate from the flock, and from the image of penguins-vs-cruel-nature seen in innumerable documentaries (lampooned at the beginning, with a cameo from none other than the real Werner Herzog).
p1084
aVWhen Skipper rejects nature, he embraces fantasy, allowing this 3D animated absurdity, in all its patchiness, to take wing.\u000a
p1085
aVIngmar Bergman is famed for his pessimism and a wryly ironic attitude, which frequently dissolves into anguish and despair.
p1086
aVBergman films are hardly universal fare and they're ludicrously at odds with multiplex values.
p1087
aVIt's doubly ironic, then, that Wild Strawberries, if it were to suffer the indignities of a remake, could easily be turned into superior Hollywood feelgood material.
p1088
aVWoody Allen paid extensive homage to it in Deconstructing Harry, another story of a world weary highbrow returning to his alma mater.
p1089
aVWild Strawberries is the story of an ageing doctor, Professor Isak Borg (a wonderful performance from Victor Sjöström), who describes himself, frankly, as an old pedant with no need or time for other people.
p1090
aVOff the cuff, he decides to drive nine hours to a ceremony where he will be honoured for his lifelong devotion to medicine.
p1091
aVHe's accompanied on the journey by his daughter-in-law, Marianne (Thulin), who makes no secret of her dislike for the icy, empty and self-satisfied Isak.
p1092
aVThe story, always laden with symbolism, flashes back from Isak's  troubled present to his youth, and shifts between dreams and reality.
p1093
aVAt  Marianne's prompting, and with the help of a trio of young people he  picks up en route, Isak considers his life choices, revisiting the early  disappointments and betrayals that conspired to make him who he is.
p1094
aVDelightfully, Isak acts on this new self-knowledge, opening himself up  to the world after so many years of icy disengagement.
p1095
aVThis is hardly  the stock Bergman unhappy ending, although it's worth remembering he was  adept at comedy, as shown in Smiles Of A Summer Night, among  others.
p1096
aVBut the warm-heartedness of the story makes it tremendously  accessible, and the story never spills over into sentimentality.
p1097
aVRead reviews of other Ingmar Bergman films screening on Film4 from 4th to 17th July 2011\u000aGo to TV listings
p1098
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aWith his \u201cgolden age\u201d seeming like a bygone era \u2013 Billy Madison, Happy Gilmore, I even like The Waterboy \u2013 and his brief-but-bold dramatic turns feeling more like cliff notes in his career \u2013 Punch Drunk Love, Spanglish \u2013 I want to be able to like Adam Sandler again.
p1099
aVBut with his recent releases under Happy Madison Productions, like Jack and Jill and statutory rape comedy That\u2019s My Boy, my seed of respect for the man remains unfertilised.
p1100
aVAppropriately, Grown Ups 2 continues that arrested development.
p1101
aVSandler\u2019s \u2018A-squad\u2019 is a comedy file cabinet: Chris Rock tells the race jokes, David Spade gets the redneck gags, Kevin James stops the film five times to do a burp sneeze fart.
p1102
aVThe talents of Salma Hayek, Maya Rudolph and Maria Bello are ignored as the trio is relegated to \u201cAw\u2026 Honey\u2026\u201d housewife roles.
p1103
aVThe script contains some decent lines, but the leads dampen the delivery with a noticeable lack of energy.
p1104
aVIt\u2019s telling when the most charismatic comedic performance comes from Taylor Lautner, who embraces his alpha fraternity douchebag role with some recognisable effort.
p1105
aVBut the disturbing aspects of Grown Ups 2 are its mild attempts at sentimentality that seek to promote family values.
p1106
aVWhile the film idolises how loved ones come first, it backs that up with Sandler\u2019s character using physical violence as the most appropriate solution in situations that can be easily talked out of.
p1107
aVIn a comedy full of poorly executed humour, it makes the entire movie valueless.
p1108
aV\u2018Grown Ups 2\u2032 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p1109
aVNo stylistic trick or visual flourish is left unused in Martin Scorsese's stab at the world of gothic noir, a world he less stabs at than leaps on top of, blade in hand, and proceeds to perforate to death.
p1110
aVAs Leonardo DiCaprio's policeman investigates the disappearance of an inmate from an isolated island-bound 1950s asylum, we're subjected to lurid dream sequences, clanging sound effects, lashing rain, messed up inmates with soulful eyes, more rain, a creepy senior psychiatrist, some possible Nazi war criminals, an escaped murderer, diabolical medical experiments, and even more rain, until you're not quite sure whether it's you or the filmmakers who have lost it.
p1111
aVIs DiCaprio aboard a movie or a fairground ghost train?
p1112
aVHe's not sure, we're not sure, but Scorsese, a gleeful conductor, is too busy readying the next trapdoor surprise - viewer, behold, a plague of rats!
p1113
aV- to let us in on what he thinks he's up to.
p1114
aVIt's easy to mock, but I'm undecided on whether Shutter Island's ludicrousness is wholly a bad thing.
p1115
aVThe film clearly takes itself far too seriously given all the rat plagues and dream sequences and what have you, but it's rarely less than watchable, in the same way that a ghost train is fun for the duration and may have moments where its cheap tricks are more effective than you would afterwards like to admit.
p1116
aVIt's undeniably visually arresting, with a dark palette scattershot with queasy reds and greens, and some claustrophobic camerawork evoking the trapped sensations of the island-bound policeman.
p1117
aVIf Shutter Island were a website it would  be a Geocities fanpage dedicated to the possibility that JFK is alive and well and living in a secret government lab made of bricks fashioned from a new strain of super strong LSD by The Man, and it would be festooned with flashing icons, excitable punctuation, plenty of all-caps typing and hysterical auto-play music with no switch-off option.
p1118
aVWhile some might argue that suddenly dipping into gothic noir is a strange leftfield choice for a director at Scorsese's time of life, it's much more interesting than continuing to retread old  themes and genres that he has already mastered.
p1119
aVThat he hasn't got it quite right is hardly the point - I'd rather have seen this flawed but fascinating attempt to journey out of his comfort zone than yet another piece about male rivals getting scrappy with one another.
p1120
aVWyler's classic emotional rollercoaster focuses on three Second World War vets who return home from the conflict to find things irrevocably changed.
p1121
aVNot only are they physically disabled as a result of the War, but the families they left behind have also been marked and altered by events.
p1122
aVBy concentrating on the trio's inner conflict rather than their combat glories, Wyler paints a deeply moving picture of ordinary people struggling to repair their lives.
p1123
aVThrough these individual experiences he shows us, movingly and poignantly, the after-effects of war on humanity.
p1124
aVMarch and Andrews are both superb, but the real acting honours here go to real life amputee Russell, who gives a quite remarkable performance as Homer, the remaining member of the trio, who is struggling to cope with the loss of his hands.
p1125
aVThe contradictory notion that a film can appeal to children of all ages accidentally yielded a masterpiece - The Wizard of Oz.
p1126
aVThe Princess Bride, a lush fairytale movie adapted by William Goldman from his own novel, was not such an all-ages love-in - here, the action is continually undercut by adult knowingness that nudges towards satire.
p1127
aVThe story is nominally told to a sickly 10-year-old and emerges as a tale of adventure, but is unlikely to appeal to kids any more than the central romance.
p1128
aVWhatever its swashbuckling trappings, this is more a movie for the adult fans that adore it worldwide than for 21st century children.
p1129
aVBut with an appealing cast including memorable characters roles for Christopher Guest, Wallace Shawn, Mandy Patinkin ("Hello.
p1130
aVMy name is Inigo Montoya.
p1131
aVYou Killed my father.
p1132
aVPrepare to die.")
p1133
aVand Billy Crystal, you can see exactly why it's held in such high regard by its We Love Love The 1980s cult fanbase.
p1134
aVQuoteable, rewatchable and funny, The Princess Bride stands up two decades after its original release.
p1135
aVCowboys & Aliens, directed by Iron Man's Jon Favreau, opens with that old Western staple, the Man Of Few Words, alone in the wilderness.
p1136
aVThis particular Man Of Few Words is called Jake Lonergan, is played by Daniel Craig, and has no idea how he got way out there in the back of beyond, still less what this weird bracelet thing on his arm is all about.
p1137
aVHe's obviously one of the titular cowboys, and seems to be the subject of a bout of probably alien-related amnesia.
p1138
aVSo all we have to do now is wait for the aliens to show up and bring the fight, right?
p1139
aVSadly, most of the films best moments occur before that happens.Lest you're imagining Indiana Jones with tentacles instead of a whip, or Han Solo bursting out of somebody's chest with a ready quip, we should say from the get go that no aliens are played by the other lead-billed star, Harrison Ford.
p1140
aVFord plays Woodrow Dolarhyde, another Man Of Few Words, who quickly enacts another tradition of the old West, a fearsome grump-off, against Daniel Craig's character.
p1141
aVThe two attempt to out-grump each other from the moment they meet.
p1142
aVWho will be crowned the surliest?
p1143
aVWho's the biggest crosspatch?
p1144
aVWho needs to sit on the naughty step until he can play nicely?
p1145
aVWe never really find out, because those darned aliens ruin what for a moment there threatened to be an entertaining Western throwback.These aliens, which resemble the 'prawn' creatures of District 9, never really convince.
p1146
aVTheir motives are less alien, more piratical (there's gold in them thar hills, apparently).
p1147
aVThey ought to be tough, yet one sniff of the local Native Americans' bows 'n' arrows routine and they're less unidentified flying object, more dropping like flies.
p1148
aVAnd, crucially, we should believe our heroes are credibly in danger, something that is absolutely never the case - you feel that one glower from Butch Crankyface and the Cantankerous Kid and the space invaders would flutter whatever passes for eyelids in their species and be on their merry way, pardner.
p1149
aV\u000aI don\u2019t exactly worship Pixar, but \u201cFinding Nemo\u201d is truly a great film.
p1150
aVNow, Disney has trotted out a 3D version and that gives families an excuse to go see swell piece of animation on the big screen again.
p1151
aVNever mind I couldn\u2019t really see any significant improvements from the 3D effects.
p1152
aVOkay, it\u2019s a revenue thing.
p1153
aVEventually, every blessed Disney film will get a 3D showing.
p1154
aVAnd, that kind of makes me seasick.
p1155
aVAnyway you may remember Nemo is the tiny clown fish with a defective fin.
p1156
aVHis dad, voiced by Albert Brooks, is so concerned his little tadpole will be harmed, he never lets Nemo out of his sight.
p1157
aVThis, of course, leads to resentment.
p1158
aVNemo strikes out on his own, gets lost and then winds up in the aquarium of an Australian dentist.
p1159
aVThe story introduces youngsters to the concept of death and rising above one\u2019s disability.
p1160
aVIt\u2019s also a very entertaining tale that will NOT bore the adults.
p1161
aVOkay, score one for Pixar.
p1162
aVGrade: A\u000aFast Facts:\u000a3D Release Date: September 14, 2012\u000aOriginal Release Date: May 30, 2003\u000a3D Blu-ray Release Date: December 4, 2012\u000aRuntime: 100 minutes\u000aRated: G\u000a\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1163
aV\u000aPixar continue the trend of producing American cinema's finest family entertainment with Finding Nemo, which consists of two stories in parallel: one a quest, the other an escape story (which has passing similarities with Chicken Run).
p1164
aVBoth begin at home on the reef, where Marlin (voiced by Brooks) obsesses over his Nemo (Gould), his only remaining family as a result of a predator snaffling his wife and all but one of their "over 400 eggs".
p1165
aVSick of his father's over-protectiveness ("I promise I will never let anything happen to you," Marlin declared to his last egg), Nemo ventures beyond the reef's "drop-off" into open water.
p1166
aVBad timing - he's taken by divers and finds himself in a tank in a dentist's surgery in Sydney.
p1167
aVThere, he's befriended by the other residents, including starfish Peach (Janney) and Moorish Idol fish Gill (Dafoe), the leader of the tank community who's constantly planning escape attempts (mainly fixated with the toilet - "All drains lead to the ocean!").
p1168
aVThey're a good bunch, but Nemo is depressed.
p1169
aVWorst still, he's due to become a pet to the dentist's sadistic "fish-killer" niece.
p1170
aVSo the escape plans become more desperate.
p1171
aVMarlin, though he doesn't know it, has a race against time.
p1172
aVAs his quest starts, Marlin meets Dory (DeGeneres), a thoroughly forgetful blue tang fish.
p1173
aV"Is this some kind of practical joke?"
p1174
aVMarlin asks of her supposed idiocy.
p1175
aV"I suffer from short-term memory.
p1176
aVIt runs in my family.
p1177
aVAt least I think it does," she replies.
p1178
aVFinding a mask dropped by one of the divers who took Nemo, the pair head for an address in Sydney.
p1179
aVA plot based on travelling the ocean allows Pixar to indulge in a wonderful array of scenarios and characterisation.
p1180
aVSo, the pair meet three Aussie sharks (Humphries, Bana, Spence), who have a self-help collective where they get together to renew their vows - as Humphries' Great White Bruce puts it: "I am a nice shark, not a mindless eating machine.
p1181
aVFish are friends not food."
p1182
aVThen they encounter a shoal that does impressions by forming the shapes of things - including poor, miserable Marlin himself - becoming an arrow to point them to the East Australian Current.
p1183
aVA more dangerous situation arises when the pair find themselves in the thick of a mass of jellyfish.
p1184
aVRelief is then provided by a group of turtles riding the current, like surfers.
p1185
aVIndeed, Crush the turtle is voiced by writer-director Andrew Stanton in true surfer-stoner style ("Taking on the jellies - you've got serious thrill issues, dude.
p1186
aVAwesome.").
p1187
aVThere's also a pelican, Nigel, voiced by Rush, who helps out Marlin and Dory because he's enjoying their saga and wants to spite the greedy seagulls.
p1188
aVIt's great stuff - vivid, imaginative, wonderfully voiced by all involved and, this being Pixar, it's also cheeky.
p1189
aVThere's a sly dig at the habit in Disney films for characters to burst into song: when Dory tries to comfort Marlin with a tune, he says "Dory - no singing!"
p1190
aVThere are few fart and wee gags ("Don't you people realise we are swimming in our own sh..." says one of the tank fish during an escape plan that involves breaking the filter.
p1191
aV"Shhhhh, here we go!").
p1192
aVThere's even a very gentle knocking of the US ("Humans, they think they own everything."
p1193
aV"Probably American.").
p1194
aVThe biggest laugh comes with Dory speaking whale language (several dialects of it, in fact).
p1195
aVExasperated by her awful noises, Marlin says: "Dory - this is not 'whale'.
p1196
aVYou're speaking like an upset stomach."
p1197
aVThe filmmakers - headed up by Stanton, who also co-wrote and co-directed 1998's A Bug's Life - even manage to squeeze in some neat film references: among them The Shining (Bruce bursting through a door in a sub wreck - "Heeeeere's Brucie!
p1198
aV"), The Birds (a high angle view of gulls crowding), and The Perfect Storm (a fishing boat during the denouement).\u000a
p1199
aVSince 'misery memoirs' are now as grimly familiar as the daytime TV shows that have popularized them in recent years, it's little wonder the phrase has become banal almost to the point of meaninglessness.
p1200
aVFeaturing some of the most relentlessly grim production design in recent British cinema and a protagonist who suffers cruel violence from most people he encounters in the film, Nic Moran's adaptation of Kevin Lewis' best-selling autobiographical novels is a stark reminder of its true sense.
p1201
aVFrom the moment we meet Kevin, dumped on a roadside following a savage beating, he's bruised and battered, and - whether through extended flashbacks to his brutally abusive childhood, or in his adult life as a bare-knuckle boxer forced to inhabit London's criminal underworld - rarely a scene goes by where he's not used as a punchbag.
p1202
aVThe effect of portraying such extreme, sustained violence inevitably verges - at best - on the numbing, but here it's the air of parody that's most problematic.
p1203
aVIf you sat down to watch The Kid, blissfully unaware it was modeled on fact rather than fiction, the queasily familiar story arc (mistreated, deprived but bright boy finds love and comes good), characters (inspiring young English teacher makes Shakespeare cool) and motifs (Kevin's only solace is classical music, listened to on Walkman given to him by inspiring young English teacher) would probably make you scoff.
p1204
aVNor does it help that the abominably miscast Natascha McElhone, as Kevin's unhinged mother and chief abuser - fully 'uglied' up, in false teeth, NHS glasses, housecoat, with fag drooping from perma-snarl and a bawling baby surgically attached to her person - is played as a one-dimensional pantomime villain with shades of Janet Street Porter.
p1205
aVRupert Friend's own performance as the fey, softly spoken Kevin is also slightly baffling.
p1206
aVThough final reel footage, of a TV piece featuring Lewis on the sofa with - you've guessed it - Fern Britton, reveals his impersonation to be spot-on.
p1207
aVStill, as with his mother's characterization, though we're supposedly being told Kevin's story through his own eyes, we're in fact only ever shown it - and very opaquely at that.
p1208
aVHis motivations and the source of the evidently remarkable inner strength required for him to transcend his tragic upbringing, even after spending nearly two hours in his company, remain a mystery.\u000a																
p1209
aVThe first of four collaborations between Alfred Hitchcock and David O. Selznick, the legendary producer of Gone With The Wind, was the setting for a clash of two titanic egos.
p1210
aVThey slugged it out for overall creative control of the film, each complaining of interference from the other and both men stated that they had misgivings about the final results.
p1211
aVThey were just about the only doubters, however, as the film proved to be a box office smash as well as garnering no fewer than 11 Oscar nominations (winning two).
p1212
aVIf anything, it's even more appealing today, with the beautifully photographed cars, clothing and scenery providing a handsome evocation of a lost era, in addition to the timeless quality of the excellent storytelling.
p1213
aVUnusually for a Hitchcock film, the screenplay sticks closely to the source novel.
p1214
aVThis is no bad thing as the story is so good and already provides Hitch plenty of opportunity for his particular brand of dark psychological exploration and steadily cranked tension.
p1215
aVThe young wife (Fontaine) of Maxim De Winter (Olivier), the handsome, rich and temperamental owner of the huge stately home Manderley, is struggling to come to terms with her new life.
p1216
aVShe's haunted by the legacy of Maxim's deceased first wife Rebecca and overawed by her housekeeper, the icy and terrifying Mrs Danvers (Anderson).
p1217
aVShe's totally unaware of Rebecca's true nature, however, and that Maxim is concealing a secret that has the potential to destroy him.
p1218
aVFor once Laurence Olivier doesn't ham it up, delivering a clipped, splendidly moody and even subtle performance.
p1219
aVWhat's more, and equally rare for the great thesp, he imbues his character with great natural warmth, ensuring our sympathy stays with him, no matter how great his crimes seem to be.
p1220
aVOlivier's chemistry with Joan Fontaine sets the screen alight - an impressive achievement if credence is given to the stories that he barely had the time of day for the actress, furious that Vivien Leigh (his first choice for the role and girlfriend at the time) didn't get the part.Naturally, Hitchcock is said to have used this situation to his advantage, teasing the young ingénue Fontaine (she was just 21) mercilessly, while encouraging the rest of the cast to treat her coldly.
p1221
aVThe tactic led to a performance that strikes just the right tone of diffidence, nerviness and downright terror and goes a long way to proving that the young star was far more than just a pretty face.
p1222
aVThe biggest acting credit has to go to Judith Anderson, however, whose steel-faced spectral Mrs Danvers casts a dark shadow in every scene she appears in and has quite rightly become a cinema icon.
p1223
aVEverything else works too.
p1224
aVThere's crisp black-and-white cinematography, a script loaded with morbid humour and sharp dialogue as well and a terrific score used with Hitchcock's usual precision to create a delicious sense of suspense and unease.
p1225
aVIt all combines to create an atmospheric gem, that's as enjoyable as it is impressive.\u000a																
p1226
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aJust when the ultra-ironic, ultra-violent thriller seemed to have been done to death by Tarantino and his acolytes, along came the Coen brothers to breathe fresh life into the genre.
p1227
aVDavid Mamet-favourite Macy is wonderfully weak and wicked as Jerry Lundegaard the Swedish-American car-salesman whose attempts to mastermind the perfect crime - the kidnapping of his wife - go horribly, violently and hilariously wrong.
p1228
aVFor a start he has hired two trigger-happy crooks, the verbose Carl (Buscemi) and the taciturn Gaear (Stormare) to carry out the kidnapping.
p1229
aVPretty soon people are starting to get shot and this attracts the attention of the smart, pregnant police chief Marge Gunderson (McDormand, who deservedly won an Academy Award for her tough, funny, touching performance).
p1230
aVWith its central plot strand of the well-planned crime spiralling wildly out of control, the film investigates similar territory to the Coen brothers' brilliant debut Blood Simple, but Fargo is a more assured work, lighter and more layered.
p1231
aVThe cast, boasting at least three scene-stealing performances (Macy, McDormand and Buscemi), are on top form.
p1232
aVThe film manages the neat trick of trumping Tarantino by not merely being filled with laughs and slickly handled, literally visceral action sequences, but also presenting rounded, recognizably human characters.
p1233
aV\u000aIt's difficult to say anything about The Godfather that hasn't been said already, but know this: it is a geniune cinematic masterpiece, and rightly deserves its revered status.
p1234
aVReleased in 1972 in what's considered to be a golden era for film, The Godfather had somewhat humble beginnings.
p1235
aVBased on the Mario Puzo novel, the film was initially rejected by a number of directors before being handed to Francis Ford Coppola when he was still a 31-year-old Hollywood up-and-comer.
p1236
aVIt's to Coppola's credit that, despite fights with Paramount and the constant threat of being fired, he managed to craft a critically and commercially lauded film that set a new benchmark for Hollywood epics.
p1237
aVAs with any film of its stature, The Godfather has embedded itself so deeply into popular culture that you can feel you've viewed the film several times without ever having watched a single frame.
p1238
aVThe horse's head in the bed; Marlon Brando's distinctive mumbling; the evocative theme music; classic quotes such as "I'm gonna make him an offer he can't refuse" - it's all here.
p1239
aVThe Godfather is much more than fodder for bad parodies, though.
p1240
aVIt is testament to this engaging and intricate film's quality that the three hour running time is a blessing rather than a curse.
p1241
aVThe detailed plot revolves around the Corleone family, Italian immigrants that have been guided to Mafia supremacy through the questionable "business" dealings of family head Don Vito Corleone (Brando in an Oscar winning role).
p1242
aVA fresh-faced Al Pacino undertakes his first big starring role as Michael Corleone, son of Vito and recent returnee from the battlefields of WWII.
p1243
aVWhat distances Michael from his family, however, is a desire to go legit - a wish supported by the Don who has dreams of Michael becoming a Senator.
p1244
aVAs is the case when your lifestyle mainly revolves around blackmail, robbery and murder, things soon go awry: Vito's reign is challenged by other Mafia families intent on getting a slice of the ever-growing drug trade.
p1245
aVDon Vito's refusal to deal in narcotics leads to a lengthy feud that has irreversible repercussions for the entire Corleone clan - particularly the increasingly ruthless Michael.
p1246
aVFeaturing note-perfect performances from everyone involved, a brilliantly written Oscar-winning script from Coppola and Puzo and deft direction, The Godfather satisfies film lovers on any number of levels and will have them salivating in anticipation of the equally brilliant (and, for many, superior) Part II of the trilogy.
p1247
aVIn a nutshell: A multi-generational epic that never leaves the audience less than enthralled, this is the godfather of all gangster films\u000a\u000a
p1248
aV\u000aMia Wasikowska is the new girl in Hollywood in \u201cMaps to the Stars.\u201d\u000a\u201cMaps to the Stars\u201d is more about obsessed celebrities than celebrity obsession, so perhaps the title isn\u2019t appropriate.
p1249
aVHollywood breathes a special kind of oxygen, and director David Cronenberg attempts to satirize the goings-on.
p1250
aVBut, his efforts to mock show business are just so much vinegar and vulgarity.
p1251
aVNothing funny or enlightening in this portrayal of the entertainment industry.
p1252
aVBig problem: The film lacks a protagonist.
p1253
aVYou could argue that limousine driver Jerome Fontana (Robert Pattinson) fits the bill.
p1254
aVBut, very little of the story bounces off his character.
p1255
aVThe other roles, Havana Segrand (Julianne Moore), Agatha Weiss (Mia Wasikowska), Dr. Stafford Weiss (John Cusack), Cristina Weiss (Olivia Williams) and Benjie Weiss (Evan Bird) are living too hard in their freaky worlds for anyone to climb into their skins.
p1256
aV\u201cMaps to the Stars\u201d is absurdist cinema.
p1257
aVHavana is a washed-up actress hoping to get back into the game by starring in a remake of the film that made her late mother famous.
p1258
aVShe frequently hallucinates a younger version of her mother.
p1259
aVAgatha (Wasikowska) becomes Havana\u2019s personal assistant shortly after arriving in L.A.  Agatha knows Carrie Fisher (cameo appearance) through Twitter, and Fisher recommends her to Havana.
p1260
aVDr. Weiss is a celebrity psychologist who gives personal life lessons and training to Havana.
p1261
aVCristina, Stafford\u2019s wife, obsesses over the acting career of her son, Benjie.
p1262
aVThe teen sensation (Bird) is a horse\u2019s ass in real life.
p1263
aVAfter a stint in rehab, he\u2019s now ready to resume his superstar life in a franchise film series called \u201cBad Babysitter.\u201d Everyone behaves badly.
p1264
aVEveryone seems to be in an incestuous relationship, some are quite literally.
p1265
aVDespite some fine performances, \u201cMaps to the Stars\u201d fails to entertain or even make sense, at times.
p1266
aVIt\u2019s more odd than comical.
p1267
aVIt\u2019s peculiar without being droll.
p1268
aVThe film needed a satisfactory POV.
p1269
aVInstead, there\u2019s only a disconnect with the characters.
p1270
aVGrade: C-\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: April 14, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 112 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cR\u201d for strong disturbing violence and sexual content, graphic nudity, language and some drug material\u000aReleased by Universal Pictures Home Entertainment\u000aJohn Cusack plays a TV psychologist in \u201cMaps to the Stars.\u201d\u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1271
aVThe crew are at the receiving end of a seemingly obscure command structure, and orders often make less and less sense as they are filtered down to the front line.
p1272
aVExperiencing the war first-hand, the tired and edgy crew have little chance to relax, as the enemy could be lurking anywhere beyond the steel hull of the creaking submarine.
p1273
aVDirector Petersen exploits his claustrophobic setting to maximum effect, paradoxically using a steady-cam which rushes through the cramped interior only adding to the sense of isolation.
p1274
aVWhile the anti-war message isn't much to write home about, Das Boot (The Boat) still makes compulsive viewing.
p1275
aVBut the truth is simple: what makes it (and the TV series) float are the soap opera mechanics.
p1276
aV\u000aMel Gibson produces, directs and stars in this fictionalisation of the story of William Wallace (from the pen of Randall Wallace) and cops a barrel-load of Oscars for his trouble.
p1277
aVThis is three hours' worth of gripping drama, which spares nothing on either the visceral or the emotional front (the ending is genuine lump-in-the-throat stuff).
p1278
aVBraveheart may have its critics (and its biggest fans are nationalists), but there's no denying this is an achievement.
p1279
aVIt's a film that weaves a fascinating trail through the 14th century while delivering breathtaking (and breathtakingly violent) battle scenes and some haunting plot lines (notably the appearance of Catherine McCormack as the ghost of Wallace's murdered wife).\u000a
p1280
aV"Mrs Robinson, you're trying to seduce me... aren't you?"
p1281
aVmuttered young college graduate Benjamin (Hoffman) to middle-aged Mrs Robinson (Bancroft).
p1282
aVAnd thus one of the most famous seduction scenes in the movies was born.
p1283
aVAs well as the blistering script, it's the cast that make Mike Nichols' film positively sing.
p1284
aVHoffman was perfectly cast (legend has it that Robert Redford was originally offered the role) as the jaw-droppingly naive Benjamin.
p1285
aVKatherine Ross is demure as Elaine, while Bancroft - who is only six years older than Hoffman in real life - got the part of a lifetime, and knew exactly what to do with it (and has not been bettered by the actresses who have attempted the role in the theatre version).
p1286
aVThrow in Simon and Garfunkel's fitting soundtrack and a host of skilled supporting actors - including William Daniels, Walter Brooke (who mutters the immortal advice, "Plastics!")
p1287
aVand Murray Hamilton - then sit back and enjoy one of the classic films of the 1960s.
p1288
aVThe Graduate is devoid of dope, rock music, flower power and politics, but manages to encapsulate the 1960s nevertheless.
p1289
aVWinner of 10 Oscars, hugely successful at the box office, containing one of the most quoted lines from the movies... With its place in film history assured, there is a distinct air of never mind the quality, feel the width when watching this with the cynical eyes of the modern viewer.
p1290
aVHugely expensive for its time, it has every dollar evident on screen, and it is easy to be seduced by its sumptuous visuals, to feel the heat of Atlanta burning.
p1291
aVBut this is Hollywood style over substance writ large, almost casually sexist and racist, using the Civil War as a convenient backdrop without ever addressing its social or historical significance.
p1292
aVDissecting it further, the plot is pure soap opera and the acting, particularly from Gable, is often wooden.
p1293
aVHollow and tasteless, it would be difficult to get angry about if it were not glorified and revisited so often.
p1294
aV"I'm really thirsty.
p1295
aVWhen I was a kid I used to dehydrate, and my piss came out like snot.
p1296
aVI mean, it was all thick and gross."
p1297
aVJust a throwaway piece of dialogue from Christopher McQuarrie's otherwise quotable Oscar-winning screenplay for The Usual Suspects.
p1298
aVWatch Bryan Singer's awesome neo-noir a second time and you might find that this seemingly extraneous information gives a big clue to the real identity of arch criminal Keyser Soze.
p1299
aVIt's now often the case with cult films that their popularity stems from the need to subject them to the sort of examination usually reserved for the Patterson Bigfoot film.
p1300
aVBut while many films might claim that only repeat viewers will understand the storyline, The Usual Suspects really does reward those prepared to put it under the microscope a second, third or fourth time.
p1301
aVAnd we're not talking about some phoney mystery here - of the sort at the heart of The Big Sleep, a story so dense not even its author Raymond Chandler could understand it.
p1302
aVThe Usual Suspects presents all the clues.
p1303
aVIt just happens to also provide more than one solution.
p1304
aV"Five criminals.
p1305
aVOne line-up.
p1306
aVNo coincidence."
p1307
aVThe Usual Suspects' tagline neatly summed up what seemed to be a pretty simple situation.
p1308
aVThe suspects in question include Dean Keaton (Gabriel Byrne), a copper-turned-con who some believe might hold domain over the criminal underworld, and Roger 'Verbal' Kint (Kevin Spacey), a meek crippled conman who is one of two men to survive a shoot out in an LA harbour.
p1309
aVBrought in for questioning by customs agent Dave Kujan (Chazz Palminteri), 'Verbal' explains the events leading up to him, Keaton and the three other cons being in LA that evening.
p1310
aVAnd as he talks, Kujan becomes convinced that Kint can finger Keyser Soze, a bad guy who could even spook James Bond.
p1311
aVAny crime movie where the cop is played by Chazz Palminteri - one the movie world's favourite Mafiosi - is a pretty interesting proposition.
p1312
aVIndeed, with so many of the cast being equally at home playing heroes or villains, the mystery at the heart of The Usual Suspects is treacle thick and twice as sticky.
p1313
aVThe film that introduced the wider world to Bencio Del Toro, Singer's film features career-best work from Byrne, Kevin Pollack and Steve Baldwin, three actors who might be bigger were they always as good as they are here.
p1314
aVThe film also throws some interesting curve-balls in the shape of cameos from Suzy Amis as the lawyer for whom Keaton has given up his life of crime, Giancarlo Espositio as a no-nonsense cop and an uncredited Peter Greene as the charismatic fence Redfoot.
p1315
aVThere's even a brief appearance by the late great actor-director Paul Bartel to muddy the water that little bit further.
p1316
aVOf course, the lion's share of the praise should go to Kevin Spacey who rightly won an Oscar albeit in the wrong category (Verbal is in no sense a supporting role) and McQuarrie who wrote the script in his early twenties while working for a law firm.
p1317
aVAs for Singer being overlooked for his contribution, it's a crime on the same scale as the one carried out in the final reel.
p1318
aVThat all three have struggled (or, in the case of McQuarrie, completely failed) to top their work here is as disappointing as it is to be expected.
p1319
aVFor had it been made 40 years ago by a genre legend like Howard Hawks , we'd be talking about The Usual Suspects as a bona fide movie milestone.
p1320
aVThat's the scale of the achievement on show here, the cinema equivalent of scaling Everest.
p1321
aV\u000aChadwick Boseman definitely feels the vibe that was James Brown in \u201cGet On Up.\u201d\u000aHard to imagine anyone else in the role of singer James Brown than actor Chadwick Boseman.
p1322
aVHe nails it.
p1323
aVBozeman rises above the material in \u201cGet On Up,\u201d now in its home entertainment release.
p1324
aVYou may not like the way the story is presented, but you can certainly appreciate the talent involved.
p1325
aVThe hardest working man in show business lived a complicated life, but that was no reason to make his story hard to follow.
p1326
aVThe screenplay bounces like a ping-pong ball from childhood to prison to manhood to early showbiz to late showbiz to Brown\u2019s mental problems.
p1327
aVIt makes you want to scream out for a more linear approach.
p1328
aVThere\u2019s nothing wrong with flashbacks and flash forwards.
p1329
aVMost movies use at least a flashback or two to help tell their stories.
p1330
aVBut, \u201cGet On Up\u201d turns Brown\u2019s life into popcorn.
p1331
aVIt\u2019s like catching the kernels as they jump out of the pan.
p1332
aVUnless you\u2019re already familiar with the singer\u2019s life, it\u2019s confusing.
p1333
aVSo many people were a part of this man\u2019s history.
p1334
aVIt deserved a better telling.
p1335
aVSo, let\u2019s cover the positive.
p1336
aVBoseman.
p1337
aVThe guy has talent, and it\u2019s on display.
p1338
aVHe captures Brown from start to finish.
p1339
aVFrom his early convictions that he could be something special to the excesses of super-stardom.
p1340
aVBozeman shows us the doubts, the confidence, the flamboyance, the regrets and the talent (including some amazing dance moves) that made Brown a living legend.
p1341
aVThe story doesn\u2019t give us much about Brown\u2019s political activism, although it shows him convincing the mayor of Boston that he should allow Brown\u2019s concert to go ahead shortly after the Reverend Martin Luther King, Jr.\u2019s assassination.
p1342
aVIt also shows that very concert getting out of hand and how Brown brought things back under control.
p1343
aVThe supporting cast in \u201cGet On Up\u201d is excellent, especially a small scene with Brandon Mychal Smith as Little Richard.
p1344
aVNow, I\u2019m ready to see Little Richard\u2019s story.
p1345
aVLike Boseman, Smith carried the role.
p1346
aVYou may not like the way the story is presented, but \u201cGet On Up\u201d gives you insights into Brown\u2019s life.
p1347
aVIt\u2019s worth the time of anyone who loves the Godfather of Soul.
p1348
aVGrade: B+\u000a\u201cGet On Up\u201d has great acting, but needed more of a linear storyline.
p1349
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1350
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aGet On Up is at once the most unconventional biopic I\u2019ve ever seen, and a shaggy composite of all of them.
p1351
aVThe only real difference is James Brown \u2013 but what a difference James Brown makes.
p1352
aVChadwick Boseman dazzles as \u201cThe Godfather of Soul\u201d in a performance more Oscar-worthy than Jamie Foxx\u2019s Ray or Will Smith\u2019s Ali.
p1353
aVHe channels both the great man and the demons that chased Brown straight onto the stage, moving deftly between showman, manipulator and lost soul.
p1354
aVInitially Get On Up threatens to be an extended SNL send-up, with an opening scene depicting a confused latter-era Brown holding a room full of seminar attendees to ransom with a shotgun because one of them used his bathroom (a true story by all accounts).
p1355
aVThankfully that\u2019s followed by a more dynamic portrayal of a conflicted and gifted man, punctuated with musical set pieces that are among the best ever created for the screen.
p1356
aVIt is with the deepest sympathy then that I understand director Tate Taylor\u2019s reluctance to leave anything on the cutting room floor, but at 140 minutes a more judicious edit would have served it well.
p1357
aVStylistically, there are perhaps too many devices \u2013 a broken fourth wall, time-lapse photography, the introduction of chapters with titles, which are presented in a non-linear fashion.
p1358
aVWith so much going on the pacing loses its rhythm (there\u2019s no funk in the edit, ironically).
p1359
aVAs a result, a lot of what could have been great comedy dialogue falls flaccid, which is a wasted opportunity when you think of how hilarious Brown was as a public figure (see Eddie Murphy\u2019s Delirious for cliff notes).
p1360
aVGreat performances are let down by some untidy production but it\u2019s a thrilling ride nonetheless.
p1361
aV\u2018Get On Up\u2019 movie times\u000a\u000a
p1362
aV\u000a\u000aConsidering it\u2019s a movie about one of the most iconic, controversial and genius figures of the last century, Get On Up has received curiously little hype.
p1363
aVThat comes despite the fact that it appears to have all the right ingredients: a director with bona fides in drawing a solid film from society\u2019s racial past (The Help), a lead actor with the chops to handle a major transformation (Chadwick Boseman, who also played baseball\u2019s barrier-breaker Jackie Robinson in the biopic 42), and a producer who was an associate of the figure in question (Mick Jagger).
p1364
aVIt\u2019s too bad, then, that Get On Up comes off like a checklist guide of how not to make a quality biopic.
p1365
aVHere are the lessons for future biopic makers.
p1366
aV1.
p1367
aVDon\u2019t ignore the coke addiction and domestic abuse!
p1368
aVThe Godfather of Soul is a complicated figure\u2014evinced by his many, many nicknames\u2014and it was always going to be nearly impossible to take a man best known for transcending stages and capture his essence between the four sides of a big screen.
p1369
aVHe cultivated a huge number of backing musicians who went on to be prominent artists; he was a generous and largely kind-hearted man to his friends, family and children; he was a creative genius with a massive ego that was frankly well-earned, helping to birth rap music with his 1969 Funky Drummer being the most sampled beat in hip-hop; he was a racial conciliator who, in one of Get On Up\u2018s finest scenes, arguably prevented Boston from rioting in the immediate wake of Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.\u2019s death.
p1370
aVBut he was also a brutal tyrant to his band, who rode on a bus as he took a plane, and he fined them for their mistakes, with his points and hand gestures on stage doubling as notation of band error.
p1371
aVHe regularly used PCP and cocaine, a hard-drug problem that was only passingly alluded to in the film by a single shot of Brown rolling cocaine into a cigarette after a personal tragedy.
p1372
aVHis relationship with rap was complicated, but not more so than his positions on race: he revered senator Strom Thurmond\u2014who ran for president as a Dixiecrat, to oppose desegregation\u2013saying that he was \u201clike a grandfather.\u201d In the film, racial differences and inequality are largely reduced to punchlines.
p1373
aVHe was the Hardest Working Man in Show Business.
p1374
aVThat comes with a price\u2014but so much of the film implies that his life and career was essentially an easy coronation, when the reality was so different.
p1375
aVInstead of showing his frustrations with a label who refused to give him any meaningful creative control in the early \u201960s, forcing him into the groundbreaking tactics of starting his own label and distribution firm, Get On Up makes it feel like it was an easy fait accompli that he was able to pull off.
p1376
aVHe had to push to get heard, push to have his unique sound succeed, and at times push away the people he cared for the most, which can help explain the wild, sad descent of his later years\u2014little of which was represented by the film.
p1377
aVAnd by not doing it, the effect is similar to watching his remarkable performances on YouTube as well as the depressing, rambling, context-free interviews of his later days.
p1378
aVHagiography, for James Brown, actually does the man a disservice.
p1379
aV2.
p1380
aVJust tell the bloody story.
p1381
aVIt\u2019s not nearly as bad as Wired\u2014the gonzo retelling of the life of John Belushi, curiously told through the perspective of Watergate newsman/Belushi biographer Bob Woodward\u2014but Get On Up frames its story by starting with an inexplicable opening scene of him brandishing a shotgun in an office (details largely fictionalized); Boseman\u2019s Brown even breaks the fourth wall at least three times, which is so rarely a good decision.
p1382
aVIts back-and-forth travels through all but the last decade of Brown\u2019s life might have worked if it showed something more profound about the machinations of the man.
p1383
aVInstead it highlights the movie\u2019s lack of thesis.
p1384
aVThere is, for instance, a moving scene near the end featuring Brown\u2019s mother, who abandoned him when he was young, but it comes so abruptly that it takes a minute to realize what it is you\u2019re even seeing.
p1385
aVAnd in one of the final scenes, Boseman\u2019s Brown heads for a stage while thinking out loud, \u201cI paid the cost to be the boss,\u201d a classic Brownism.
p1386
aVBut in the movie, he has paid no cost at all.
p1387
aVThe better approach: Narrow the focus to hone into one aspect, or a few major moments, of the person\u2019s life.
p1388
aVLincoln, for instance, eschews the retelling of the president\u2019s rise, opting instead to reflect his character through the single storyline of the congressional fight to end slavery.
p1389
aV3.
p1390
aVDon\u2019t fall in love with your own star.
p1391
aVIt may be the biggest saving grace of Get On Up: the fact that Boseman is a more than capable Brown imitator, embodying his tics, his growl, his bouffant hair, that regal chin, his assuredness in his body\u2019s electric motions, his supreme swagger.
p1392
aVWithout that\u2014and some excellent performances by Nelsan Ellis and Viola Davis, the film would be nearly joyless.
p1393
aVBut in a way, that\u2019s also its downfall\u2014the film is so clearly in awe of Boseman\u2019s performance that it relies on them at the expense of everything else.
p1394
aVIt\u2019s an easy mistake to make in a biopic.
p1395
aVConsider Jamie Foxx\u2019s role in Ray, Will Smith\u2019s portrayal of Muhammad Ali, or Ben Kingsley\u2019s embodiment of Mahatma Gandhi: modern biopics tend to build out from how well the lead can emulate the title figure, and work from there.
p1396
aVIt\u2019s usually a good thing (unless they fail: see Colin Farrell in Alexander).
p1397
aVBut here it just masks the weakness of the underlying film\u2014as Meryl Streep\u2019s Margaret Thatcher did in The Iron Lady.
p1398
aV4.
p1399
aVYou can\u2019t be everything to everyone\u000aIf Get On Up was made for people who had a serious grounding in funk music, it would mean something that we were seeing portrayals of Pee Wee Ellis and Maceo Parker, who the film largely depicted as self-centred.
p1400
aVAnd if it was, it might not need this end title card that comes up at the film\u2019s conclusion: \u201cJames Brown was considered one of the most popular artists of all time.\u201d Anyone with zero knowledge of James Brown leaves the film without a meaningful sense of just how hard Brown really worked, just how hard it was for Brown to wrest creative control, just how low things got before his late-life renaissance, and just how deeply Brown\u2019s influence is still felt today on pop culture, in the disco, funk and rap genres he helped birth as well as on modern performers\u2019 stagecraft.
p1401
aV5.
p1402
aVDon\u2019t put yourself in it, for god\u2019s sake\u000aIt\u2019s always a good idea to have someone who knows the figure to make sure that the facts are mostly right, and the narrative is true to itself.
p1403
aVTo Mick Jagger\u2019s credit, this film wouldn\u2019t have happened if it wasn\u2019t for his ability to clear the rights, and his experiences playing with and being inspired by Brown come from some authority.
p1404
aVBut Jagger wasn\u2019t really all that close with Brown.
p1405
aVTake his fondest memory from the last time he saw Brown live, from an interview with the Huffington Post: \u201cI saw him at a show in Cleveland.
p1406
aVI can\u2019t remember when, but we were both there together.
p1407
aVI went to see his show, and he came to see me.
p1408
aVWe had a good time.\u201d Moving stuff.
p1409
aVNevertheless, there\u2019s a scene in the already-lengthy Get On Up where an actor playing young Jagger nods knowingly at Brown.
p1410
aV\u201cI want it to be true to him,\u201d Jagger told USA Today about the film.
p1411
aVIn this, he certainly failed.
p1412
aVTwitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse biopicsGet on UpJames Brown \u000a\u000a\u000a
p1413
aV\u000aAdapted by Tina Fey from Rosalind Wiseman's guide to teen living 'Queen Bees And Wannabes', Mean Girls takes a sledgehammer to everything from cliques to status anxiety.
p1414
aVOur companion on this journey through the depressing world of the American teen is Cady (Lindsay Lohan), who discovers that her upbringing in the wilds of Africa is far from adequate preparation for surviving the rigours of the urban academic jungle.
p1415
aVThat said, she doesn't help herself by ditching the mates she makes on the first day to hang out with The Plastics, a clique run by the formidable Regina (Rachel McAdams).
p1416
aVWhat follows is a tale packed with the type of betrayal and double-cross you'd usually only find in the most incident-packed thriller.
p1417
aVAnd since so many of the characters are winningly played, we're obliged to give a damn about the reversals that affect these young souls and their fragile relationships.
p1418
aVWith Lohan building on her good work in Freaky Friday, McAdams, Lacey Chabert and Amanda Seyfried make for the best bitch posse from hell since the Heathers.
p1419
aVThere are also nice supporting turns from Saturday Night Live regulars Fey, Amy Poehler and Tim Meadows.
p1420
aVOf course, since Mean Girls is a Saturday Night Live production, the drama is served up with tons of gags, which are mainly very funny.
p1421
aVFrom tragic shopping addictions to basic teen stupidity, Waters and Fey mine original humour from these and other familiar topics.
p1422
aVAnd while they have plenty of satirical fun, writer and director never let the social comment get in the way of a good knob gag.
p1423
aVFind out where Mean Girls placed in Charlie Lyne's Top 20 Teen Movies\u000a \u000a
p1424
aVIn which Willis's vest-wearing hero cop John McClane once again finds himself at the centre of a terrorist nightmare.
p1425
aVThis time the bad guys take over an airport that his wife's plane is about to fly into.
p1426
aVA superior action sequel that not only delivers thrills on a grand scale (the moving walkway sequence is a masterpiece of taut, clever direction), but also remembers to question the absurdity of its situation.
p1427
aVAs McClane points out, 'How can the same shit happen to the same guy twice?'
p1428
aVTom Hanks is the heroic dunce living through America's recent history in Robert Zemeckis' multi-Oscar winning comedy-drama.
p1429
aVTop-notch performances and some impressive visual trickery contribute to one of the populist triumphs of the 90s.
p1430
aVFew mainstream movies of the 90s polarised opinion more effectively than this.
p1431
aVAlthough a winner of six Oscars and nominated for half-a-dozen more, for many it's a schmaltzy tribute to a mythical American dream.
p1432
aVFor others it's a film dedicated to the triumph of innocence over cynicism.
p1433
aVWhichever side you're on, there's no denying director Zemeckis' achievement, and it's a hard heart that resists the child-like charm of Tom Hanks' dopey hero.
p1434
aVGrowing up in 50s Alabama, Forrest overcomes an IQ of 75 to achieve success in a unlikely range of fields (Vietnam hero, sports celebrity, shrimp tycoon).
p1435
aVForrest's optimism and virtue stand in stark contrast to a nation torn apart by corruption and war.
p1436
aVCunningly doctored contemporary footage has him meeting Kennedy, Nixon and Lennon.
p1437
aVThe fate of his childhood sweetheart, Jenny (Wright), goes some way to illustrating the dark side of the 60s.
p1438
aVDespite the simplicity of Forrest, the film is inventively structured and peppered with little ironies.
p1439
aVMaintaining an expression of intense concentration, Hanks gives a performance that is among his best.
p1440
aVIgnore the liberal hand-wringing and accusations of conservative moralising about this film.
p1441
aVRather this is an old fashioned fable in which good things sometimes happen to people if they're nice.
p1442
aVAnd what's so objectionable about that?\u000a																
p1443
aVWhen the flicker of the projector's lights on the dust in front of the screen is more entertaining than the pictures it's projecting, you know you're in trouble.
p1444
aVWith Grown Ups, Adam Sandler offers all the usual ingredients that made him popular, yet its lazy, slapped-together feel is totally devoid of vim and vigour.
p1445
aVIt's hard to imagine how a comedy could be any worse.
p1446
aVSandler plays a successful film agent with spoilt kids and Salma Hayek for a wife (where did her career go wrong?).
p1447
aVChris Rock is the brow-beaten house frau and David Spade is the boozy, sleazy bachelor.
p1448
aVIt's a simple and puerile world.
p1449
aVA world in which the funniest emission a person can make is from their bottom and a world where there are only three types of women: wives who stop men having fun and living the lives they want to live, girls in tiny bikinis and ugly women, whose sub-genres include fat, hairy and old.
p1450
aVIt's difficult to see who this film is aimed at.
p1451
aVIt's far too banal, silly and tedious to appeal to an adult audience, and the basic concept of five adults attempting to reconnect after 30 years of sparse contact won't resonate with younger audiences.
p1452
aVFrom the off it plays like a collection of private jokes (and jokes about privates), fart jokes, long scenes involving jokes about hair, ears and weight, and people falling over into an array of things you wouldn't want to fall into.
p1453
aVOf course, important lessons are learned along the way and at the end everybody comes out richer for the experience, except the audience, who leave several pounds poorer.
p1454
aVWith Sandler's production company, Happy Madison, having grossed over three billion dollars worldwide to date, Grown Ups plays very much like a vanity project where there's nothing at stake, like the gang were all sat around one night and someone said, "hey, this is really funny, we should totally film us just teasing each other and moaning about our wives and stuff.
p1455
aVGrab a camera, head to a beach house and just horse around for a few weeks.
p1456
aVIf anyone goes to watch it, it's a bonus."
p1457
aVHumphrey Bogart and Lauren Bacall star in the epitome of film noir cool.
p1458
aVThe Big Sleep has everything - a plot you'd need diagrams, slides and flow charts to understand; a slew of smart one-liners; a dark, sombre atmosphere; an incredible sexually charged atmosphere (check out the scene where Bogart and Bacall discuss horse racing for double meaning); and the expected soupcon of murderers and dastardly henchmen.
p1459
aVBogart's plays Ramond Chandler's fast-talking gumshoe Phillip Marlowe.
p1460
aVSummoned to the luxurious mansion of General Sternwood (Waldron), he is hired to investigate blackmailer Geiger (Von Eltz), a Hollywood smut merchant who has some compromising photos of the general's daughter, Carmen (Vickers).
p1461
aVMarlowe follows the trail to Geiger's home where he finds him dead and Carmen drugged.
p1462
aVTaking Carmen home he meets her sister, Vivian (Bacall), and begins an affair that's as riddled with intrigue as the story that follows.
p1463
aV\u000aJennifer Lawrence in 'Winter's Bone'\u000aThis weekend offers a classic choice between blockbuster entertainment and rugged indie drama\u2014between cartoon fantasy and gritty Ozark realism.
p1464
aVMovies great and small for wildly different demographics.
p1465
aVBut Toy Story 3 and Winter\u2019s Bone  are both tales of characters terrified of losing their home.
p1466
aVIn Toy Story 3, a band of played-out toys are driven out of the house as \u201ctheir\u201d child heads off to college, and trapped in a daycare gulag.
p1467
aVIn Winter\u2019s Bone an intrepid teenage girl trying to save the family house from being sold off plunges into an Ozark mountain underworld in search of her bail-jumping dad.
p1468
aVBoth movies are worth seeing.
p1469
aVToy Story 3 is a solid sequel to a trusty franchise\u2014a 3D  ride to the dark side of toyland, buffered by sentiment.
p1470
aVWith enough wit to amuse the parents and enough adventure to captivate the kids.
p1471
aVIt\u2019s had a lot of attention already.
p1472
aVSo I\u2019m going to reverse the usual protocol and lead with the little movie, Winter\u2019s Bone (which opens in Toronto today, and expands to Vancouver and Montreal next week)  This Sundance award-winner is a superbly acted, beautifully wrought film.
p1473
aVChances are it will be a contender for my Top 10 list by the time winter comes around.
p1474
aVTalk about counter-programming.
p1475
aVThe farthest thing you could imagine from the bright summer midway of Iron Men and A-Team hijinks and Karate Kids, Winter\u2019s Bone is an austere, harrowing suspense story of a hard-headed girl who ventures into an Ozark heart of darkness, a backwoods hell of crystal meth and family menace and unforgiving cruelty.
p1476
aVJennifer Lawrence delivers a powerful, unwavering performance as 17-year-old Ree Dolly, who is trying to track down her father.
p1477
aVHe put up their house for a bail bond then vanished without a trace.
p1478
aVIf she can\u2019t find him, she will be homeless, along with the rest of her family.
p1479
aVAs she heads into woods to question friends and relatives, she runs up against an outlaw code of silence and risks her life with each step that takes her closer to the truth behind her dad\u2019s disappearance.
p1480
aVShe confronts her ruthless addict uncle, the incongruously nicknamed Teardrop (John Hawkes), and passes through a declension of ever darkening characters.
p1481
aVThe movie\u2019s desaturated palette is expertly controlled.
p1482
aVThis is a gray world and we don\u2019t see a glimmer of sun in the sky, or a smile from our resilient heroine, until close to the end.
p1483
aVBased on the novel by Daniel Woodrell, the film is set and shot in the mountains of southern Missouri, a world that is captured with stunning authenticity.
p1484
aVI was reminded of Canadian director Jennifer Baichwal\u2019s fine documentary, The True Meaning of Pictures: Shelby Adams\u2019 Appalachia.
p1485
aVThis film portrays mountain culture with the same photographic richness,  avoiding the hillbilly stereotypes, while etching Gothic character portraits of scary potency.
p1486
aVAnd the stark dialogue has an archaic, almost biblical cadence.
p1487
aVDirector and co-writer Debra Granik, who shot the film in real Ozark family homes, worried about playing into the stereotypes.
p1488
aV\u201cMoonshine and meth,\u201d she says, \u201care gasoline on the bonfire of cliches depicting mountain culture.
p1489
aVThirty-five years after Deliverance, even a banjo can still be a loaded symbol.
p1490
aVBut in our trips down to southern Missouri, banjos kept popping up in the most mysterious and alluring ways.
p1491
aVUltimately the banjo found its way into the film, offering notes of hope and perseverance.
p1492
aVI came to think of it as a fresh start for that image.\u201d\u000aAs for Toy Story 3, it does not depart from the safe formula of the previous installments.
p1493
aVDon\u2019t expect anything as ingenious as Ratatouille or Up.
p1494
aVBut the formula works.
p1495
aVA few brief observations culled from my recent article on sequels and remakes in the magazine:\u000aEach movie in Disney-Pixar\u2019s Toy Story franchise conforms to a strict narrative template: led by Woody (Tom Hanks), the vintage cowboy doll, a clan of animated toys get separated from their beloved master, Andy, and have to fight their way home.
p1496
aVIn Toy Story 2, the enemy was a venal collector.
p1497
aVIn Toy Story 3, Andy is off to college and his toys are once again playing dodgeball with oblivion.
p1498
aVWill it be the attic?
p1499
aVA yard sale?
p1500
aVNo, they\u2019re donated to a daycare centre\u2014a prison camp ruled with an iron paw by a strawberry-scented stuffed bear.
p1501
aVWhile the franchise\u2019s sentimental mould is inviolable, this sequel has a darker, more satirical edge.
p1502
aVSome of the Orwellian daycare toys are quite scary, like the mad-eyed, cymbal-crashing monkey on surveillance duty, or the big, blank-eyed baby doll.
p1503
aVAnd in an apocalyptic set piece, the toys are sent on a harrowing flume ride through trash shredders to landfill hell.
p1504
aVI\u2019m not giving anything away by saying that this Toy Story, like the others, ends happily.
p1505
aVSome things will never change.
p1506
aVTwitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse Daniel WoodrellDebra GranikJennifer BaichwalJennifer LawrenceToy Story 3Winter's Bone \u000a\u000a\u000a
p1507
aVRent Toy Story 3 now from Film4oD\u000a \u000aPixar might have had a bit of a wobble with Cars and Ratatouille, but since then it's been wall-to-wall masterpieces: Wall-E, Up and now Toy Story 3, which sees the welcome return of Woody (voiced by Tom Hanks) and Buzz (voiced by Tim Allen).
p1508
aVThe pairing of the amiable cowboy doll and deluded space ranger toy first occurred 15 years before Toy Story 3.
p1509
aVCan you believe it?
p1510
aVFifteen years!
p1511
aVSo it makes sense that in this long-awaited third film in Pixar's hit series time has also passed.
p1512
aVWhere once Andy was a six-year-old boy, adoringly playing with his favourite toys, now he's a young man, poised to leave for college.
p1513
aVThe main thrust of the story here is the question of how the toys cope when the boy becomes the man, and puts away childish things.
p1514
aVDo they get landfilled?
p1515
aVOr retired to the attic?
p1516
aVOr circulated to a childcare centre?
p1517
aVOr passed on to another child?
p1518
aVMost of those options are explored in Toy Story 3.
p1519
aVAndy decides to take Woody with him to college and store the rest of the crew - Buzz, Jessie the cowgirl (Joan Cusack), Mr Potato Head (Don Rickles), Mrs Potato Head (Estelle Harris), Rex (Wallace Shawn) and co - in the attic.
p1520
aVUnfortunately, he puts them in a bin bag, which Mum takes to be rubbish and leaves out for the binmen.
p1521
aVFortunately, they escape and, believing Andy has rejected them, climb into a box for the daycare centre, and Woody catches up and joins them.When they arrive at "Sunnyside", all seems blissful - they're greeted warmly by the leader of the toys, Lots-O'-Huggin' Bear (Ned Beatty) and there are plenty of kids to play with them.
p1522
aVWoody doesn't give up on Andy so easily though, so he escapes, and is picked up by a little girl called Bonnie.
p1523
aVThe others, meanwhile, discover all is not as it seems at Sunnyside - as new arrivals they're put in the pre-school room, where they're brutally "chewed, kicked, drooled on" by toddlers who haven't reached the stage of imaginative play yet.
p1524
aVSunnyside is basically a prison for the toys, and Lotso isn't a benign patriarch, he's a bitter "Mr Big" type.
p1525
aVHis chief enforcer is Big Baby, a baby dolly whose only utterances are cute baby noises, making it all the more sinister.
p1526
aVLotso even forcibly recruits Buzz by re-setting him.
p1527
aVAll is not lost though, as Woody won't give up on his friends.
p1528
aVCan he save them from this "place of ruin and despair run by an evil bear who smells of strawberries"?
p1529
aVTaking the directorial reins here is Lee Unkrich, the co-director on Toy Story 2, Monsters Inc and Finding Nemo.
p1530
aVUnkrich worked on the story with fellow Pixar vets Andrew Stanton and John Lasseter (the boss), but there's also some new blood here in the form of Little Miss Sunshine scribe Michael Arndt.
p1531
aVBetween them, and Pixar's enormously talented crew of designers, animators, visual effects people etc, they've crafted a film that's funny, moving, sentimental and insightful, as it maps a human life, human relationships - specifically a boy leaving home, a mother's bond with that boy - through the medium of sentient plastic toys.
p1532
aVIt gets pretty dark in places, both literally - for nocturnal prison-break sequences or moody flash-backs - and figuratively.
p1533
aVBut then, many animated family films have some pretty scary stuff in them.
p1534
aVIt's all part of the mix for powerful storytelling for children: think of the greats from the Disney back-catalogue like Snow White, Bambi and The Lion King, or more recent stuff from Studio Ghibli, like Spirited Away.
p1535
aVOh, and if you're a Ghibli fan, the Japanese studio's long-term relationship with Pixar is acknowledged by a nice nod here - among Bonnie's toys is a Totoro, the cuddly yet formidable forest spirit from 1988's My Neighbour Totoro\u000a.
p1536
aV"You and I have a tendency towards corpulence," says Charles Laughton to Peter Ustinov in Spartacus.
p1537
aV"Corpulence makes a man reasonable, pleasant and phlegmatic.
p1538
aVHave you noticed the nastiest of tyrants are invariably thin?"
p1539
aVIf the rumours are to be believed Charles Laughton was anything but "reasonable, pleasant and phlegmatic".
p1540
aVBut if his mincing bitchiness almost led to him having his nose bloodied by Ernest Hemmingway, there's no disguising the fact this son of Scarborough was an acting heavyweight in every sense of the world.
p1541
aVAnd if his work on screen never quite lived up to his storied stage career, at his best, he was right up there with Olivier, Richardson and the other English greats who swapped the West End for the West Coast.
p1542
aVAs with Spartacus, Witness For The Prosecution saw Laughton surrounded by people capable of shining in his considerable shadow.
p1543
aVTyrone Power stars as Leonard Vole, a cad accused of murdering a rich widow.
p1544
aVThe story of the age, the lure of defending Vole is too much for Sir Wilfrid Robarts (Laughton), the top defence lawyer who isn't going to let a little thing like a heart attack prevent him from hogging the limelight.
p1545
aVIf Robarts is confident of proving his man's innocence, he's as surprised as anyone when Vole's wife Christine (Dietrich) sides not with her spouse but with Torin Thatcher's prosecuting attorney.Christie, Laughton, Dietrich, Power, Wilder - there was no shortage of talent involved in bringing Witness For The Prosectuion to the big screen.
p1546
aVThe big names aren't just to be found above the title, either.
p1547
aVSir Wilfrid's nurse Miss Plimsoll is played by Charles Laughton's long-suffering wife Elsa Lanchester.
p1548
aVAnd if the woman playing Janet McKenzie looks familiar, that's because it's Una O'Connor, Lanchester's co-star in Bride Of Frankenstein who'd also appeared in the original Broadway version of Witness For The Prosecution.
p1549
aVEven amongst so many other great performances (Dietrich is particularly good as the ice-cold Christine), Laughton still stands out.
p1550
aVDevouring the dialogue like a box of chocolates, the hefty one's Sir Wilfrid is right up there with his ripest creations.
p1551
aVIndeed many would have rather seen him with his Oscar for this bravura turn than for his effete Henry VIII.
p1552
aVFor while Robarts is wonderful fun, the gravity and girth Laughton brings to the part means we're never able to forget that, for all the grandstanding, Sir Wilfrid is giving what might well be his last performance.
p1553
aVLarger than life as Laughton might be, he never threatens to wrestle Witness from the capable hands of Billy Wilder.
p1554
aVAs for what exactly the great writer-director brings to the piece, while a lot of people could have fashioned a sturdy court-room sage from Witness For The Prosecution, only he could transform it into a great comedy-drama.  
p1555
aV\u000aMichel Gondry's first collaboration with contemporary Hollywood's most original screenwriter, Charlie Kaufman, was 2001's Human Nature, a film that never received a theatrical release in the UK and sat in unfavourable comparison with the films the writer made with Spike Jonze (Being John Malkovich, Adaptation).
p1556
aVUndeniably, Human Nature was a disappointment - primarily because it didn't capture the genius Gondry had displayed in his innovative, inventive pop promos for the likes of Björk, Massive Attack, Daft Punk and Kylie Minogue.
p1557
aVThankfully, that problem is rectified here.
p1558
aVFurthermore, Eternal Sunshine Of The Spotless Mind boasts a quality cast and has leading man Jim Carrey burying that irritating comic persona under a compelling piece of characterisation.
p1559
aVCarrey plays Joel Barish, a reserved, repressed New Yorker who's at his most expressive when musing to himself or scribbling in his journal.
p1560
aVHe's a decent man, but his introspection exasperates his aggressive, extrovert girlfriend Clementine Kruczynski (Winslet) to the point that she's had enough.
p1561
aVTheir relationship deteriorates to such an extent that Clem takes advantage of a procedure offered by Lacuna Inc, a "revolutionary painless non-surgical memory-erasing process".
p1562
aVWhen Joel visits Clem at work to try and make amends for a falling out they had, she doesn't recognise him.
p1563
aVJoel only discovers the truth when friends show him a card from Lacuna informing him he's been erased from Clem's memory and shouldn't try to contact her.
p1564
aVHeartbroken and desperate, Joel decides to try the procedure for himself, despite his incredulity.
p1565
aV"This is a hoax right?
p1566
aVThere's no such thing as this," he says to Dr Howard Mierzwiak (Wilkinson), the genial, paternal inventor of the system.
p1567
aVTo initiate the process, Mierzwiak's employees Stan (Ruffalo), his lover and Lacuna receptionist Mary (Dunst), and assistant Patrick (Wood) visit Joel as he sleeps.
p1568
aVThe plot thickens, however, when it transpires that Patrick has stolen Joel's personal effects from his relationship with Clem and is using them to woo her himself.
p1569
aVWorse still, as Stan begins to erase Joel's memories, starting from the present and working backwards, Joel rediscovers the good things he had with Clem.
p1570
aVDesperately, trapped in his own unconscious, Joel tries to stop the destruction of his memories.
p1571
aVIt's the combination of a framing narrative, set in the real world, and the action that takes place within Joel's mind (which skitters around as our hero tries to escape deeper into his memory) that gives Kaufman and Gondry's film its most marked idiosyncrasy.
p1572
aVAs well as offering Kaufman's requisite look at the boundaries of fantasy and reality, it's also perfect for Gondry's own brand of distinctive storytelling ploys, employing some wonderfully lo-fi but amazingly clever trickery.
p1573
aVOverlapping and cross-cutting have been a mainstay of his video work - a camera browsing round a tower block for Massive Attack's 'Protection', Kylie encountering versions of herself for 'Come Into My World', Dave Grohl segueing in and out of dreams for 'Everlong'.
p1574
aVThe devices he created and expertly exploited in the promos are expanded and honed for Eternal Sunshine, creating a unique feel as he realises Kaufman's non-chronological, consciousness/unconsciousness-inhabiting script.
p1575
aVHowever, there's a lot more to the film than technique.
p1576
aVArguably, this is Kaufman's most humane work yet, presenting genuine emotional circumstances within its bizarre, semi-sci-fi scenario.
p1577
aVThere's a moving realism to Joel and Clem's romance and the problems they face in their relationship - ordinary stuff like settling into routines, communicating in different ways, being distanced by things unsaid, as well as the heavier implications of mental illness.
p1578
aVHuman Nature was arguably overwhelmed by its wackiness, and even Being John Malkovich is unsubtle in comparison with Eternal Sunshine.
p1579
aVIt's a slow-burner initially, but ultimately a gentle, tender portrayal of relationships and a remarkable romantic comedy.\u000a
p1580
aVAlan Moore started writing 'V For Vendetta' in the summer of 1981 during a holiday on the Isle Of Wight.
p1581
aVSeven years later, in the winter of 1988, Moore and artist David Lloyd finally completed the graphic novel.
p1582
aVThey had set out to create a uniquely British comic book, drawing in their political pessimism toward the rise of Margaret Thatcher, literary influences such as George Orwell and Aldous Huxley, as well as more impressionistic pop culture, David Bowie, Judge Dredd and "the atmosphere of British Second World War films".
p1583
aVIt was the artist's idea to throw Guy Fawkes into the mix, suggesting the Catholic plotter should be celebrated for attempting to blow up the Houses Of Parliament.
p1584
aVAlan Moore wrote against a 1980s backdrop of riots, AIDS, Clause 28, and The Bomb.
p1585
aVIn updating 'V For Vendetta' for the 21st Century, the Wachowski brothers and director James McTeigue prod us with references to the War On Terror, the orange jumpsuits of Camp X-Ray, the hooded prisoners of Abu Ghraib and clips of news channels stoking up fear of bird flu, the patina of panic nation sprayed upon a sci-fi action movie that, at times, clunks around with its trousers full of spanners.
p1586
aVIs V For Vendetta revolutionary?
p1587
aVIs it, as Mark Kermode noted in 'The Observer', deserving of a charge for sedition?
p1588
aV"Violence can be used for good... for justice," insists V (Hugo Weaving), the masked and caped terrorist hero, operating way outside the usual platitudes.
p1589
aVMartin Luther King and Gandhi are off the agenda.
p1590
aVAfter rescuing Evey (Natalie Portman) from some nastiness involving a gang of Fingermen - the SS of this future state, with grimy macs instead of Nazi regalia - V takes her into his secret lair, a shadow gallery, where he keeps all the culture forbidden by the far right government led by Adam Sutler (Hurt).The Shadow Gallery is just one of numerous aspects faithfully adapted from Moore and Lloyd's original comic.
p1591
aVThe set is dressed with the same Wurlitzer juke box, the same pre-Raphaelite paintings as the comic.
p1592
aVA stunning opening sequence where V conducts the destruction of the Old Bailey, then storms the media centre of BTV are two action sequences storyboarded in the original, albeit appearing out of order.
p1593
aVAlso true to the comic, we never see the face beneath V's grinning Guy Fawkes mask.
p1594
aVUnfortunately, the early expository scenes struggle under this constraint.
p1595
aVPerhaps monologues from a masked man will never work on the screen - certainly, Portman's stilted responses are unhelpful, a return to her Queen Amidala enunciation from the Star Wars prequels.
p1596
aVAppalled by V's unapologetic terrorism, Evey escapes into the arms of Gordon, a powerful and famous TV presenter played by Stephen Fry (one wonders if Fry was ghostwriter on a few of V's fruitier speeches; at the end of one particularly verbose monologue, I expected the terrorist to hand out BAFTAs).
p1597
aVIn a senseless sequence, Gordon confesses to Evey his dark secret.
p1598
aVHe is gay.
p1599
aVWorse, he keeps a shadow gallery of his own, containing a forbidden copy of the Koran.
p1600
aVHe has a lot to hide.
p1601
aVSo it's a shock when, in the next scene, he is hosting a broad satire against the fascists, backed by the Benny Hill theme tune.
p1602
aVThey haul him away.
p1603
aVIt is not so much a bum note as an entire piano of them tossed from a high window.The Wachowskis deserve credit for their ingenious backstory to this adaptation.
p1604
aVIn the original, it was an atomic war abroad that facilitated the rise of the fascists.
p1605
aVHere it is an act of biological terrorism that may also be a corporate coup d'etat, a nudge and a wink at the military-oil axis that ascended to power in America behind President Bush.
p1606
aVAlthough, in this near-future, America is written off as basically a "giant leper colony", it is very much the target of this film; essentially America is attacked through the oblique strategy of disguising the Bush regime as a British one.
p1607
aVThis makes V For Vendetta a troubling, if deliciously irresponsible experience for a UK audience - the sensibilities of the British establishment are laid into without a second thought, committing the kind of heresies that, 20 years ago, would have had MI5 ransacking the edit suite.
p1608
aVClimaxing with a London Underground train packed full of homemade explosive, a mere six months after the terrorist attacks of 7/7, it makes you wonder why Hollywood considers British sensibilities so robust.
p1609
aVOr do they just not care?
p1610
aVHow long will we wait for a sci-fi film that ends with the terrorist heroes flying a 747 into the Pentagon?
p1611
aVOne suspects the forthcoming 9/11 movies like Flight 93 and Oliver Stone's World Trade Center may hold off the anarchist grandstanding.
p1612
aVAfter the rousing revolutionary climax of V For Vendetta, a powerful piece of action movie filmmaking with all manner of rebellious badges pinned to its lapel, one is struck with two shocking thoughts; one, Guy Fawkes DID have a point and two, Britain is such a meaningless speck of a country that a major Hollywood action movie can blow up its symbols of power and expect the audience to join in the cheers.
p1613
aVIf there is a sequel, expect V to take the Queen from behind while shooting the Royal Family in alphabetical order.
p1614
aVWith their impressive debut Bound, which was part taut thriller, part glossy advertisement for lesbianism, the Wachowski brothers announced themselves as a team to watch.
p1615
aVBut no one could have expected that they would come up in their second offering with something as extraordinary as this.
p1616
aVThe film is a perfect product of its time.
p1617
aVIt is a very modern conspiracy thriller, a film based, like The Truman Show, on the appealingly terrifying notion of a universal conspiracy - that life itself and everything that we know and take for granted are lies.
p1618
aVIt's also a film steeped in the traditionals of Japanese anime and megamixed philosophy and semiotics (spot the Baudrillard references kids).
p1619
aVReeves, in one of the rare roles suited to his strictly limited but winsome talents, is a computer geek and renegade hacker "Neo" living in a drab future-world.
p1620
aVHe is haunted by an uneasy feeling that things are not all they seem and soon finds out just how right he is.
p1621
aVHe has, or may have, a very special talent.
p1622
aVThe bad guys, headed by a spooky Weaving, want to get their hands on him, and so do the good guys, led by Fishburne in outstanding form as mentor figure Morpheus.
p1623
aVIt's the latter's team to Neo hooks up with, having his reality shattered as he does.
p1624
aVWhat ensues is an extraordinary exercise - at once familiar and innovative, it's a science-fiction adventure packed with conflict (of the enhanced chop-socky variety, supervised by Yuen Wo Ping) and spectactle that would be instantly iconic.
p1625
aV\u000aEllar Coltrane spent a great deal of his young life making \u201cBoyhood.\u201d\u000aProbably one of the most unusual coming of age films you\u2019ll ever hope to see.
p1626
aV\u201cBoyhood\u201d is the story of a single-parent family, a mother and her two children, made over a 12-year period using the same actors and director.
p1627
aVAmazing concept.
p1628
aVAnd, even more amazing that Richard Linklater pulled it off.
p1629
aVThe Houston filmmaker assembled his cast and crew annually for twelve years to tell the story of a boy growing up in Texas.
p1630
aVIt begins with the child in first grade and ends with him making new friends in college.
p1631
aVIn fact, the last few spoken words of this film I will remember for the rest of my life.
p1632
aVThe cinematic journey is rewarding and markedly profound.
p1633
aVAs you might expect, \u201cBoyhood\u201d drops in on its characters annually.
p1634
aVIn 2002, six-year-old Mason Evans, Jr. (Ellar Coltrane) overhears his mother Olivia (Patricia Arquette) arguing with her boyfriend about improving her life.
p1635
aVShe takes Mason and his older sister, Samantha (Lorelei Linklater) to Houston so she can finish college, get a higher-paying  job and make a better living for her family.
p1636
aVThe next year Mason\u2019s biological father (Ethan Hawke) drops into their lives after returning to Texas from Alaska.
p1637
aVMason Sr. also has some growing up to do.
p1638
aVAnd, that\u2019s one of the things you like about \u201cBoyhood,\u201d it isn\u2019t just about the boy.
p1639
aVAll of the characters created by Linklater progress, some faster than others, over the 12-year span.
p1640
aVOlivia repeatedly fails in relationships, but she\u2019s learning.
p1641
aVMason\u2019s father matures right in front of your eyes and becomes more responsible.
p1642
aVSamantha has a rebellious nature, at times, but is always moving forward.
p1643
aVThese people may not be exactly like your own family, but you know them nevertheless.
p1644
aVThe emotions feel very real.
p1645
aVPatricia Arquette plays Olivia Evans in \u201cBoyhood,\u201d the story of young man growing up in Texas.
p1646
aVOn the negative side, Linklater\u2019s film often lacks focus.
p1647
aVThe scripts were written year-by-year.
p1648
aVVery little was determined from the start, just some character traits and the film\u2019s impressive last scene.
p1649
aVAt times, you feel like you\u2019re on a casual stroll through these people\u2019s lives.
p1650
aVThe authenticity gets mundane at times.
p1651
aVThe film\u2019s 2:45 runtime is another negative tick.
p1652
aVThe mind begins to wander at times.
p1653
aVThe annual segments needed trimming.
p1654
aVWhere?
p1655
aVHow much?
p1656
aVIf I knew for sure, I would be making films, not commenting on them.
p1657
aVThe performances are nicely understated.
p1658
aVColtrane\u2019s laid back acting style contributed greatly to the film\u2019s truthfulness.
p1659
aVArquette\u2019s naturalistic approach gave the movie its heart and soul.
p1660
aVShe repeatedly fails in her personal relationships, but not with her children.
p1661
aVThey survive because of her soul-searching and good intentions.
p1662
aVOverall, a great ensemble.
p1663
aVFinally, is \u201cBoyhood\u201d one of the best films of 2014?
p1664
aVCertainly, it\u2019s a great film.
p1665
aVAnd, many critics have it at the very top of their lists.
p1666
aVPersonally, I like Richard Linklater so much that I hope he hasn\u2019t peaked.
p1667
aVMaybe \u201cBoyhood\u201d is just a warm-up for something even more remarkable.
p1668
aVSomething that can be made in considerably less time,  of course.
p1669
aVGrade: B+\u000a\u201cBoyhood\u201d took 12 years to make, using the same actors and directors.
p1670
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1671
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aBoyhood is a staggering cinematic achievement, all the more so in how readily you\u2019ll lose yourself in this broadly sketched tale of a life rather than pick apart how it has been uniquely assembled.
p1672
aVFor twelve years Richard Linklater has been shooting episodically, striking gold all over the place in the process \u2013 most notably in the form of Ellar Coltrane, whose lead performance as Mason is what this ambitious project hinges upon.
p1673
aVFollowing Mason from childhood through adolescence, Boyhood doesn\u2019t just capture this young man\u2019s physical and personal growth, but that of the key figures that orbit him: separated parents (Patricia Arquette and Ethan Hawke); sister (Lorelei Linklater); and first love (Zoe Graham).
p1674
aVWhile Arquette\u2019s performance is a standout, Linklater conjures emotive, naturalistic performances from all his cast, so as the film works its magic and the years pass by, one can\u2019t help but be captivated by the lives unfolding onscreen.
p1675
aVThat\u2019s all the more impressive with Boyhood, for the most part, avoiding making the obvious dramatic moves we\u2019re conditioned to expect in film.
p1676
aVOne might anticipate seeing Mason\u2019s emotional highs and lows unfold in traditional fashion, but more often than not these pivotal moments take place offscreen, the audience left to ponder the ripples they leave on Mason and his family across time.
p1677
aVThat this forward momentum is conveyed more through the years\u2019 contemporary music and the physical changes of Boyhood\u2019s cast is another contributing factor to the film\u2019s unforced feeling as it moves along at a pace of its own.
p1678
aVLinklater casts a spell that defies you to not be moved, and captures the incredible complexity, richness and emotion of every one of our unique lives in the process.
p1679
aV\u2018Boyhood\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p1680
aV\u000aMatt Lankes/The New York Times Syndicate/Redux\u000aYears ago, in a university survey of American cinema, a professor prefaced a screening of Robert Altman\u2019s ambling epic Nashville with a bracing admonition, something to the effect of, \u201cIf you don\u2019t like Nashville, you should have serious misgivings about what you want out of a motion picture.\u201d Being told to like something can feel a bit hectoring.
p1681
aVBut some films just may demand that sort of line-in-the-sand passion.
p1682
aVBoyhood, the latest from American filmmaker Richard Linklater (Before Sunrise, Bernie, School Of Rock), is one.
p1683
aVIt\u2019s a film this writer has watched, twice now, largely behind a mist of tears provoked by the film\u2019s grace notes of fuzzy adolescent nostalgia.
p1684
aVPlenty has been made of Boyhood\u2019s production.
p1685
aVLinklater gathered his cast for a few weeks a year over the course of more than a decade, mapping the adolescence of a Texan boy named Mason Evans Jr. (Ellar Coltrane) in close to real time.
p1686
aVThe boy\u2019s aging is marked as much by the acne flecking his face as by progressing pop cultural references (Dragonball Z, Harry Potter, Halo) and political movements (Bush\u2019s Fallujah invasion, the Obama-Biden ticket).
p1687
aVImagine Michael Apted\u2019s Up Series (documentaries that catch up with 14 British people every seven years) crossbred with Linklater\u2019s own meandering day-in-the-life surveys (Dazed and Confused, Slacker, the Before trilogy) and you begin to get a sense of the scale of the accomplishment.
p1688
aV\u201cBecause it\u2019s such a conceptual effort,\u201d Malcolm Harris writes in the online magazine The New Inquiry, \u201cit seems almost unfair to judge Boyhood as a narrative feature.\u201d But arguing that Boyhood is something other than a conventional movie, discounting it as \u201cconceptual,\u201d glosses over what Linklater has achieved.
p1689
aVIn a film that moves without contrivance with the young man at its centre, nothing and everything happens.
p1690
aVCharacters learn lessons and grow up and go camping and shoot guns and fall in and out of love\u2014Patricia Arquette, as Mason and Samantha\u2019s upwardly mobile single mom, cycles through husbands, her desire for security drawing her to a string of abusive drunks.
p1691
aVLinklater lets these things happen at the unhurried pace of time itself.
p1692
aVHe even lets plot threads develop in ellipses, suggesting micro-dramas in the spaces we don\u2019t see, as when a teenage Mason Jr. argues with his dad about his rightful claim to a vintage GTO, promised to him (so he argues) in a scene we never see.
p1693
aVIn films like School of Rock, Linklater has expressed a rare sensitivity to what one Boyhood character calls the \u201cvoluptuous panic\u201d of youth.
p1694
aVKids are free to drink beer and smoke pot and horse around without the hand of narrative repercussion slamming down.
p1695
aVAs in Bernie, Slacker and Waking Life, Boyhood empathizes with the oddballs that dot the periphery of a certain American adolescence: the Tourettic loners stalking the suburbs, the conspiracy theorists slumped in the booths of all-night diners, the Bible-thumping backwoods Texans more commonly rendered as no-dimensional caricatures.
p1696
aVWatching these characters orbit in and out of one another\u2019s lives gives a sense of actually watching people\u2014not canned archetypes, but fully formed people\u2014get older.
p1697
aVTime\u2019s movement over the film establishes an uncommon intimacy with its cast, a sense that we truly know them.
p1698
aVIt feels like a consummate work for Linklater, who has long been engrossed with the spaces people occupy, how they change over time\u2014whether in the all-night party of Dazed and Confused or the 18 years separating Before Sunrise from Before Midnight.
p1699
aVHe even has the indolent liquor-store clerk from Dazed reprise his role, suggesting that all his films take place in the same narrative world.
p1700
aVThis proximity is the core of Boyhood, and it\u2019s more impressive than managing a cast\u2019s schedules for 10-plus years or making nine feature films while shooting it.
p1701
aVThe gimmick becomes invisible, and Boyhood feels less conceptual than classical: form and narrative in harmony.
p1702
aVRare is a \ufb01lm that\u2019s so bottomless in its generosity and affection.
p1703
aV22 shares\u000a\u000a\u000a                Twitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse BoyhoodRichard Linklater \u000a\u000a\u000a
p1704
aV\u000aThose who bemoan cinema circa 2014 for being out of ideas: prepare to meet your match.
p1705
aVRichard Linklater, director of the peerless Before triptych (Sunrise, Sunset, Midnight) has here hit upon a no-brainer conceit that all but renders its generic compatriots obsolete.
p1706
aVBut the magic of Boyhood's high concept behind-the-scenes idea - to reform the cast and crew periodically over 12 years, thereby crafting a literal, \u2018before your very eyes\u2019 type of coming-of-age movie - lies in the many ways that Linklater harnesses the period and passing of time into his very unique project.
p1707
aVBoyhood drops in on Mason (Ellar Coltrane) roughly once every few months over the course of a dozen years, seeing him grow from kid to teen to adult alongside his separated parents (Patricia Arquette and Ethan Hawke), his sister (Linklater\u2019s daughter, Lorelei) and a supporting cast of friends and step-family.
p1708
aVTo start, Coltrane is not a precocious child actor, cutting more of an unassuming, naturalistic figure in early scenes of sky-gazing and rock-collecting; but over the years Mason grows from shy kid into a bona fide Linklater youth, the sort the director nailed in Dazed & Confused and Slacker, always ready with a laconic stare and a rambling philosophical rant.
p1709
aVAs with most real-life kids, though, Mason\u2019s world is framed, shaped and structured by his parents, but watching the years melt away puts the audience in a unique spot, so that when he finally, in his teens, starts to develop a life of his own - and he receives his own Linklater-trademark backwards tracking shot (think: almost every walking-and-talking scene in the Before trilogy) - we\u2019re the proud family members, amazed at how quickly he\u2019s grown up.
p1710
aVIf Boyhood weren\u2019t centered on such compelling cinematic qualities, Linklater\u2019s scope could be called \u2018novelistic\u2019.
p1711
aVMason may be our anchor, but characters, themes and settings grow along with him, making this film just as much a Parenthood (Arquette\u2019s character\u2019s progression from  thirty-something single mum to successful middle-aged academic could easily be a film in its own right) or, if we\u2019re on a literal title kick, American Family, as the States\u2019 own social landscape shifts in the background of the drama, thrown into sharp relief by Linklater\u2019s episodic, observational style.
p1712
aVFrom Halo to Wii Sports, from iMacs to iPhones, from Britney Spears to Lady Gaga, Boyhood is a survey of 21st-century mainstream pop culture touchstones that, due to the very nature of its production, falls somewhere between the historical and the contemporary.
p1713
aVAnd as Linklater incorporates the War in Afghanistan, the groundswell of idealism that greeted Obama\u2019s first term in office, and eventually the recession, he reveals that while these events and trends may seem discrete on reflection, in reality they happen in quick succession, or sometimes all at once.
p1714
aVThis captivating cultural cacophony is what separates Boyhood from nostalgic growing-up classics such as American Graffiti to Dazed & Confused.
p1715
aVIt\u2019s a period film in progress, where each detail, from clothes to worldview, hasn\u2019t been constructed, but is merely informed by its own context.
p1716
aVExperimenting with his own comedy-drama formula, Linklater stretches his arms wide, to encompass Mason\u2019s world in one single, remarkable domestic epic.
p1717
aVAnd, to his credit and to our benefit as film viewers, it is all within his grasp.\u000a
p1718
aVJapanese filmmaker Akira Kurosawa first adapted Shakespeare for the screen with Throne Of Blood in 1957, a masterful retelling of 'Macbeth' as a samurai drama.
p1719
aVTwenty-eight years later, his eyesight failing and health deteriorating, Kurosawa announced his plans to adapt 'King Lear' as Ran.
p1720
aVThe result was one of the legendary filmmaker's most spectacular films, a terrifying epic of familial disintegration and lost honour for which Kurosawa received an honorary Academy Award.
p1721
aV'King Lear' is an old man's drama, so it's fitting that Kurosawa should have made it in his own dotage (he was 75 at the time of production).
p1722
aVExcising the bard's iambic pentameter and the father-daughter theme, Kurosawa sets the tale in 16th Century Japan.
p1723
aVAging warlord Hidetora (Nakadai) is preparing to divide his land up between his three sons: Taro (Terao), Jiro (Nezu) and the youngest of the three, Saburo (Ryu).
p1724
aVRefusing to take part in hypocritical professions of love for material gain, Saburo fulfils the same role as Cordelia in Shakespeare's original.
p1725
aVAs the sons bicker and argue over the division of the spoils, the aging lord is driven from his home and slowly goes mad.Kurosawa always had a keen understanding of Western art - much more so than his mentors Ozu or Mizoguchi.
p1726
aVIn Ran he presents an accomplished fusion of East and West, blending Shakespeare's play with a similarly-themed medieval samurai tale.
p1727
aVIt's stirring, evocative, thrilling stuff which flits from moments of intimate drama to epic battle sequences, all the while painting a stark portrait of the lord's descent into madness as he roams the countryside.
p1728
aVShakespeare's story dealt with the loss of paternal authority and the dire consequences that resulted as Lear's kingdom was thrown into civil war and the monarch himself made to realize the universe's cruelty: "As flies to wanton boys, are we to the gods; they kill us for our sport".
p1729
aVIn Ran, Kurosawa uses the strict formality of the traditions of Japanese Noh drama to illustrate this collapse of form into formlessness and meaning into nothingness.
p1730
aVAs the white haired, increasingly manic Lord Hidetora (brilliantly played by Nakadai) is driven towards the brink of absolute despair, and as hundreds of cavalry soldiers charge into battle, Kurosawa provides a terrifying glimpse of the apocalypse, his camera unflinching in its depiction of the 'ran' (chaos) that the title suggests.
p1731
aV\u000a"You can't stop what's coming," mutters a grizzled old-timer towards the end of No Country For Old Men.
p1732
aVIf there's a moral to be teased out of the Coen brothers' breathtaking crime thriller that could well be it.
p1733
aVFaced with the march of time and the senseless vicissitudes of fate, the rugged characters of this Texan western noir keep pushing against the tide.
p1734
aVIt doesn't help them achieve anything... except die a little sooner.
p1735
aVStripping back Cormac McCarthy's elegiac western, the Coens have produced one of their finest films.
p1736
aVIt's reminiscent of their early neo-noir Blood Simple and their much-lauded Oscar-winning Fargo yet it has an epic sweep that puts both of these films in the shade.
p1737
aVAs it cuts between three main protagonists, it builds a mythic, sometimes operatic, picture of America's dark soul.
p1738
aVThe ostensible hero is Llewellyn Moss (Josh Brolin), a Vietnam vet who stumbles across the aftermath of a drug deal gone wrong while hunting antelope in Texas.
p1739
aVSnaffling a suitcase stuffed with $2 million in hard cash, Moss goes on the run.
p1740
aVLittle does he realize that the suitcase is fitted with a tracking device.
p1741
aVFollowing its signal is hitman Anton Chigurh (Javier Bardem) armed with a cattle stun gun and a menacingly calm demeanour.
p1742
aVPursuing them both is Sheriff Bell (Tommy Lee Jones), a disillusioned policeman despairing of America's violent tradition.
p1743
aVOpening with Chigurh murdering a police deputy who's taken him into custody, No Country For Old Men quickly establishes its offbeat credentials.
p1744
aV"I got it under control," the deputy boasts on the telephone before being brutally strangled by his handcuffed prisoner.
p1745
aVBardem, icily detached and decked out with a moptop wig, moves with the grace of a trained athlete.
p1746
aVHe is a man who lives to kill, an instrument of fate.
p1747
aVAfter the struggle, the Coens focus their camera on the scuffmarks left on the linoleum floor by the deputy's boots as he thrashed and struggled.
p1748
aVIt sets the tone: vicious violence is repeatedly accompanied by bathetic black humour.
p1749
aVNo one's laughing, though.
p1750
aVInstead the offbeat asides add to the general sense of life's absurdity that laces this thriller.
p1751
aVFate is against everyone here; nothing ever turns out as it's supposed to, nobody ever gets quite what they wanted or deserved.
p1752
aVChigurh taunts his (often) innocent victims with a coin toss: heads or tails to decide whether they live or die.
p1753
aVMost of the hicks he forces into choosing don't even realise what's at stake.
p1754
aVThere is no sense of order to the universe, just random chance.
p1755
aVOnce one realizes that, the Coens suggest, even the most everyday items seem odd: a wrapper unfolding in close up on a counter, a bottle of milk left out on a coffee table.
p1756
aVPortents of doom are everywhere.
p1757
aVAs the cat-and-mouse chase between Moss and Chigurh unfolds - deadly shootouts followed by graphic scenes of wounds being sewn up - the Coens drag us repeatedly back to Sheriff Bell.
p1758
aVAs in the novel, he's the conscience of the story, a man who casts a weary eye over the state of the world and is dismayed by what he sees (a newspaper report about an old couple who tortured and killed their aging lodgers prompts a dry response: "I don't why they did it; maybe the TV was broken").
p1759
aVWith a face as craggy as the film's haunting desert landscape, Jones delivers an Oscar-worthy turn (no mean feat in a movie ripe with standout performances).
p1760
aVAlways one step behind the action, Bell eventually resigns himself to the inevitable play of fate, violence and death that America was built on.
p1761
aVA throwaway story about an Indian raid in 1907 hints at the dark truth of the title: America is no country for old men, pacifists or moralists.
p1762
aVIt's a land for those immune to the pricks of conscience and willing to be pushed around by the hand of fate.
p1763
aVIn a nutshell: With its sly wit, dark intelligence and tense action sequences this film  re-establishes the Coens as two of American cinema's most talented  directors.
p1764
aVIt's also the best adaptation of McCarthy's work to date and  an unmissable crime movie.
p1765
aVBy Jamie Russell\u000a
p1766
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aRon Howard\u2019s Rush is an exuberant, diverting dramatisation of the legendary rivalry between Formula One racers James Hunt (Chris Hemsworth) and Niki Lauda (Daniel Brühl) over the course of the fateful Grand Prix season of 1976.
p1767
aVIts combo of hair-raising behind-the-wheel action, heated off-track controversies and stormy relationship soap is hardly earth-shattering stuff, but Howard and writer Peter Morgan (Frost/Nixon) do squeeze sufficient dramatic tension out of the opponents\u2019 wildly different temperaments, while acknowledging their shared sense of purpose and conviction.
p1768
aVHunt is the blonde-and-blue-eyed Brit, a hard-partying, hot-headed playboy with raw driving talent to spare; Lauda, on the other hand, is a brusquely pragmatic Austrian who doesn\u2019t have time for social frivolities, single-mindedly focused on the race to a fault.
p1769
aVHemsworth and Brühl are both terrific, portraying the escalating competitive ribbing between the pair with good humour and genuine passion.
p1770
aVPredictably, the women get sidelined: Olivia Wilde is wasted as Hunt\u2019s model girlfriend Suzy Miller, Joséphine de La Baume\u2019s role as Lauda\u2019s wife ultimately reduced a series of wordless glances, which admittedly, she does remarkably well.
p1771
aVTechnically, Howard doesn\u2019t do anything that John Frankenheimer didn\u2019t already achieve with Grand Prix back in 1966, but some of it sure is dang pretty: armed with Dogme veteran/regular Danny Boyle cinematographer Anthony Dod Mantle, Rush\u2019s racing sequences are gussied up with expressionistic splashes of hot, saturated colour that heighten the nerve-rattling, feverishly adrenalised view from inside the cockpit.
p1772
aV\u2018Rush\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p1773
aV\u000aIt's fair to say that the motor racing film hasn't generally been the most distinguished of movie genres.
p1774
aVIt was arguably only with Asif Kapadia's 2010 documentary masterpiece Senna that moviegoers' eyes were really opened to the intense human drama so often on display throughout the history of Formula One \u2013 and to the fact that there might actually be something significant and universal lurking underneath the fast-paced, glamorous surface.
p1775
aVAs good as Senna was, however, there still remained the question of whether a scripted drama could actually bring these elements out as well.
p1776
aVWho better to have a go, then, than scriptwriter Peter Morgan - a widely acknowledged master of getting to the nub of conflicts between hard-edged, real life personalities - and his Frost/Nixon collaborator Ron Howard?
p1777
aVThe Hunt and Lauda feud that ran throughout the 1976 season is a goldmine for Morgan, presenting him as it does with two almost diametrically opposed personalities \u2013 and yet, with each as fascinating as the other, and both equally able to inspire empathy alongside disapproval, the script never resorts to painting one as the hero or villain.
p1778
aVInstead, the narrative shifts between them as they make their respective ways to F1 before doing battle on track in that fateful year.
p1779
aVThere's possibly a slight bias shown towards Lauda, mind, whose cold and undiplomatic exterior is gradually peeled back thanks in part to his remarkable recovery from his accident, and to a romantic subplot that feels warmer than Hunt's ill-fated marriage to model Suzy Miller (Olivia Wilde).
p1780
aVIt also helps the Austrian's case that Daniel Brühl's performance is as remarkable it is \u2013 he inhabits Lauda, who remains a high-profile presence on the F1 circuit, in an uncanny fashion, making him a more compelling figure than may seem at first glance.
p1781
aVThe racing sequences are, for the most part, astonishing.
p1782
aVHoward makes the cars a true extension of the drivers, sending the camera in and around their clattering metal frames and the limbs of their pilots alike and conveying a true sense of both tangible weight and speed.
p1783
aVPhenomenal sound design helps with this \u2013 it's an unrelenting assault on the ears that simply demands to be experienced on the largest screen possible.
p1784
aVBy its very nature, F1 is a slightly unreal world, so it's to Howard's immense credit that he gets such a visceral sensation across, giving the film's closing scenes a tension that knots the stomach, whether or not you happen to know the eventual outcome.
p1785
aVThe only question, by that stage, is which of Rush\u2019s two equally fascinating heroes \u2013 or, perhaps, anti-heroes \u2013 you\u2019ve decided to root for.\u000a
p1786
aVThe Oscar giant-killer critics love to hate, probably because Titanic has the distinction of being one of the few Best Picture winners not to include any acting or screenplay awards among its tally.
p1787
aVMany cite this as proof positive that modern blockbusters sacrifice everything in favour of computer-generated magic and, while the central romance isn't without its charm, it's still the weakest element of the film.
p1788
aVThus, first-class rich kid Rose DeWitt Bukaer (Kate Winslet) and steerage urchin and struggling artist Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio) fall helplessly in love, indulge in some back seat cherry popping and decide on the basis of their two-day relationship that they can't live without each other - until a big iceberg gets in the way of their new-found happiness.
p1789
aVJames Cameron is no stranger to spectacle, and the amazing boat-sinking effects paper over the cracks in the story so well that even the most cynical viewer is drawn in.
p1790
aVRussell Crowe gets the chance to act his heart out in Ron Howard's A Beautiful Mind.
p1791
aVNot only does he portray a maths genius (based on real life Nobel Prize-winner John Forbes Nash Jr), he portrays a maths genius crippled by schizophrenia.
p1792
aVAnd he ages 47 years!
p1793
aVHe turns in a chunky, twitchy performance which, though not on a par with his more subtle turn in The Insider, is admirable.
p1794
aVHe is complemented by a less flashy, underwritten turn from Jennifer Connelly.
p1795
aVPrinceton, 1947.
p1796
aVAwkward but arrogant John Nash arrives on a maths scholarship, determined to come up with an original idea.
p1797
aVNot bothering with classes, he obsessively writes theorem (plotting the movements of pigeons, for example).
p1798
aVHis only friend is raffish roommate Charles (Bettany), a rich source of wisecracks - "Officer, I saw the driver who hit me - his name was Johnny Walker" - and moral support.
p1799
aVEventually Nash comes up with a revolutionary paper that wins him a position at MIT.
p1800
aVIt's here that his eccentricities give way to madness.
p1801
aVAlthough he marries beautiful student Alicia (Connelly), the top-secret code-breaking work he is apparently doing for the government - represented by Ed Harris' mysterious agent - pushes him to breaking point.
p1802
aVFull-blown paranoid schizophrenia erupts and Nash is hospitalised, his reality a mess of mania and imagination.
p1803
aVThree decades of struggle ensue.Although the film leaves out the seedier elements of the real Nash's life (divorce, cottaging), it fashions a loose biopic that is by turns funny, exciting, sad and downright corny.
p1804
aVThe script, by Akiva Goldsman, (who also wrote the inexcusable Batman & Robin), is riddled with pithy, but occasionally clichéd, utterances that capture these shifting tones: there's Nash's description of himself: "I'm quite well balanced - I have a chip on both shoulders" - or the description his doctor, Rosen (Plummer), later uses to describes his disease to his wife: "The nightmare of schizophrenia is not knowing what's true."
p1805
aVAlthough it dallies with Cold War thriller elements, A Beautiful Mind is ultimately a formulaic tale of human perseverance, and merits comparisons with other, similar award-showered tales: notably Shine.
p1806
aVAs such, it's an above-average weepie, a Hollywood prestige film that pre-packages the sufferings of one highly intelligent man and the woman who loves him to manipulate the emotions.
p1807
aVAlthough the film itself is not as smart as it imagines itself to be, it's certainly artful, with fine camera work by Roger Deakins (who shot the Coens' stylish The Man Who Wasn't There), and solid, thanks to Howard's even-tempered direction.
p1808
aVThe third and final film in director Leone's notional trilogy of movies about the birth of modern America, which began with the iconic Once Upon A Time In The West and continued with A Fistful of Dynamite  (which Leone later explained was originally to have been titled 'Once Upon A Time In Mexico').
p1809
aVSpanning 40-odd years, Once Upon A Time In America follows a clutch of Jewish immigrant gangsters from their days as excitable juvenile delinquents in Brooklyn, through the Prohibition era and into their dotage.
p1810
aVFocussing principally on philosophical Noodles (De Niro) and his lethal partner Max (Woods), over the course of three and a half hours Leone charts their changing fortunes and fluctuating loyalties as first they have everything to play for, then everything to lose.
p1811
aVEn route there's jail, betrayal, opium and murder but through it all Noodles and Max remain bound by the dreams they shared as kids - dreams that sometimes sustain them, and other times threaten to destroy them.Any simple description of the plot fails to convey the complexity of the various relationships, or the fragmented nature of the story - a brilliantly structured mosaic of memories drawn together by the symbol of a ringing telephone, echoing down the years.
p1812
aVShot with a beautiful, fluid grace, it's a patient piece of filmmaking and Leone invests these characters with a vivid inner life.
p1813
aVBut it's also a bitter, brutal story in which the characters' ambition is overshadowed by violence, and greed wins out over love.
p1814
aVDe Niro, whose character ages around thirty years, gives a solid, thoughtful performance but it's Woods who's the firecracker here.
p1815
aVSad and vast yet compelling throughout, this remain Leone's most towering achievement.
p1816
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aSet to be Wes Anderson\u2019s highest-earning film, The Grand Budapest Hotel follows on the heels of the also successful Moonrise Kingdom in matching his now-familiar odd-bod aesthetic with a mainstream audience.
p1817
aVBut where Moonrise was awash with wistful nostalgia in its take on adolescence, romance and scouting, Anderson\u2019s latest mines its period setting in service of a broadly comical tale which enjoys frequent diversions into both black and off-colour humour even as a body count amasses and the Second World War threatens to intrude on the borders of the titular hotel\u2019s fictitious homeland.
p1818
aVThe cast list deceptively points to another sprawling ensemble effort, but despite the bountiful number of familiar faces on display and the amount of wandering in time and aspect ratio the film does, its arguably the most fixed around an individual performance of any Anderson pic since Rushmore.
p1819
aVIn a rare comic lead performance, Ralph Fiennes throws himself into a character that, thanks to Anderson\u2019s screenplay, frequently offers unexpected laughs.
p1820
aVAs Mr Gustave \u2013 hotel concierge, elderly guests\u2019 \u201ccompanion\u201d, perfume enthusiast and over-user of the word \u201cdarling\u201d \u2013 Fiennes makes full use of the character\u2019s ambiguity in class, legality, manners and sexuality, aided by whip-smart dialogue and a welcome eagerness to ham things up when required.
p1821
aVUnmistakably Anderson in style and tone, complete with some hilarious The Fantastic Mr Fox-sque moments, it\u2019s satisfying to see this level of craftsmanship applied to a film that is often so silly it\u2019s a pure delight to watch.
p1822
aVThough as time catches up with Mr. Gustave and his hotel, it\u2019d seem that there is a larger vein of bittersweet nostalgia lurking than you\u2019d detect during Grand Budapest\u2019s many side-splitting moments\u2026 \u000a\u2018The Grand Budapest Hotel\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p1823
aV\u000aRalph Fiennes (left) and Tony Revolori in \u2018The Grand Budapest Hotel\u2019\u000aWes Anderson has carved his signature into American cinema with a whimsical style all his own.
p1824
aVFrom the Vietnam pyrotechnics of the school play in Rushmore, to the pup-tent puppy love of Moonrise Kingdom, Anderson gift-wraps his stories as worlds within worlds, homemade pageants of kooky artifice.
p1825
aVAnd he seems blissfully immune to trends.
p1826
aVWhile Hollywood doubles down on the manifest destiny of 3D, Anderson perversely flattens cinematic reality into confectionary dioramas, mille feuille layers of faux naïf make-believe.
p1827
aVWith every film, the art house becomes his dollhouse.
p1828
aVHis movies seem to take place in an alternate reality, a world that is as Andersonian as Cronenberg\u2019s is Cronenbergian.
p1829
aVIt\u2019s an acquired taste, one that I began to un-acquire somewhere between the Gotham bubble of The Royal Tenenbaums (2001) and the Nemo-on-acid odyssey of The Life Aquatic With Steve Zissou (2004).
p1830
aVBy the time an all-too-prescient Owen Wilson popped up as bandaged suicide survivor in the railway escapade of The Darjeeling Limited (2007), I felt Anderson had lost his way.
p1831
aVIt\u2019s not just that the pick-up-sticks narrative was so archly contrived; it presented such a maze of tones and tangents that it was hard to get grip on the characters, or believe they were anything more than the constructs of an over-active imagination.
p1832
aVWith the exhilarating romp of The Fantastic Mr. Fox (2009), all of a sudden the director found his groove\u2014by making a cartoon weirdly lifelike, rather than making life weirdly cartoon-like.
p1833
aVThen, with Moonrise Kingdom (2012), it all came together.
p1834
aVHe emerged from a career of smoke and mirrors to craft an off-kilter coming-of-age tale that was unusually grounded.
p1835
aVInstead of building the story around adults acting like children, for once he gave us children acting like adults, juvenile eccentrics playing house on a wild frontier.
p1836
aVAnd even though their elopement was acted out in a mock Godard fantasy camp, the narrative framed tender moments of precocious romance with compositions that popped like still-life tableaux.
p1837
aVIn The Grand Budapest Hotel, Anderson\u2019s eighth feature, the director invests his trademark whimsy with spectacular ambition, and the result is the most richly entertaining film of his career.
p1838
aVIt\u2019s certainly his most extravagant\u2014in the scale of its cast, its staging and its story.
p1839
aVComposed with the cut-gem focus of Moonrise Kingdom and fired with the zany, kinetic spirit of Mr. Fox, The Grand Budapest Hotel can be seen as an organic extension of his previous work.
p1840
aVBut his universe expands dramatically: the windows of this hotel are thrown wide open onto to a larger world.
p1841
aVSaoirse Ronan in \u2018The Grand Budapest Hotel\u2019\u000aThis hyper-stylized caper movie could give Baz Luhrmann a run for his money.
p1842
aVIt was inspired by Vienna\u2019s Stefan Zweig, a famous writer and dandy from the first half of the 20th century, who counted Freud among his friends, and who, according to biographer George Prochnik, wore alligator shoes, wrote with violet ink and wrote an essay about Handel that he had printed entirely on silk.
p1843
aVIn his spirit, the movie and its hero\u2014an over-cultured concierge played with breathtaking panache by Ralph Fiennes\u2014are ridiculously ornate.
p1844
aVThe Grand Budapest Hotel is, of course, not in Budapest.
p1845
aVThe story is centred in a fictional spa town in a made-up Alpine country called Zubrowka, which seems to float between a distant belle époque and the Nazi and Stalinist scourges of the 1930s.
p1846
aVBut Zubrowka also recalls any number of imaginary places of cinematic delirium, from the Marx brothers\u2019 Freedonia (Duck Soup) to Guy Maddin\u2019s Mandragora (Twilight of the Ice Nymphs).
p1847
aVIn its broad hotel corridors, there is even a glimmer of The Shining.
p1848
aVAnd Anderson says he took some cues from the pre-Code comedies of the 1930s.
p1849
aVBut once again, the world he creates is uniquely his own.
p1850
aVWillem Dafoe (left) and Adrian Brody in \u2018The Grand Budapest Hotel\u2019\u000aThe story unfolds as a nested-doll narrative that spans three generations, each framed with its own aspect ratio.
p1851
aVWe run through a declension of storytellers, from the author (Tom Wilkinson) to the young writer (Jude Law) to a mysterious patron of the hotel named Zero Moustafa (F. Murray Abraham), our chief raconteur, who takes us back to the day he was recruited as a hotel lobby boy (Tony Revolori) by the flamboyant Gustave (Fiennes).
p1852
aVWhat triggers the action is the sudden death of an 84-year-old dowager countess named Madame D (Tilda Swinton), one of Gustave\u2019s most cherished paramours in a harem that seems unrestricted by age or gender.
p1853
aVThe lady leaves him a priceless painting.
p1854
aVWhen Gustave and his lobby boy show up to claim it, they run afoul of Madame D\u2019s son, the villainous Dimitri (Adrian Brody), and the chase is on.
p1855
aVThis madcap farce ricochets between world wars, and involves 16 characters, almost every one of them played by an A-list actor.
p1856
aVThey include Bill Murray (desk clerk), Edward Norton (police captain), Harvey Keitel (bald crime boss), Jeff Goldblum (Freud-like lawyer), Saoirse Ronan (Zero\u2019s sweetheart, with a birthmark that looks like a map of Mexico on her cheek), and Willem Dafoe in Gestapo-black leather (a Lurch-like killer with a Luger).
p1857
aVSuch a thickly populated confection could easily collapse under its weight.
p1858
aVBut Anderson choreographs the action, and the comedy, with balletic precision, while a kaleidoscopic array of scenic eye candy rolls by.
p1859
aVThe film\u2019s greatest revelation is Ralph Fiennes.
p1860
aVWho knew that the star of The English Patient, who brought such sombre gravitas to so many period pieces, had such a light comic touch?
p1861
aVHis dialogue is a debonair as his dress, and he lets the pensées slide off his tongue with an air of wry decadence.
p1862
aVLines like: \u201cThere\u2019s no point doing anything in life because it\u2019s all over in the blink of an eye.\u201d Or: \u201cThere are faint glimmers of civilization in this vast slaughterhouse of what was once known as humanity.\u201d Or, even simple commands like \u201cTake your hands off my lobby boy!\u201d\u000aThis actor who once personified fascism to such chilling effect in Schindler\u2019s List, also gets to make fun of Nazis.
p1863
aVAnd it\u2019s comforting to know that Nazis are once again fair game for farce.
p1864
aV12 shares\u000a\u000a\u000a                Twitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse Moonrise KingdomRalph FiennesThe Grand Budapest HotelWes AndersonWillem Dafoe \u000a\u000a\u000a
p1865
aV\u000aGreeted as something of a curiosity at the time, 2009\u2019s stop-motion animation Fantastic Mr Fox signalled a new phase in the career of aesthete-cum-filmmaker Wes Anderson.
p1866
aVMoonrise Kingdom (2012) picked up where Fantastic Mr Fox left off, transposing the warm, earthy tones and Davy Crockett hats into the live-action sphere, while marrying Anderson\u2019s esoteric obsessions (immaculate frame composition, retro soundtracks, period trappings) to a charming tale of young love.
p1867
aVBut where The Grand Budapest Hotel most markedly differs from its predecessors - and, in fact, the bulk of Anderson\u2019s work to date - is that it looks beyond the director\u2019s distinctively aesthetic concerns and tackles larger themes.
p1868
aVA nested story-within-a-story structure situates us in the past while stressing the expanse of time that exists between then and now: in a gloomy, modern-day Eastern Europe, a girl reads a cute little hardback titled The Grand Budapest Hotel, written by a long-dead author; in flashback, the author (Tom Wilkinson) recites his novel to the camera; in further flashback, the young author (Jude Law) visits the titular hotel and strikes up a conversation with its owner Zero Moustafa (F Murray Abraham), who, in one final flashback that lasts for the bulk of the film, spins a yarn of hijinks and intrigue during the interwar period in the (fictional) country of Zubrowka.
p1869
aVAt the centre of the action is concierge-supreme Gustave H (Ralph Fiennes, in a deliciously fruity semi-comic turn), whose reign as chief of the Grand Budapest Hotel cemented its reputation as an alpine retreat par excellence.
p1870
aVIn a breathless tracking shot that recalls Anderson\u2019s cheeky commercial for American Express, Gustave is seen ploughing through the hotel overseeing every element of its smooth running, right down to the guests\u2019 nail polish, exemplifying an aesthetic fastidiousness that even Anderson newcomers will recognise as an extension of the director\u2019s own auteurist attention to detail.
p1871
aVBoth Anderson and Gustave\u2019s impressive faculties are pushed to the limit by the film\u2019s twisty plot, which is replete with high-speed chases, prison breakouts, secret societies, stolen paintings, assassins, fascists and dead dowagers.
p1872
aVIt\u2019s the sort of derring-do that recalls the caper-filled adventures of Belgian boy-wonder Tintin, with Gustave and young Zero (Tony Revolori) high-tailing it from one sticky situation to another.
p1873
aVAnderson\u2019s stylised approach (not to mention Adam Stockhausen\u2019s picture-postcard production design) perfectly matches his zest for storytelling, and he\u2019s able to keep the peppy pace going while providing a whistle-stop tour through a superb cast of cameos, including appearances from the likes of Tilda Swinton, Mathieu Amalric, Bill Murray, Jeff Goldblum, Edward Norton, Saoirse Ronan, Willem Dafoe and Lea Seydoux.
p1874
aVBut The Grand Budapest Hotel is more than just a character-filled chamber piece or a stylistic tour-de-force; the story of Zero, Gustave and their august institution is a paean to both an era and a social order that were completely eradicated by the 20th Century\u2019s hot and cold wars.
p1875
aVThe \u2018enchanting old ruin\u2019, as the older Zero calls it, is as much a relic for a bygone age as it is a touchstone for certain qualities also lost - a decadence, perhaps, but also a strict, yet generous propriety best epitomised by Gustave himself.\u000a
p1876
aVA claustrophobic drama with only four characters and only two sets, Persona is a stunning example of cinematic innovation.
p1877
aVCharting the neurotic relationship between a nurse and her mute patient, Ingmar Bergman's multi-faceted film is at once a psychological drama, a philosophical meditation on the gap between art and reality, and a curious love story.
p1878
aVAfter forgetting her lines in the middle of a performance, theatre actress Elisabeth Vogler (Ullman) retreats from the world, refusing to speak to anyone and becoming a patient at a Swedish sanatorium.
p1879
aVWith the help of a young nurse (Andersson), she takes a holiday cottage on the coast in order to recuperate, but their intense, brooding interaction leads only towards madness and despair.
p1880
aVA film of flayed nerves and unspoken anxieties, Persona offers a distressing portrait of emotional and spiritual desolation from which Bergman's claustrophobic camera offers no hope of escape.
p1881
aVEschewing establishing shots in favour of a series of striking compositions in which the two lead actresses are forced to share a limited amount of screen space, Bergman tries to make the ever-increasing insanity of his protagonists affect the audience as well.
p1882
aVDisorienting us with jump cuts and self-reflexive moments (a shot of a projector, a camera crew and - in a startling sequence - a sequence where the film literally collapses, burning a hole in the negative) this is an unsettling piece of cinema.
p1883
aVThe characters' angst-ridden experience of what one calls "the hopeless dream of being" coupled with Bergman's transgression of the conventions of film production create a haunting nightmare of madness and despair.
p1884
aVAs much a response to the political insanity of the mid-1960s (a television set shows Vietnamese monks immolating themselves) as a film about nervous breakdowns, Persona is a rich, allegorical work that rewards repeated viewings.
p1885
aVThe small boys progress though the desolate hotel corridors, sparsely  populated by freaks and eccentrics, provided a blueprint for much of  Stanley Kubrick's work in the hotel corridors of The Shining.
p1886
aVYet  even that reclusive miserablist failed to achieve this sense of  alienation and despair.
p1887
aVBleak and immensely powerful, it is among the  most disturbing of Bergman's works.
p1888
aVRead reviews of other Ingmar Bergman films screening on Film4 from 4th to 17th July 2011\u000aGo to TV listings
p1889
aVBrowse our reviews of other arresting directorial debuts\u000a \u000aWho is Donnie Darko?
p1890
aVWell, he's the troubled hero of Richard Kelly's remarkable debut feature, played by Jake Gyllenhaal.
p1891
aVNot only is Donnie ("Donnie Darko?
p1892
aVWhat the hell kinda name is that?")
p1893
aVa complex character - he's a high IQ high-school student, troubled by mental instability, who is both frank and perspicacious - but the film itself defies genre definition.
p1894
aVIt's a drama about teen love.
p1895
aVIt's philosophical sci-fi.
p1896
aVIt's a satire of 80s America.
p1897
aVAnd more.
p1898
aVIt's 1988.
p1899
aVDonnie wakes up on a mountain road.
p1900
aVIt looks like Provence, but Donnie soon descends into manicured all-American suburbia.
p1901
aVThe film was shot in LA but the fictional setting of Middlesex, Virginia, is reminiscent of Blue Velvet or even E.T.
p1902
aV(further evoked by the presence of Barrymore, who executive produced and co-stars as a teacher).
p1903
aVThese connections - and explicit references within the film to Back To The Future, The Evil Dead and The Last Temptation Of Christ - are all part of Kelly's dense weave, contributing to the film's themes of 80s culture, time travel, the supernatural (Donnie is visited repeatedly by a eerie, man-sized 'rabbit' called Frank - a nod to Harvey) and faith.
p1904
aVQuestions of faith are played out not only through the fundamentalist  undercurrents in Donnie's community (a repressed teacher insists on  banning Graham Greene's 'The Destructors' on the grounds that it  encourages youth violence), but also in the form of a self-help guru,  Jim Cunningham (Swayze).
p1905
aVDonnie's frustration pours out when he's  confronted by this man, who simplistically reduces emotion to a struggle  between fear and love.
p1906
aVIt's a potent stand-off, between reductive  quasi-philosophy from Cunningham (the product of a cynical, quick-fix  commercial culture) and straightforward wisdom from the "troubled and  confused" Donnie.
p1907
aVAs with Paul Thomas Anderson's Magnolia, another product of a young auteur, Donnie Darko is brimfull of ideas.
p1908
aVHowever, Kelly's film focuses on one character,  has a sci-fi dimension and an 80s milieu - which is thankfully created  with sensitivity (no naff wardrobe, plenty of decent period music) and  satirical humour (Dukakis versus Bush Sr forms a backdrop).
p1909
aVDonnie Darko is a well-made film, without tangible low-budget  problems (it cost $4.5 million).
p1910
aVIt's shot with grace and atmosphere,  directed with assurance and expertly played.
p1911
aVAlongside star Gyllenhaal,  his sister Maggie plays his screen sister; expressive character actor  Holmes Osborne plays his bewildered dad; Oscar-nominated Mary McDonnell  plays his mum ("How does it feel to have a wacko for a son?"
p1912
aVDonnie asks  her, "It feels wonderful" she says with despairingly cheerful love).
p1913
aVThe cast is further bulked out by 'ER' regular Noah Wyle as Donnie's  physics teacher; upcoming actress Jena Malone as Donnie's girlfriend;  and Katherine Ross as Donnie's therapist.
p1914
aVRoss's presence makes for  another evocative connection, to that earlier coming-of-age tale, The Graduate (in which she played Mrs Robinson's daughter).
p1915
aVFrom the opening shot of a Los Angeles cityscape at night in the year 2019, it is clear that Scott has conjured up something special.
p1916
aVDeckard (Ford) is a hardbitten 'blade runner', called out of self-imposed retirement to track down and kill four rogue androids.
p1917
aVAs he goes about his work, mostly at night, mostly in the rain, he falls in love with another android, Rachael (Young), and is forced to confront painful questions concerning his own identity.
p1918
aVAdapted from science fiction genius Philip K Dick's novel 'Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?
p1919
aV', the film touches on many of Dick's favourite themes - chiefly the notions of memory and identity and how intimately entwined they are.
p1920
aVIt also exists in two quite different forms.
p1921
aVOften the Director's Cut is a yawn-inducing act of self-obsession.
p1922
aVWhen Scott came to present his own cut of Blade Runner it proved to be different to the version originally released in subtle but substantial ways.
p1923
aVThe Director's Cut is a few minutes shorter than the original, has the hardboiled explicatory dialogue removed and Deckard's pivotal dream of a unicorn reinstated.
p1924
aVThese differences mean that Blade Runner is in fact two of the greatest and most influential science fiction films ever made.
p1925
aVCensorship held up Howard Hawks ' original 1932 masterpiece, Scarface (aka Scarface, The Shame Of A Nation) for over a year.
p1926
aVThis Brian De Palma directed, Oliver Stone scripted version also faced problems, especially on television, where the chainsaw scene, among others, was cut for original transmission.
p1927
aVNot so long ago, Michael Mann said that after his experience filming 'Miami Vice' on location he considered De Palma's film a mild version of the truth about the Florida crime scene...
p1928
aVThe mind boggles.
p1929
aVCertainly there's enough bad language, drug-taking and visceral images of mutilation and death to satisfy any audience.
p1930
aVTony Montana (Al Pacino, the dictionary definition of 'to-the-edge') arrives in Florida from Cuba and having filled a contract from a drug-dealer is soon on the payroll with friend Manny (the brilliant Steve Bauer).
p1931
aVThe stylish-looking movie, shot by Chinatown cinematographer John A Alonzo, follows Tony's murderous rise until he is king of the heap.
p1932
aVPacino's bravura performance dominates, making no concessions to our sensibilities.
p1933
aVAnd the final shootout is a tour de force of editing.
p1934
aV\u000aMeet Mary.
p1935
aVShe's eight years old, has eyes the colour of muddy puddles and a birthmark the colour of poo.
p1936
aVHer mother likes to cook with sherry ('tea for grown-ups') and her father, who works in a factory attaching the string to earl grey teabags, likes to spend his spare time in the shed playing with dead birds.
p1937
aVNot your average animation heroine.
p1938
aVBut then Adam Elliot's clayography, as heralded by his Oscar-winning 2003 short, Harvie Krumpet - about an ever-optimistic Jewish WWII refugee whose lot in life includes being struck by lightning and losing a testicle - is far from your average animation.
p1939
aVDespite certain kooky flourishes (Mary debates the provenance of babies with her fellow title character - her theory is that they come from the bottom of beer glasses, while Max has been informed they come from eggs laid by rabbis) which might, on the surface, be mistaken for cutesy, self-conscious affectation, this film is not child's play - neither in style nor in substance.
p1940
aVAlternately heart-warming and heartbreaking, the elegiacally faltering,  drawn-out (the narrative spans several decades) pen pal relationship  between Mary and Max - an obese 40-something lapsed Jewish New Yorker  with Aspergers syndrome, whose name Mary fortuitously plucks from the  phonebook - is at bottom a canny device which provides a window on to  the interior world of two lonely, marginalised souls.
p1941
aVTheir platonic  love affair plays out like a ballroom dance between two terminally  left-footed but devoted partners - awkward, fumbling, funny and tender  all at once.
p1942
aVPhilip Seymour Hoffman in particular deserves kudos for his brilliantly  droll, expressive voicing of Max - well, expressive insofar as a  persistent monotone, punctuated by off-kilter syntax and intonation can  be ("I live with my cat, Hal, which is short for halitosis, from which  he suffers").
p1943
aVSo too do Adam Elliot and his 50-strong crew, whose labour  of love took 57 weeks to shoot.
p1944
aVThe film's boldly sombre palette urges you to look for subtleties in  technique, rather simply be dazzled by the rainbow effect characteristic  of most contemporary animation.
p1945
aVSome touches are pristinely realistic  and subtle, like the quivering of lips or the welling up of eyes on a  face about to cry (there are quite a few tears shed too - an innovative  use of sexual lubricant, a reported 2,400 teaspoons of which were used  on set).
p1946
aVOthers, like the monochrome, unwelcoming vision of Max's New  York - in which a flat black sky is coldly illuminated by white  pinpricks of stars - are abstractly poetic.\u000a
p1947
aVThe second spaghetti western in Leone's trilogy that includes A Fistful of Dollars and The Good, the Bad and the Ugly.
p1948
aVRival bounty hunters (Eastwood and Van Cleef) compete for the scalp of vicious bandit El Indio (Volonte) before striking an uneasy alliance to catch their man.
p1949
aVLeone's trademark motifs are all present and correct: taciturn, sweat-drenched men of dubious morals scurry through panoramic landscapes to Morricone's artful, twanging score.
p1950
aVThe film also includes social concerns of Church and family that were absent in A Fistful Of Dollars.
p1951
aVClint is Clint, but Lee Van Cleef's black-hearted Colonel Mortimer is memorably sinister.
p1952
aVPsychopathic though the main characters are, the film is also charged with a mordant sense of humour that refreshes its gun-slinging machismo.
p1953
aVLook out for crazy Klaus Kinski too, unexpectedly cast as a grovelling hunchback.
p1954
aV\u000a\u000aWhat an amazing career Raymond Burr had as Perry Mason.
p1955
aVFirst, it was nine seasons on CBS with a top rated show about the famed defense attorney.
p1956
aVThen, he shuttled over to NBC for a few seasons as Robert Ironside.
p1957
aVBut, then people just couldn\u2019t get over the way Mason handled himself in the courtroom.
p1958
aVIt was time to bring Burr into some very nicely conceived TV movies.
p1959
aVAdd Barbara Hale as Mason\u2019s executive assistant, Della Street, and you\u2019re in nostalgia heaven.
p1960
aVPeople loved these TV movies, despite the poor to mediocre writing.
p1961
aVWho cares if the plotting is a bit obvious and not nearly as accomplished as in the CBS series.
p1962
aVThis is all about characters you love and seeing them in their twilight years.
p1963
aV\u201cPerry Mason Movie Collection, Volume 1\u2033 has the first six TV movies: \u201cPerry Mason Returns,\u201d \u201cThe Case of the Notorious Nun,\u201d \u201cThe Case of the Shooting Star,\u201d \u201cThe Case of the Lost Love,\u201d \u201cThe Case of the Sinister Spirit,\u201d and \u201cThe Case of the Murdered Madam.\u201d  All of them are a bit clunky.
p1964
aVThe costumes and hairstyles are so eighties.
p1965
aVAdd some really memorable guest stars along with series regular, private eye Paul Drake, Junior (William Katt) and all is forgiven.
p1966
aVThe six-movie set is on three discs and it\u2019s priced way, way too high at $58.99.
p1967
aVHopefully, after it\u2019s been out awhile, the price will come down.
p1968
aVIf it doesn\u2019t, only hardcore Mason fans will pay that kind of money.
p1969
aVC\u2019mon.
p1970
aVIt\u2019s not like these movies aren\u2019t still being shown on television.
p1971
aVGrade: B+\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: December 31, 2013\u000aFormat: DVD only\u000aRuntime: 571 minutes\u000aRated: NR\u000aReleased by Paramount Home Entertainment\u000a \u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p1972
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aFans of Robert Rodriguez\u2019s bold 2005 masterwork Sin City have been clamouring for a follow-up for almost ten years.
p1973
aVI was one of them.
p1974
aVNow that I\u2019ve seen the late-arriving sequel, I can\u2019t for the life of me work out why I ever thought it would be a good idea.
p1975
aVIt\u2019s difficult to identify exactly what this film lacks that its predeccessor possessed \u2013 they both look and sound the same \u2013 but there\u2019s a definite lack of weightiness to the stories, most of which feel like they\u2019re comprised of scenes deleted from the first film for being too boring.
p1976
aVThe vignette following Joseph Gordon-Levitt\u2019s gambler as he squares off against the great Powers Boothe initially displays potential, but it goes absolutely nowhere.
p1977
aVAs the titular (sorry) femme fatale, French actress Eva Green has the most fun, just as she did in this year\u2019s other Frank Miller adaptation sequel, 300: Rise of an Empire.
p1978
aVWhat joy there is to be found here generally comes from her.
p1979
aVAnd trying to work out where Mickey Rourke\u2019s make-up ends and Mickey Rourke\u2019s face begins.
p1980
aVSin City\u2018s stylised noir-inflections felt like a breath of fresh air in 2005.
p1981
aVThe film\u2019s iconic status should remain unvarnished by this underwhelming follow-up.
p1982
aV\u2018Sin City: A Dame to Kill For\u2019 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p1983
aVWriter Graham Greene enjoyed a long and fruitful relationship with film, but nothing matched this sly noir - a great British thriller that united Greene with director Reed, and which enabled Orson Welles to deliver cinema's single most memorable reference to Switzerland.
p1984
aVHolly Martins (Cotten) is a hack writer arriving in Vienna shortly after the end of WWII.
p1985
aVHe plans to meet up with his old friend, Harry Lime, but discovers that he has recently been killed in a road accident.
p1986
aVHe is told a few home truths about his old chum by a British Army officer (Howard) and from Lime's distraught girlfriend (Valli), and focuses his own energies on trying to discover the identity of the third man who helped carry Lime's body from the street.
p1987
aVEleven minutes was excised from the original US edit, supposedly to lessen the seedy tone.
p1988
aVIn fact it's this creeping sense of corruption and moral ambiguity that makes the film so facinating.
p1989
aVIt was producer Korda's idea to set the action in a divided Vienna, and, in the course of Greene's research, he happened upon the city's thriving post-War trade in black-market penicillin, and the illicit use of the city's sewer network.
p1990
aVThe film's success was sealed by Welles's film-stealing extended cameo, the off-kilter, Oscar-winning photography of Krasker, and the instantly evocative zither score by Anton Karas, who Reed discovered while scouting locations in Vienna.
p1991
aV\u000aHayao Miyazaki was still an up-and-coming talent when he wrote and directed My Neighbour Totoro in 1988.
p1992
aVHis second feature for the groundbreaking Studio Ghibli, Miyazaki hoped the film would build upon the success of his earlier offerings, the pre-Ghibli Nausicaa And The Valley Of The Wind and the Studio's debut production Laputa: Castle In The Sky.As it turned out, My Neighbour Totoro did not set the Japanese box office alight, but just as audiences eventually came around to Citizen Kane and It's A Wonderful Life, over time the public learned to love this movie.
p1993
aVIndeed, it is now considered one of Miyazaki's greatest works, and is hailed as one of the key films that introduced Japanese animation to the English-speaking world.
p1994
aVMy Neighbour Totoro is the story of two little girls, Satsuki and Mei (Noriko Hidaka and Chika Sakamoto respectively, or, in the English dub, real-life sisters Dakota and Elle Fanning), who travel to the country with their father.
p1995
aVSince their new home, a weather-beaten old house, lies near to a forest, it isn't long before the sisters are exploring the clearings and tree-lined lanes.
p1996
aVThey soon discover that, despite living out in the sticks, there are plenty of neighbours closeby who have made the woodland their home - sprites, spirits and troll-like Totoros who seem to have leapt out of fantasy and fable.
p1997
aVThe girls' adventures with their new friends are by turns enchanting and whimsical, displaying Miyazaki's unrivalled skill at transporting children's unfettered imagination, keen curiosity and sense of wonder onto the big screen.
p1998
aVUnder Miyazaki's direction, even the everyday is transformed into something fantastical, and simple chores like cleaning a dusty house and waiting for the bus in the rain are made into unforgettable moments of pure magic.
p1999
aVHowever, My Neighbour Totoro steps back from the precipice of tweeness by rooting the film in small-scale, humanistic themes of coming of age and potential loss.
p2000
aVThe ongoing illness of Satsuki and Mei's mother, as well as the older child's responsibility for her younger sister, form a compelling backbone for a tale that could easily have drifted off on its own flights of fancy.
p2001
aVIn a nutshell: One of the finest family films ever made.
p2002
aVMy Neighbour Totoro's mixture  of spectacular animation, endearing characters and solid,  universal  themes single it out as a true Ghibli classic, and a  contender for  Miyazaki's best work overall.
p2003
aVBy Richard Luck\u000a
p2004
aV\u000aBen Affleck has some explaining to do in \u201cGone Girl.\u201d\u000aDirector David Fincher has the gift of making people feel uncomfortable.
p2005
aVOh, there\u2019s always loads of suspense in his films, but never complacency.
p2006
aVThat\u2019s what I love about his movies, and \u201cGone Girl\u201d is no exception.
p2007
aV\u201cGone Girl\u201d is a psychological thriller based on the best-selling novel by Gillian Flynn, who also wrote the screenplay.
p2008
aVIt\u2019s the breathtaking story of a husband (Ben Affleck) who\u2019s believed responsible for the kidnapping and presumed death of his wife (Rosamund Pike).
p2009
aVNick Dunne (Affleck) has an abrasive personality.
p2010
aVHe can be charming when he needs to be, but always seems to be hiding a sly temperament underneath.
p2011
aVHe\u2019s not always successful disguising his true nature.
p2012
aVHis wife, Amy (Pike), is a smart and apparently upbeat woman who happily moves to Missouri with her husband, so he can be close to his dying mother.
p2013
aVOn the couple\u2019s fifth anniversary, Amy disappears from their home after an apparent struggle.
p2014
aVHer disappearance becomes a national obsession.
p2015
aVShe was the inspiration for a series of children\u2019s books written by her father and mother.
p2016
aVThe story progresses at a speedy clip, despite the film\u2019s 2-and-a-half hour runtime.
p2017
aVFincher, with Flynn\u2019s help, created a complex, logical shocker that leaves you restless, but attentive.
p2018
aVEven when you\u2019re given significant pieces of the puzzle and an overall image of it comes into view, it\u2019s anything goes until the end.
p2019
aVThere\u2019s an answer for everything as well.
p2020
aVI can\u2019t remember a single thing that can\u2019t be adequately explained with just a little thought.
p2021
aVAnd, for someone who\u2019s compulsively chained to logic, like myself, that\u2019s important.
p2022
aV\u201cGone Girl\u201d has plenty to say about how the media plays a role in celebrated criminal cases.
p2023
aVMissi Pyle is Ellen Abbott, a cable TV host based on HLN\u2019s Nancy Grace.
p2024
aVAnd, yes, she is disgusting.
p2025
aVIt\u2019s a timely commentary on how high-profile crimes often get tried on tabloid television.
p2026
aVNot pretty.
p2027
aVThe casting is pretty much perfect.
p2028
aVAffleck is playing a version of himself, or at least how the public and press imagine he might be.
p2029
aVRosamund Pike does an admirable job with her complicated character.
p2030
aVI\u2019m not so sure it was Oscar-worthy, but she did get the nomination.
p2031
aVAnd, I\u2019m okay with that.
p2032
aVRest of the cast does a fine job.
p2033
aVTyler Perry was surprisingly aces as Nick\u2019s celebrity attorney.
p2034
aV\u201cGone Girl\u201d is yet another awesome accomplishment by one of the best directors working today.
p2035
aVThe film excites and entertains with an ending that\u2019s surprising to say the least.
p2036
aVGrade: A\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: January 13, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 149 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cR\u201d\u000aReleased by 20th Century Fox Home Entertainment\u000aBen Affleck meets with detectives and the parents of his missing wife in \u201cGone Girl.\u201d\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2037
aV\u000aDavid Fincher\u2019s latest film is a lot of things, but above all it\u2019s an exercise in deception.
p2038
aVMirroring its twisty, turny plot that tracks the disappearance of \u2018Amazing\u2019 Amy Dunne and the suspicion that falls upon her husband Nick in the aftermath, Gone Girl delivers one rug pull after another as Fincher flits from genre to genre with a reckless abandon.
p2039
aVStarting out as a straightforward mystery before transitioning into thriller territory and then finally warping into a twisted black comedy in its tour de force final act, it\u2019s also by turns a crime drama, erotic thriller and a suburban/economic/media satire along the way.
p2040
aVYou get the sense that Fincher is constantly and very deliberately trying to wrong-foot and provoke his audience as he goes about making the most entertaining and intriguing film he can muster out of the popular, pulpy paperback.
p2041
aVPike and Affleck are both perfectly cast as Nick and Amy, the often inscrutable protagonists of the piece, and the first half of the film follows Nick and the investigation into Amy\u2019s disappearance in the present day, while flashbacks narrated by Amy in the form of diary entries recount the history of their relationship.
p2042
aVIt\u2019s Gone Girl: Him and Gone Girl: Her until the midpoint when the two narratives collide like a pair of freight trains, but even as the facts start to emerge and the plot progresses apace the tension fails to abate.
p2043
aVFincher\u2019s frequent DoP Jeff Cronenworth captures proceedings in a crisp and hermetic cool grey, yet there\u2019s always the sense that we\u2019re being dragged along on our stomachs through a sordid and polluted world.
p2044
aVIt makes for a deeply unsettling and corrosive watch.
p2045
aVThere\u2019s one explosive sequence in particular \u2013 and you\u2019ll know it when you see it \u2013 that is as well-staged as anything Fincher\u2019s done throughout his illustrious career.
p2046
aVIt\u2019s so perfectly choreographed yet captures a brief moment of presumably involuntary improvisation from Rosamund Pike (which you\u2019d bet your bottom dollar has come about thanks to Fincher\u2019s insistence on multiple takes) that\u2019s utterly imperfect and human, but in the moment plays as hilarious and spine-chilling in equal measure.
p2047
aVGone Girl\u2019s depiction of the media can at times feel a little broad \u2013 especially when it comes to Missi Pyle\u2019s borderline libellous TV host-cum-commentator \u2013 but it\u2019s telling that it still feels fairly true to life.
p2048
aVFincher castigates modern news journalism for its tendency to perpetuate false narratives and make snap judgements based on limited, biased and out-of-context information.
p2049
aVBut perhaps the film\u2019s masterstroke is delivered in its final moments when we\u2019re suddenly made to ask whether we as an audience are complicit.
p2050
aVHow well have we ever known Nick and Amy Dunne?
p2051
aVWhen have we really seen their true selves?
p2052
aVDo we ever come to truly understand what made them tick?
p2053
aVOver 149 minutes David Fincher is like a puppet-master, provoking us into moments of empathy, repulsion and judgement.
p2054
aVIn retrospect, it seems churlish to have ever tried to form opinions based on the limited, biased and out-of-context information Gone Girl decides to divulge to us on a piecemeal basis.\u000a
p2055
aV\u000a\u000a(Reader note: Spoilers follow.)
p2056
aVThere are very few likeable people in Gone Girl, David Fincher\u2019s film adaptation of Gillian Flynn\u2019s bestselling book, which may explain its critical acclaim.
p2057
aVBad characters are in vogue these days: not as foils to good characters or as animate morality lessons about the dangers of drugs and crime, but as protagonists who finish first, unscathed and unrepentant.
p2058
aVFrom Breaking Bad to The Wolf of Wall Street to House of Cards (the first two episodes of which Fincher directed), moral ambiguity in the movies and on TV is now a mark of sophistication and depth.
p2059
aVBy these standards, then, Gone Girl is the deepest movie ever made.
p2060
aVThe film\u2019s protagonist, Nick Dunne (Ben Affleck), is an aloof, misogynistic hipster (he owns a bar called the Bar) who doesn\u2019t appear remotely distraught when his wife, Amy (Rosamund Pike) goes missing on the morning of their fifth wedding anniversary.
p2061
aVHe is irritated when he finds his front door wide open, his glass coffee table smashed in, and his wife mysteriously absent\u2014but he isn\u2019t scared; a sign in the minds of police and the media that he may be hiding something.
p2062
aVFincher\u2019s film begins as Flynn\u2019s book does, in Nick\u2019s irrefutably creepy voice.
p2063
aVHe wishes he could open his wife\u2019s \u201cfinely shaped head,\u201d he tells us, and extract some answers to the questions that \u201cstormcloud over every marriage.
p2064
aV\u2018What are you thinking?
p2065
aVWho are you?
p2066
aVWhat have we done to each other?\u2019 \u201d Amy is a waifish, nagging, spoiled New Yorker, resentful of Nick for moving them from Manhattan to his sleepy Missouri hometown after the recession.
p2067
aVWe are to believe, based on a sequence of flashbacks and voiceovers reminiscent of Desperate Housewives (these are substitutes for Amy\u2019s diary entries in the book) that Nick and Amy were once in love, but even their tender moments are laced with foreboding.
p2068
aVWhat makes Gone Girl, in its earlier moments, such an engaging mystery is the unreliable narration.
p2069
aVIn print and on screen, we shift back and forth between Amy and Nick\u2019s voices, equally wary of both but hopeful that their skewed versions of events will give us insight into who they are and potentially, what has become of Amy.
p2070
aVDid Nick kill her?
p2071
aVOr is he innocent, and simply relieved she is gone?
p2072
aVNick claims Amy is a demanding shrew, and Amy claims Nick is absent and angry, verging on abusive.
p2073
aVThe competing narration is evidence that marriage is a mystery unto itself, with or without a missing persons case.
p2074
aVUnfortunately this is when Flynn, who adapted the screenplay from her book, drops the cheap, anachronistic bomb on us: Amy, it turns out, isn\u2019t merely an unreliable narrator in the same obfuscating fashion as Nick.
p2075
aVShe is an inadmissible narrator: a comically insane femme fatale whose version of events isn\u2019t sanitized to win us over, but fabricated almost in its entirety to incriminate Nick.
p2076
aVShe morphs instantly from a real person into a caricature from one of Tyler Perry\u2019s Biblical revenge allegories, a sociopath who makes false rape accusations and penetrates herself with a wine bottle in order to mimic signs of \u201cforced entry.\u201d (Ironically, Perry plays the only likeable character in Gone Girl, hot-shot defence attorney Tanner Bolt).
p2077
aVFlynn\u2019s foray into Fatal Attraction territory has caused controversy since the book\u2019s release in 2012.
p2078
aVSome critics accused the author, a Missouri native like her protagonist, of being anti-feminist.
p2079
aVThe limitations of film are especially unkind to Amy\u2019s character, who is \u201cstripped of her self-justification\u201d when adapted to screen, writes Amanda Dobbins in Vulture.
p2080
aVFlynn has defended her villainous heroine by lamenting the lack of complex women characters in literature.
p2081
aV\u201cIsn\u2019t it time to acknowledge the ugly side?\u201d she writes in an essay on her website.
p2082
aV\u201cI\u2019ve grown so weary of the spunky heroines, brave rape victims, soul-searching fashionistas that stock so many books.\u201d\u000aWell, I\u2019ve grown weary of the woman scorned.
p2083
aVA heroine willing to set the world on fire to punish her inattentive, philandering husband is a cliché far greater and older than Eat Pray Love.
p2084
aVGone Girl may begin a smart and promising mystery, but it ends a misogynistic wet dream.
p2085
aV23 shares\u000a\u000a\u000a                Twitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse David FincherGone Girl \u000a\u000a\u000a
p2086
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aAs a fan of Gillian Flynn\u2019s Gone Girl, the notion of David Fincher bringing her twist-laden, guilt-infused novel to the big screen was a perfect fit.
p2087
aVDitto for Ben Affleck\u2019s casting as the often slimy, only semi-sympathetic and sometimes ill-advisedly smirking Nick Dunne, and Rosamund Pike his missing, put-upon wife Amy.
p2088
aVWith former Entertainment Weekly TV writer Flynn herself penning the screenplay and the likes of Neil Patrick Harris, Kim Dickens, Patrick Fugit, Tyler Perry and Scoot McNairy popping up amongst the supporting cast, all signs pointed to a quality adaptation and Gone Girl does not disappoint.
p2089
aVThere\u2019s little room for Fincher-isms here.
p2090
aVWith a ton of story to get through, his directorial flourishes feel limited to precise, eerie lighting of scenes that are more pacey than he usually delivers \u2013 and for good reason, since Gone Girl feels like it moves along at a clip, yet still clocks in at 2 hours and 29 minutes.
p2091
aVIt\u2019s the most straight-forward film Fincher\u2019s made since Panic Room, and even that boasted the sort of showiness that\u2019s not on offer here.
p2092
aVInstead the director seems content to let the narrative do the work, doing justice to the pulpy story by not getting himself between moviegoers and Affleck\u2019s perfectly-suited performance.
p2093
aVUnexpectedly funny at times and happy to linger on its bloodiest moments, Gone Girl is perfectly capable of surprises (including blink-and-you\u2019d-miss-it shots of two leading men\u2019s junk) that punctuate Flynn\u2019s twisted tale with venomous glee.
p2094
aVA totally different beast to Fincher\u2019s arguably unnecessary The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo, this superior thriller arrives at a time when Hollywood mostly seems to have forgotten how to make \u2018em.
p2095
aV\u2018Gone Girl\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p2096
aVIn a world where most comedies have barely enough jokes to beef up the trailer, Monty Python And The Holy Grail stands apart.
p2097
aVIn fact, there are so many gags they get in the way of the other good stuff.
p2098
aVThe brilliantly-dressed sets, the painstaking attention to detail, the atmospheric Scottish landscape, the clever use of the film's one principle location (Stirling's Doune Castle) - few historical dramas are as handsome.
p2099
aVFor all of Hazel Pethig's costume cunning and Roy Forge Smith's design wizardry, Holy Grail will probably never be recognized for its accurate recreation of the Dark Ages.
p2100
aVFor, when all's said and done, this is a film about dismembered swordsmen, politically active peasants and knights who say "Ni!"
p2101
aVThat such disparate elements are woven into a (fairly) coherent story is just one aspect of Grail's genius.
p2102
aVAnother is that the film preserves the inspired formula of the Pythons' TV sketches - comprising low comedy, highbrow humour, gusto-packed musical numbers and Terry Gilliam's inimitable animation.
p2103
aVLife Of Brian might be the (slightly) better film, but Grail is much truer to the troupe's spirit, with its tale of how Arthur (Chapman) and his men search for the cup of Christ, along the way encountering stroppy Frenchmen and an enchanter called Tim, and learning some really useful information from the man in Scene 24.
p2104
aVThat Holy Grail is so good is all the more remarkable given how bad it could have been.
p2105
aVMade for a pittance by two men who'd never directed a feature film before, Grail also had to overcome the small matter of nominal lead Graham Chapman's raging alcoholism.
p2106
aVBut while his drinking might have effected the way the film was shot (unable to remember his lines, Chapman's takes were invariably very short), it doesn't detract from a performance that establishes him as the real actor of the group.
p2107
aVAs for the others, they all have narrow ranges, but this isn't a problem since within their respective fields, there are few better performers.
p2108
aVJohn Cleese is particularly inspired as the blood-hungry Lancelot and the French guard with a unique line in insults.
p2109
aV("Your mother was a hamster and your father smelt of elderberries!")
p2110
aVThis being a Python product, comedy curmudgeons will hark on about consistency.
p2111
aVBut while not everything here is 24-carat comedy gold, the fact remains that the very sketches some consider weak are the ones that make the movie for others.
p2112
aVAnd whatever bum notes it might hit, Holy Grail is a film in which the word "Camelot" is rhymed with "push the pram a lot".
p2113
aVPeople have been knighted for less.
p2114
aVJust ask Tim Rice.\u000a																
p2115
aVKazan at the height of his powers, as yet untraumatized by any involvement with Senator Joe, and free to elucidate the grim imprisonments of life around the Brooklyn docks.
p2116
aVBrando is Terry, the boy who coulda beena contenda, stuck between casual slavery unloading packing cases in the harbour and the dream of being a prizefighter; Saint is Terry's girlfriend, trying to negotiate a way out of their lives; Steiger his sly brother, Malden the priest forced to watch his flock demoralized and dehumanized by the murderous practice of the shipping companies and the union.
p2117
aVThe finest scene is not the one in which Brando and Steiger have their taxi-cab altercation about one-way tickets to Palookaville, but a confrontation between the lovers, a breathless, savage, desperate argument that's almost drowned out by the blare of whistles and klaxons from the harbour.
p2118
aVThe first 20 minutes of Saving Private Ryan is a visual assault, acclaimed as one of cinema's most accurate realisations of warfare.
p2119
aVCaptain John Miller (Hanks), a schoolteacher turned soldier, is among the US troops storming Omaha Beach on D-Day.
p2120
aVActing as the eyes of the audience, everyman Miller takes in the horrors of the experience: men maimed, deafened and terrified.
p2121
aVThe sequence, with its immersive, handheld cinematography, effectively carries popcorn-munching film-goers closer to the brutalities of war than they would ever choose to be.
p2122
aVSubsequently our nerves settle only as far as those of the traumatized but professional Miller.
p2123
aVMiller is called up to lead a small force ahead of the main body of troops to find one Private Ryan (Damon), the surviving brother of three soldiers killed in the same week, in a kind of humanitarian military PR gesture.
p2124
aVDespite the familiar characterisations in Miller's troop (Sizemore, Burns, Pepper, Goldberg), and the dubious waving of the Stars and Stripes, Spielberg takes a traditional boy's own war story and crafts an effective, moving film.
p2125
aVRent Reservoir Dogs now on Film4oD\u000aOr rent other films that stand the test of time now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aReservoir Dogs announced the arrival of the most exciting director to come along in ages and the iconic opening sequence provided 1990s cinema with one of its most memorable scenes.After a bank heist goes wrong, the thieves return to their hideout for ear-slicing torture and violent recrimination.
p2126
aVCrisp, funky, dangerous - Quentin Tarantino's debut bristled with a new energy, head-butting a tired genre with dubious morals, cruel humour and a script nodding frantically to the coolest in pop culture.
p2127
aVHe'd learned his trade working in a video store and, like a DJ mixing old tunes to a pumping new beat, brazenly sampled Boorman, Scorsese, Kubrick and the rest.The language is pure Mean Streets, the repetitive structure comes from The Killing, the opening from footage of Sinatra's Ratpack striding through Vegas, and the denouement from Ringo Lam's exaggeration in City On Fire and Sergio Leone's The Good, The Bad And The Ugly The colour coordinated gang are all impressive (Steve Buscemi probably has the edge as the plaintive Mr Pink), but what makes it so thrilling is Tarantino's taste and, crucially, an erudition that is all his own.
p2128
aVBrowse our reviews of other arresting directorial debuts
p2129
aVMugged at the 1995 Oscars by Forrest Gump, this enduringly powerful prison drama promotes the unquenchable human spirit with an intelligence that the gooey Gump readily sacrificed.
p2130
aVDespite the film's modest performance at the box office on its first release, Frank Darabont made a major splash with his assured directorial debut.
p2131
aVAdapted by the director himself from a Stephen King short story - one that appeared in the same 'Different Seasons' collection that spawned the films Stand By Me and Apt Pupil - the plot has Tim Robbins as Andy Dufresne, a man arriving in prison in 1946 on a double life sentence for the murder of his wife and her lover.
p2132
aVAndy is an apparently decent man with a preternaturally calm disposition, who is quietly insistent about his own innocence.
p2133
aVHe befriends Red (Freeman), a veteran of the penal system, and their growing friendship over 20 years forms the backbone of the film - and provides a narrative pay-off as satisfying as it is heart-warming.
p2134
aVUsing a voiceover narration, much of which is taken verbatim from King's story, the film's great triumph is its sincerity, and even those moments that might have felt mawkish - the suicide of the old lag, for example, who fails to adjust to life on the outside - achieve the dignity of genuine tragedy.
p2135
aVAt nearly two and a half hours in length, it's a film with plenty of time on its hands yet, thanks to engagingly warm performances by Robbins and Freeman, it very rarely drags.
p2136
aVRobbins in particular locates a deep-seated humanity in his enigmatic banker (who unexpectedly benefits from his accounting skills), while the issues that Darabont is concerned with - faith, friendship, patience and hope - are woven seamlessly into the fabric of the story.
p2137
aVThe director returned to Stephen King for his belated follow-up, The Green Mile, which failed to live up to the promise of his debut, replacing its warmth and subtlety with sheer bulk.
p2138
aVHere though Darabont achieves that rarest of goals and creates a film that not only stands up to repeated viewings but which, for its legion of dedicated fans, approaches the power and significance of on-screen therapy.\u000a																
p2139
aV\u000aKatniss and friends walk a lot in \u201cThe Hunger Games: Mockingjay, Part I.\u201d\u000a\u201cThe Hunger Games\u201d is not my favorite film franchise.
p2140
aVThat\u2019s an understatement.
p2141
aVBut, you have to admire its power at the box office.
p2142
aVFans of Suzanne Collins\u2019 books are loyal to the films.
p2143
aVAttention must be paid.
p2144
aVYet.
p2145
aVI continue to have problems with the pompousness of the Capital City and the excessive sentimentality of the freedom fighters.
p2146
aVThat signals dishonesty.
p2147
aVAnd, \u201cMockingjay\u201d is just loaded with spurious emotions.
p2148
aVPart I of \u201cMockingjay\u201d is mostly about war propaganda.
p2149
aVThe rebels want to win the hearts and minds of the masses as a way to foment revolution.
p2150
aVBut, the lack of enthusiasm expressed by our heroine, Katniss Everdeen (Jennifer Lawrence) is meant to endear us to her.
p2151
aVBut, you can\u2019t BUY her emotions, damn you!
p2152
aVShe\u2019s the heavyweight hero and can\u2019t be manipulated into false emotions.
p2153
aVI found the propaganda storyline quite absurd.
p2154
aVAnd, speaking of silly, did you see Donald Sutherland?
p2155
aVHe\u2019s still \u201cThe Hunger Games\u201d best walking sight gag as President of Panem.
p2156
aVI can\u2019t help but laugh out loud, even before he speaks.
p2157
aVHow are we supposed to be afraid of someone is such a silly fop?
p2158
aVAnd, basically that goes for everyone in the Capital City.
p2159
aVEven Everdeen\u2019s true love, Peeta Mellark (Josh Hutchinson), looks trifling in his new big-city duds.
p2160
aVHe\u2019s now the reluctant spokesman for Sutherland\u2019s tyrannical leader.
p2161
aVThe capital is full of peacocks, and it\u2019s difficult to believe they could be in charge of an entire nation.
p2162
aVThe late Philip Seymour Hoffman is not well-served in his final performance as Plutarch Heavensbee.
p2163
aVHe\u2019s supposed to be one of the masterminds of the revolution.
p2164
aVInstead he comes off as the blowhard champion of all things Katniss.
p2165
aVIsn\u2019t she amazing?
p2166
aVGosh, darn you!
p2167
aVThe direction by Francis Lawrence (\u201cWater for Elephants\u201d) is overcranked.
p2168
aVIt\u2019s obvious there wasn\u2019t enough material to make two films and, so, the first is relegated to being a set-up piece.
p2169
aVFrom a marketing standpoint, two parts is pure magic.
p2170
aVEveryone pays twice to see a single adaptation.
p2171
aVWhen a box office behemoth is involved, two paid admissions are better than one.
p2172
aV\u201cThe Hunger Games\u201d are almost over.
p2173
aVWe are near the end.
p2174
aVAnd, I see a world where all are dandified with smelly leotards and jazzy wigs.
p2175
aVIt\u2019s the future, baby.
p2176
aVGrade: D\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: March 6, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 123 minutes\u000aReleased by Lionsgate Home Entertainment\u000aHello from the Capital City, my friends.
p2177
aVI am Peeta.
p2178
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2179
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aDeparting from the battle royale format of the two previous Hunger Games instalments, Mockingjay \u2013 Part 1 plunges the franchise into deeper terrain.
p2180
aVFiguratively, with the pic continuing Katniss Everdeen\u2019s trauma-fuelled mental disintegration and its subject matter becoming bleaker and more violent, as well as the literally underground setting in which much of Mockingjay\u2019s talk of revolution plays out.
p2181
aVAgainst this deep bunker backdrop the cast spend a lot of time sporting unflattering jumpsuits and talking about what is to come in the next chapter, truncated storytelling that hampers this working as a standalone pic.
p2182
aVYes, there is plenty of narrative to work through, and the performances and events that unfold deserve the breathing space that splitting Mockingjay into two films allows.
p2183
aVBut that makes for all build-up and little payoff, lacking a blockbuster set piece finale (even as it tries to make the most of a rebellion skirmish and an aerial commando raid).
p2184
aVThankfully there\u2019s an emotional climax, a cliffhanger that\u2019s less deflating than that of Catching Fire and will further enthuse the audience to see Part 2 - not that they really need any assistance at this point.
p2185
aVDirector Francis Lawrence continues his knack for avoiding obvious, emotionally overwrought moments, something he\u2019s aided considerably in by Lawrence\u2019s expectedly excellent performance.
p2186
aVThe whole franchise has benefited immensely from the inner turmoil she brings to life, and no more so than here.
p2187
aVFor swathes of the film, Katniss has little to do but react to the actions of others, though she does get to blow stuff up with her bow and enjoy a literal save the cat moment.
p2188
aVAnd until Part 2, that\u2019s the most you\u2019re gonna get.
p2189
aV\u2018The Hunger Games: Mockingjay \u2013 Part 1\u2032 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p2190
aV\u000aThe most enduring image The Hunger Games: Mockingjay - Part 1 offers is an eyeball-searing hell-scape of incinerated corpses, their ribs poking through blackened, immolated flesh.
p2191
aVThis is not Harry Potter, this is not the Twilight saga - The Hunger Games is here to offer an in-your-face critique of the abuse of power and neither the characters nor the material is about to shy away from the issues.
p2192
aVBoth book and film understand and want show their audience that contemporary wars are fought as much through media as they are on the battlefield.
p2193
aVOr rather, while wars have always been fought through the media, these days the media is also in the thick of the actual fight: cameras can be sent out unobtrusively into the field to capture "the truth," though it is of course still in the interpretation of these truths that hearts and minds are won and lost.
p2194
aVAs the film opens, we pick up with Katniss (Jennifer Lawrence), furious that the rebel alliance led by President Coin (a frosty Julianne Moore) plotted to save her from the Hunger Games at the expense of her more expendable companions.
p2195
aVThey counter that she is their mascot - the emblem of the revolution; they needed her to survive.
p2196
aVAs she refuses to co-operate, they realize they also need her good will.
p2197
aVThe majority of the film is about negotiating that co-operation and how to play it on camera once they finally have her onside.
p2198
aVThe script, by Peter Craig and Danny Strong (Buffy fans may recognise Strong for his onscreen work as nerdy Jonathan Levinson), has a lot of fun with Katniss Everdeen's legendary awkwardness.
p2199
aVPlutarch Heavensbee (Philip Seymour Hoffman in his last role) attempts to media train Katniss into a serviceable mouth-piece for their cause, leading to comic scenes of desperation as he and his team realise quite what a dud screen presence she is when asked to play-act the revolution.
p2200
aVIt's a smart excuse for the narrative to take Katniss out to where the action is, which is also what we want as an audience: we need action, even if it is all being staged for our benefit.
p2201
aVIt's hard to shake the feeling that this film doesn't have a particularly cinematic arc, and that this is partly a consequence of carving two films out of one book.
p2202
aVThere is a lot to get through in that third book, but much of it is internal and emotional, to do with how Katniss wrestles with everything that is demanded of her and with her feelings for Peeta, who is mostly restricted to brief onscreen glimpses as the Capitol cranks out its own propaganda making use of their most influential hostage.
p2203
aVThese brief glimpses of Peeta, Caesar Flickerman (Stanley Tucci) and President Snow (Donald Sutherland having more fun than anyone else in the film) really do pop - if only there were more of them.
p2204
aVPerhaps it proves Suzanne Collins' satirical point that the absence of the Capitol in this instalment is so keenly felt.
p2205
aVThe world of Panem is named for the Latin tag "panem et circenses": the idea of using "bread and circuses" to distract a population from their lack of real freedom by giving them a glittering show.
p2206
aVWe're so used to blockbusters on this scale delivering precisely that show, it's a little disconcerting to realise that you have indeed been conditioned to miss it when it's left out in favour of something more ideologically sound.
p2207
aVWe want more of the decadent Capitol and their razzle dazzle; the revolution is a little sombre.
p2208
aVAnd that's exactly how the Capitol's real life equivalents maintain their power, by making radical change seem so crashingly colourless.\u000a
p2209
aVThe road to Hollywood is littered with the corpses of pop stars who've tried their hand at acting and found the world wasn't ready for their close-ups (stand up Michael Jackson, Maria Carey, Madonna).
p2210
aVWhich is probably why 8 Mile has the oddball pairing of Eminem and Curtis Hanson.
p2211
aVJust as Dr Dre lent Marshall Mathers III credibility when he emerged onto the hip hop scene a few years ago, Wonder Boys director Hanson gives the rapper cinematic legitimacy for his big screen debut - and, man, does he come off well.
p2212
aVAs Rabbit, an aspiring MC from a broken home who's trying to work his way up through Detroit's black hip-hop clubs, he's essentially playing a fictionalised version of himself.
p2213
aVHowever, rather than turn 8 Mile into an Eminem vanity project, Hanson and writer Scott Silver (Johns) hone the star's personality traits to create a strong, socially-aware character-driven drama.
p2214
aVLike Hanson's L.A.
p2215
aVConfidential, 8 Mile has a strong sense of place.
p2216
aVThe title refers to the street that separates Detroit's affluent white neighbourhoods from its poor black ones and Hanson - by way of Amores Perros cinematographer Rodrigo Prieto's fluid-but-raw hand-held work - brilliantly captures the chaos of a once great industrial city gone to ruin.
p2217
aVRabbit, or Jimmy Smith Jr (Eminem), is the nominal white kid from the wrong side of the tracks who dreams of using his MC skills to get out of Detroit's run-down 313 area.
p2218
aVBy day he works in a steel plant, at night he works on his lyrics in the trailer he shares with his boozy, bingo-addicted white-trash mother Stephanie (Basinger) and adoring six-year-old sister Lily (Greenfield).
p2219
aVIn the opening scenes we see Rabbit choke in front of a sea of black faces at a free-style battle hosted by his friend Future (Phifer).
p2220
aVHe scuttles off stage to catcalls of "Vanilla Ice" - something the real Slim Shady endured on his way up.
p2221
aVThe rest of the film is built around Rabbit finding his voice.
p2222
aVOn the surface it's a hip-hop Rocky, but while the subtext of Stallone's film was about putting a smart-talking black man - namely Muhammad Ali - in his place, 8 Mile is about defusing racial tension and focussing attention on the economic deprivation that intensifies division.
p2223
aVAs Future tells Rabbit: "When they hear you, it's not gonna matter what colour you are."
p2224
aVIf there's a fault with this set-up it's that the women are under-served.
p2225
aVRabbit's love interest Alex (Brittany Murphy - looking like Courtney Love circa 1991), is a wannabe model who is trying to make it by screwing someone to help her get a portfolio together.
p2226
aVAs for Basinger, her moment of redemption comes when she wins the bingo.
p2227
aVFor a film that skilfully negotiates racial and class-issues with a minimum of clichés, it's a little depressing that it is so reductive with its female characters.\u000a																
p2228
aVOkay then, so you haven't seen the original Inglorious Bastards.
p2229
aVWorry no longer - Quentin Tarantino's latest has as much to do with Enzo G Castellari's exploitation movie as Ice-T has to do with the history of the East India Company.
p2230
aVAnd those fretting that QT might still be on a Grind House kick can also calm themselves.
p2231
aVDeath Proof this ain't.
p2232
aVHis best film since Pulp Fiction it most certainly is.
p2233
aVNot that everyone will see it as such.
p2234
aVIndeed, you wouldn't have to try too hard to find Inglourious Basterds a trying exercise in excess and homage.
p2235
aVToo in thrall to other movies and gratuitous violence the cynic might say.
p2236
aVThe trouble is, adopting this sort of position is to deny yourself a lot of entertainment.
p2237
aVBecause Inglourious Basterds is as much fun as you can have in a cinema without embarrassing an usher.
p2238
aVIt's 1943, and the war is in the balance.
p2239
aVJewish avengers, comedy Nazis (both Hitler and Goebbels are played for laughs), a veiled celebration of the cinema of Leni Riefenstahl - you'll find all human life in the Inglourious Basterds.
p2240
aVIncluding a sadistic Standartenfuhrer known as "The Jew Hunter", played by the awesome Christoph Waltz .
p2241
aVAn Austrian actor resident in London, Tarantino has said he wouldn't have made Inglourious Basterds had he not discovered Waltz.
p2242
aVWitty, slimy, vile, winning, subtle, overstated - his is the sort of complete performance upon which careers are founded.
p2243
aVPut bluntly, he's the best thing about Inglourious Basterds, and the film is weaker every moment he's not on screen.
p2244
aVYou could say similar thing about Brad Pitt.
p2245
aVNot that there's anything understated about his 'Aldo The Apache', leader of a Jewish-American platoon operating behind enemy lines.
p2246
aVNo, this is what you'd get if you brought together Clark Gable, Errol Flynn and John Wayne, and then stuck 'em in a blender.
p2247
aVHammy camera-hogging some might cry, but since that's the order of the day here, Pitt's efforts blend seamlessly with Mike Myers' seedy British General Ed Fenech, Diane Kruger's Dietrich-esque Bridget Von Hammersmark, and Eli Roth's muscle-bound, baseball bat-wielding Donny Donowitz.
p2248
aVThere are almost too many highspots to point up.
p2249
aVTake the opening sequence in which Waltz's Hans Lander interrogates a dairy farmer he believes guilty of harbouring Jews.
p2250
aVSure, the whole thing's a steal from The Good, The Bad And The Ugly, but the pacing, tension and dialogue are of a standard previously unseen in Tarantino's cinema.
p2251
aVThe ageing enfant terrible might not have grown up but he's certainly grown. 
p2252
aVIs everything falling apart or is it just us?
p2253
aVIt's been a traumatic start to the new century and then late in the decade comes a supposed Hollywood comic book blockbuster that asks: do we deserve to be saved from the terrorists?
p2254
aVOr has democracy failed, and would we be safer under a fascist regime led by a man dressed as a bat?
p2255
aVChristopher Nolan's The Dark Knight is an annihilating experience, especially if you watch it in the enormous IMAX theatre, a vertiginous phenomenon at the best of times; when that eight storey screen fills up with the scarred, sweating, greasepaint-smeared face of Heath Ledger's Joker, speaking of chaos and the cannibalism lurking under civilisation, the temptation is to run screaming into the night.
p2256
aVThe action is devastating, high-wire and realistic.
p2257
aVThe ideas are even more destructive, presenting Western civilisation as a precarious condition liable to break down when threatened with an enemy it cannot bargain with or buy off, an enemy who is insane and only wants to see it burn.
p2258
aVThat's hyperbole, sure.
p2259
aVBut hyperbole is the great stage upon which the modern mythology of comic book heroes plays out.
p2260
aVThe screenplay written by Jonathan and Christopher Nolan, with additions to the story from David S Goyer, synthesizes crucial elements from two of the greatest Batman comics, Frank Miller's 'The Dark Knight Returns' and Alan Moore's 'The Killing Joke'.
p2261
aVFrom Miller's groundbreaking portrait of an ageing Batman, the screenplay inherits the malign influence of a masked vigilante upon society, and what demons are unleashed as an unintended consequence of the thrilling psychic and social disorder inspired by a Batman.
p2262
aVFrom 'The Killing Joke' it extracts Moore's Joker, a connoisseur of insanity, visiting the same madness that led to his creation upon our heroes.
p2263
aVThe screenwriters have added a third provocation: when the Roman Empire had the barbarians at the gate, they suspended democracy and handed rule over to one man, Caesar, to protect them.
p2264
aVCould Batman be the new Caesar?
p2265
aVThe Dark Knight puts us through the wringer on this one, toying with fascism as a way out of the endless fear and crime before showing, at its close, that even the best of men would be corrupted by the responsibility of being judge, jury and executioner.
p2266
aVChristopher Nolan's first pass at this material was Batman Begins in 2005, a dark and gloomy movie, no doubt, but it needed a dose of the Scarecrow's psychedelic poison to set the citizens of Gotham at one another's throats.
p2267
aVThis time, Heath Ledger's Joker drips fear and disorder into the body politic and the results are far more disturbing.
p2268
aVLedger tragically died after filming was completed, and the premature death of such a coruscating talent contributes a terrible urgency to his performance, rubbing away at your knowledge that the actor was just messing around.
p2269
aVWith his lank unwashed green hair, hunched shoulders and restless tongue, always drawing back the saliva from the scars at the corner of his smile, this Joker is all our fears of the amoral urban dispossessed (he likes his knife crime) multiplied by our terror of the suicide bomber, the killer who cannot be reasoned with, the murderer who wants nothing but our destruction.
p2270
aVHe is Kurt Cobain's self-hatred directed outwards, a nihilist to make Nietzsche quiver.
p2271
aVAgainst the forces of darkness, we have a white knight.
p2272
aVAaron Eckhart's district attorney Harvey Dent, who wages effective war against the upper echelons of Gotham's criminal classes.
p2273
aVTogether with Gary Oldman's Lieutenant Gordon and Christian Bale's Batman, the forces of law and order gain the upper hand.
p2274
aVRachel Dawes, played by Maggie Gyllenhaal, falls in love with Dent, an unexpected twist in affairs as Batman Begins had Rachel - then played by Katie Holmes - all set up to be the love of Bruce Wayne's life.
p2275
aVHarvey and Batman's campaign is so effective that the criminals are forced to turn to the Joker, and so both men are responsible - if not entirely culpable - for the horrors that are unleashed, on the city and on themselves.
p2276
aVThe Dark Knight succeeds where other comic book movies fail because of its bone-crunching physicality.
p2277
aVOn the IMAX screens, even the establishing shots of swooping city vistas are a white-knuckle ride.
p2278
aVWhen the filmmakers flip a 40-foot tractor trailer in the heart of Chicago, you'll never want to see another computer-generated fight sequence again.
p2279
aVThat physicality also comes from the actors.
p2280
aVChristian Bale thinned himself right down for The Machinist and was a raw-boned prisoner of war in Werner Herzog's Rescue Dawn; his martial arts work as Batman makes the close combat sing.
p2281
aVHeath Ledger's Joker is like the wolf in 'Little Red Riding Hood', a mangy and disguised beast with a sardonic wit.
p2282
aVHe achieves more with one nurse's outfit than Jack Nicholson managed in the entirety of Tim Burton's Batman.
p2283
aVIt's only when the second villain of the piece appears, the horrific Two-Face, that we get a glimmer of computerised special effects - the result, by the way, is so bleak and scary that parents are advised against sneaking their little ones into this movie unless they want them to grow up disturbed.
p2284
aVThe supporting cast add vital colour and context.
p2285
aVMichael Caine's Alfred has the wisdom of a battle veteran, and his anecdotes from his time in Burma situate the comic book battle in the actual history of war.
p2286
aVMorgan Freeman's Lucius Fox once again plays Q to Batman's Bond, and provides an ethical check to the hero's flirtation with Big-Brother-style fascism.
p2287
aVGary Oldman's Lieutenant Gordon is the pragmatic face of the good cop who teeters on the edge when his family is threatened.
p2288
aVThe coup de grace of The Dark Knight is its structure.
p2289
aVAn ending seems to come, and emotionally you are drained but prepared for a third film that will complete the trilogy.
p2290
aVThat third film then unfolds before you.
p2291
aVHere the gates of hell open up with the appearance of Two-Face and the further ramifications of the Joker's plan.
p2292
aVToo often superhero films climax with a dull slugfest between computer-generated heroes and villains: here the ending reminds one of Fight Club's tower block-set face-off with something of Sophie's Choice and Michael Mann's Manhunter ; an emotionally draining encounter that ensures the film does not disappear into a flurry of special effects.\u000a																
p2293
aV\u000aIn Christopher Nolan's 2008 comic-book crime epic The Dark Knight, stalwart police lieutenant James Gordon called Batman, the caped crusader, 'the hero Gotham deserves, but not the one it needs right now.'
p2294
aVWhen it comes to Nolan's brand of super-sized cinema, though, you could say the opposite is true.
p2295
aVNolan's focus on spectacle, celluloid and smart narrative concepts is a very necessary ally in the ongoing battle to keep film relevant as a mass-market entertainment.
p2296
aVThen again, no one deserves to sit through almost three hours of rear-numbing cinema unless there's good reason to.
p2297
aVAt just shy of 170 minutes, Interstellar is Nolan's longest film to date, but it's also by turns his most brazenly ambitious and mind-numbingly ponderous.
p2298
aVMatthew McConaughey caps off his 'McConaissance' arc from smarmy romcom lead to indie darling to Oscar winner by leading this, the most ambitious blockbuster of the year, and lending it some required rootsy charm in the process.
p2299
aVHis southern-fried smoothness is a good fit for Cooper, a once-promising pilot reduced to being a farmer and single dad in Nolan's near-future America, which has turned agrarian after successive Dust Bowl-like catastrophes ravage the world's crops.
p2300
aVIt's a compelling start, and the solution, like in many sci-fi stories before it, lies in the stars.
p2301
aV'Solution' is the key term here, as Interstellar reveals that, while Christopher Nolan may court comparisons to the likes of cosmic auteurs Stanley Kubrick (2001) and Terrence Malick (The Tree Of Life), his big scientific and philosophical questions are rarely left unanswered, even when they touch on themes better left just out of comprehension's reach.
p2302
aVThe effect is not unlike Inception, which resembled a film about dreams made by someone who had never dreamt: this is a sci-fi film that rejects the mysteries of the galaxy for the comfort of resolution.
p2303
aVWhat Interstellar does have is scale in all dimensions, and the worlds envisaged by Nolan, his VFX crew at Double Negative and cinematographer Hoyte Van Hoytema (better known for more intimate fare, such as Her, Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy and Let The Right One In) are as technically accomplished as we've come to expect.
p2304
aVLikewise, Nolan's pulling power with A-grade actors is undiminished, with Michael Caine, Anne Hathaway and a few unbilled surprises willing to strap in for the ride - even if, in Caine and Hathaway's cases, they are primarily engines for elongated scenes of exposition.\u000a
p2305
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aNever has a nearly-three-hour blockbuster enthralled me in the way that Interstellar did.
p2306
aVAfter the grim seriousness and plodding pacing of his Dark Knight films, where Christopher Nolan did his damnedest to provide a real world for an utterly ridiculous character to play in, it\u2019s a relief to see him freed from such constraints.
p2307
aVNot that there isn\u2019t solid science underpinning Interstellar\u2019s world-building (and departing), in fact there\u2019s a ton of it.
p2308
aVThose not interested in cosmological hows and whys may find the necessary infodumps all too frequent, but where Interstellar eclipses Nolan\u2019s creativity as seen onscreen previously is in the sense of awe, wonder and spectacle he\u2019s able to conjure on this trip into the unknown.
p2309
aVThat the film veers all over the place is, to me, one of the things that justifies its length.
p2310
aVGiving himself more of that precious resource, time, to play with (and jettisoning the expected training montage second act), Nolan gets to introduce A-list actors late, indulge in sub-plots that don\u2019t emerge until the final half hour, and take us to some truly spectacular places along the way.
p2311
aVThe cast are good, if not outright great.
p2312
aVAs with other Nolan pics, his ability to construct strong characters powered by real emotion is lacking.
p2313
aVLuckily the likes of McConaughey, Chastain, Caine and even Hathaway (mostly) bring plenty to their performances.
p2314
aVPerhaps this is all sounding ho hum to you.
p2315
aVBut if space travel, sci-fi and visual spectacle appeal, you can\u2019t look past this triumph of the imagination where the wondrous universe is the true star.
p2316
aVInterstellar renders this semi-palatable for mainstream consumption thanks to co-writers Jonathan Nolan and theoretical physicist Kip Thorne.
p2317
aVAdd a director who may not have the singularity of vision possessed by Kubrick (himself flawed), and you\u2019ve still got one of the most watchable self-indulgent projects in ages.
p2318
aV\u2018Interstellar\u2019 movie times\u000a\u000a
p2319
aV\u000aMatthew McConaughey searches for a planet suitable for human life in \u201cInterstellar.\u201d\u000aKudos to Christopher Nolan for trying.
p2320
aV\u201cInterstellar\u201d almost makes it.
p2321
aVBut, the science fiction adventure film has problems after take-off.
p2322
aV\u201cInterstellar\u201d is a flawed but fascinating journey featuring plot elements that seem more Spielbergian than Nolanesque.
p2323
aVAnd, an outrageously unbalanced sound design becomes a major distraction late in the film.
p2324
aVMore on that, later.
p2325
aVA memorable sci-fi has to be more than just special effects.
p2326
aVThe story needs to equal all the razzle-dazzle.
p2327
aV\u201cInterstellar\u201d feels like someone else\u2019s film, a Spielberg retread.
p2328
aVThe story opens with a widower (Matthew McConaughey) trying to keep his family unit functioning while the world literally crumbles into dust clouds.
p2329
aVEarth needs food to feed its seven billion residents.
p2330
aVAnd, that means family farms are of the utmost importance.
p2331
aVFormer engineer/astronaut Cooper (McConaughey) lives in a low-tech world that doesn\u2019t need space travel anymore.
p2332
aVTechnology is on the fritz.
p2333
aVSo, Cooper manages the family farm with his father-in-law (John Lithgow) and his two children, Murph and Tom.
p2334
aVAfter a strange gravitational event in his daughter\u2019s bedroom, Cooper and Murph (Mackenzie Foy) hit the road to find a secret NASA operation planning an intergalactic mission.
p2335
aVIt\u2019s no surprise that Steven Spielberg was interested in this project, since it reportedly was written for him.
p2336
aVAnd, the first 45 minutes is basically \u201cClose Encounters of the Third Kind,\u201d minus the giant mound of mashed potatoes.
p2337
aVCo-screenwriter Jonathan Nolan (Christopher\u2019s brother) likely added the family/unearthly message elements as a way to attract and/or appease Spielberg.
p2338
aVSo, when Christopher Nolan took over as director, the Spielberg elements needed to go.
p2339
aVIt\u2019s not his movie anymore.
p2340
aVNolan would be better served with a complete rewrite.
p2341
aVWhen Cooper agrees to pilot a spaceship through a wormhole in a frantic effort to find a new habitable planet, that\u2019s when the story gets interesting.
p2342
aVAt the secret NASA operation, he meets his old professor (Michael Caine), the man with most of the answers.
p2343
aVThe crew of the Endurance includes the professor\u2019s daughter, Amelia Brand (Anne Hathaway).
p2344
aVRest of the story I will leave to you.
p2345
aVBecause, despite my complaints, I don\u2019t want to keep you from seeing this film or ruin the discovery process.
p2346
aVKeep in mind, Nolan\u2019s worst film is better than most of the crap coming out of Hollywood these days.
p2347
aVNolan used IMAX cameras for much of this production, and it shows.
p2348
aVThe photography is spectacular.
p2349
aVThe special effects are awesome.
p2350
aVSo, what happened with Zimmer\u2019s score?
p2351
aVIt was overpowering in key scenes.
p2352
aVI couldn\u2019t understand the dialogue.
p2353
aVYou could hear the characters speaking, but you could NOT comprehend what they were saying.
p2354
aVNolan says he planned it that way.
p2355
aVHard to believe, unless he\u2019s gone nuts.
p2356
aVThe acting in this space saga is quite excellent.
p2357
aVEspecially, McConaughey.
p2358
aVHe is the perfect everyman to go on this adventure.
p2359
aVAny praise he gets for this film is well-deserved.
p2360
aVFinally, the running time is 169 minutes.
p2361
aVThat\u2019s over three hours, folks.
p2362
aVThe story would have been better served with more specifics on why the earth was becoming uninhabitable.
p2363
aVThe takeaway from \u201cInterstellar\u201d is that Christopher Nolan is human after all.
p2364
aVIt\u2019s a trip marred by sound distortion, but still worthwhile.
p2365
aVGrade: B-\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: March 31, 2015\u000aFormats: Blu-ray combo pack and DVD\u000aRuntime: 169 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cPG-13\u2033 for some intense perilous action and brief strong language\u000aReleased by Paramount Home Media Distribution\u000aMatthew McConaughey and Anne Hathaway star in \u201cInterstellar.\u201d\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2366
aVRent this film now on Film4oD\u000aKubrick, cinema's chilliest genius, abandons conventional narrative here and presents a succession of beautifully-composed sketches on the theme of evolution, death and rebirth linked by the mystical presence of a large black monolith.
p2367
aVA fight between a group of proto-human apes demonstrates man's first use of tools, as one seizes a bone and adopts it as a weapon after experiencing some sort of epiphany by contact with the black slab.
p2368
aVA brilliant jump cut from the bone hurled into the air to a spacecraft floating in space fast forwards the film to the year 2001.
p2369
aVStrange happenings on the moon, involving the discovery of another - or the same - black slab and mysterious signals emanating from Jupiter lead to an exploratory mission to the giant planet on the 'Discovery'.
p2370
aVOn board, astronauts Dr Frank Poole (Lockwood) and Dr Dave Bowman (Dullea) carry out their duties precisely, monotonously, until the ship's omniscient computer HAL 2000 (voiced with sinister creaminess by Rain) malfunctions and events spiral out of control.After an impressionistic, nay psychedelic, trans-dimensional voyage, Poole encounters his own dying moments, and the film concludes with the birth of a 'star child'.This central film in Kubrick's informal science-fiction trilogy (started with Dr Strangelove and concluded with A Clockwork Orange) is a beautiful, wilful parable.
p2371
aVEpic in its vision, immaculate - and yet to be bettered in its conception - and ambiguously philosophical in its musings, 2001 deserves the title masterpiece.
p2372
aVIn the hands of many another director, Notorious would have been merely a film noir - a cruel story of a courageous, patriotic young woman turned inside out by manipulative and unscrupulous men, one of whom uses her love for him to force her into extreme danger.
p2373
aVBut with Hitchcock it becomes something deeper: a glorious exercise in film style, where virtuoso camerawork combines with the characters to create a wonderful harmony of visuals and narrative - and where the complexities of character and story exist above and beyond the dictates of genre.
p2374
aVAlicia Huberman (Bergman, in perhaps her best performance), is the daughter of a Nazi scientist who is recruited by the FBI in the person of T.R.Devlin (Grant, mixing manipulation and malign intent into his usual unruffled, suave screen persona) to infiltrate a group of Nazis in Rio De Janeiro - the Macguffin here is radioactive material secreted in wine bottles.
p2375
aVDespite being in love with Devlin, Huberman marries the Nazi cell's leader, Sebastian (Rains) in order to infiltrate the group totally - and paradoxically Sebastian's genuine love for this lonely, alcoholic, insecure woman makes him more appealing than the cynical and aptly named Devlin, who really has no compunction about exploiting her love to his own ends.
p2376
aVIt's a recipe for danger, disaster and death that comes magnificently to the boil in the story's final moments.
p2377
aVThe story is tightly woven, and brilliantly sustained - and interesting for the risks it takes with its characters.
p2378
aVThe hero and heroine are flawed: one cruel and manipulative, the other an alcholic flirt, while the bad guy has moral and heroic qualities that should be unseemly in an ex Nazi.
p2379
aVAnd the camerawork is often stunning.
p2380
aVIn one shot, a hungover Alicia sees Devlin upside down, and the camera pulls back to show him sliding across the floor towards her: Apart from being a virtuosic move, this conveys more about Devlin's slithery, untrustworthy character than mere words could ever manage.
p2381
aVHitchcock, it hardly needs saying, certainly knew how to use this visual medium to full and satisfying effect.
p2382
aV"Why can't you come?"
p2383
aVasks young Mourad (Youssef Tiberkanine) when his new, equally young neighbour Cyril (Thomas Doret) rejects an invitation to the cinema.
p2384
aV"It's in 3D.
p2385
aVIt'll be fun!"
p2386
aVCyril's refusal to go along represents a wittily oblique encapsulation of the filmmaking aesthetic that drives the Dardenne brothers.
p2387
aVFor their films, too, eschew the eye-popping sensationalism of Hollywood blockbusters, preferring the sort of rigorous naturalism and demi-monde environs more usually associated with the oeuvre of Robert Bresson (Pickpocket, Mouchette, L'Argent).
p2388
aVCyril does not want to go to the local flicks because he has an appointment with Wes (Egon Di Mateo), a manipulative hoodlum exploiting the boy's need for a father figure.
p2389
aVAbandoned by his own dad Guy (Jeremie Renier, also a feckless father in the Dardennes' The Child) to a state-run children's home, Cyril clings tenaciously to the unrealistic prospect of Guy coming back for him.
p2390
aVIndeed, when we first meet Cyril (nicknamed 'Pitbull' by Wes for his tenacity), he refuses to return a telephone to one of his carers, desperately clutching the receiver as though it were a lifeline to his father (who is absent even from telecommunications).
p2391
aVLater, when Cyril runs away to look for his father in what was once their apartment, the boy tries to evade his carers by clinging desperately to a compete stranger.
p2392
aV"Not so tight, it hurts," protests Samantha (Cecile de France) - but moved by the boy's (and perhaps her own) intense neediness, the hairdresser locates Cyril's beloved bike for him, and agrees to foster him on weekends.
p2393
aV"I'm not dreaming," Cyril insists to Samantha - yet it is precisely the boy's gradual, painful disillusionment that The Kid With A Bike traces, as Cyril comes to grips with the unwelcome truth about his father's disinterest, learns to accept someone else's unconditional love, and starts to take responsibility for his own actions.
p2394
aVWith the Dardennes' regular DP Alain Marcoen following Cyril's rites of passage in unobtrusive tracking shots, the film never soft-pedals the treacherous byways and alternative routes that Cyril only narrowly avoids on his road to security and happiness.
p2395
aVHere institutionalisation, criminality, even death itself, are no more than a stone's throw away  and, in a suitably cyclical depiction of morality, what goes around comes around.
p2396
aVMeanwhile, some expertly-handled moments of heightened tension - and Doret's spirited, forceful debut  obviate any need for additional 3D.    \u000a 
p2397
aVClint Eastwood and the western waited years for Oscar recognition, but this grave movie did the trick - possibly because it is so determinedly serious as well as being wonderfully well-made.
p2398
aVFrom its comic presentation of an aging gunfighter turned farmer trying to swill pigs, we are presented with a nuanced characterisation that is the heart of the film.
p2399
aVFailing to find peace, but sickened by violence, Bill Munny (Eastwood whose craggy features have also never seemed more suited to a role) is enticed back into the saddle with the enticement of bounty (a cowboy has viciously scarred a prostitute and her fellow workers club together for revenge) and the chance to secure a future for his children.
p2400
aVThe film becomes an odyssey of pain and retribution, but, significantly, within it's sombre narrative it charts the progress of a lost human being heading towards a kind of salvation.
p2401
aVIt's superbly crafted, with taut, muscular direction from Eastwood and intense, disturbing cinematography from Jack Green.
p2402
aVThe performances from the distinguished cast are nothing short of blistering.
p2403
aVPaths Of Glory was the first time Stanley Kubrick got to work with a major star - and in the late 1950s, stars didn't come any more major than Kirk Douglas.
p2404
aVHe championed this 'hard to sell' anti-war film to the Hollywood studios, and bankrolled the 28-year-old tyro director who, with his growing reputation, still had it all to prove in Hollywood.
p2405
aVAnd with his indignant performance Douglas provides an emotional counterbalance to Kubrick's chilly, conceptual style.
p2406
aVAdapted from Humphrey Cobb's based-on-fact novel, the film tells the ignominious, bitterly ironic, even absurd, WWI story of a botched French attack, which is motivated purely by the gains it will bring to high-up officers safely ensconced far from the front.
p2407
aVIn return for a promised promotion, General Mireau (Macready), charges his troops with the impossible task of storming Ant Hill, an impregnable German position.
p2408
aVThe attack is led by Colonel Dax (Douglas), who before the war was "the finest criminal lawyer in France" and who dutifully leads his men into the German guns, knowing that a slaughter is inevitable.
p2409
aVWhen the attack dissolves into chaos and a rout, the furious general first orders his artillery to fire on his own men, and, to pass the blame, chooses three soldiers at random to go before a court martial to explain their cowardice, with Dax acting as defence counsel in the face their inevitable execution.
p2410
aVThis dark, misanthropic subject matter is typical Kubrick, and it drips with a savage, bleak understanding of man's inhumanity to man.
p2411
aVThe officers (Dax excepted) are scheming self-aggrandisers whose interest in strategy relates principally to the progress of their careers.
p2412
aVIn fact, Kubrick has formulated a double-bind as absurd and horrific as that of Catch-22: the French military command is structured so that it's more or less impossible even for conscientious officers to champion the cause of their men, who are basically pure cannon-fodder.
p2413
aVKubrick's telling of this story is highly lucid, even schematic.
p2414
aVThe officers in their chateaux are shot with elegant, fluid dolly shots and deep focus that Kubrick learned from Max Ophuls and Orson Welles, while the men in the trenches are treated with an almost documentary realism that emphasises the hell they are living through.
p2415
aVThe film is memorable for its extended, virtuoso tracking shots through the trenches (they anticipate the crazed Steadicam of The Shining) and for the unprecedented realism of its battle scenes, with Kubrick using 800 German policemen for his troops (the film was shot in southern Germany) and with his art department having to go before the German government to explain why they needed so much explosive.
p2416
aVBut aside from its brilliant battle scenes and unrivalled attention to detail, the film plays out like a game of chess, a cold-hearted working out of a pitiless strategy, where the infantry soldiers really are nothing more than pawns.
p2417
aVDax, condemned by his superiors as an "idealist" when he shows ordinary human consideration for his men, finally turns the machinations of Mireau against him after the terrible injustice of the men's execution.
p2418
aVKubrick's geometrical, symmetrical compositions (he was also camera operator on the movie) are designed to make his characters seem like chessmen on a board - which is an apt visual metaphor for the callous and calculating behaviour of the officers in the story.
p2419
aVNot surprisingly, the film was banned in France for 18 years after its release. 
p2420
aVThe sensation-seeking world of television news makes it an easy target for satire but rarely has it been sent up with such relentless, vicious glee.
p2421
aVAn angry and ironical kick in the eye, Network's grim humour and informed attack are as sharp now as they were in 1976.
p2422
aVHoward Beale (Finch) is the embittered broadcaster whose life and ratings are in freefall.
p2423
aVWhen his contract is terminated he announces he'll kill himself on air two weeks hence.
p2424
aVRatings soar and ruthless exec Diane Christiansen (Dunaway) is keen to exploit Beale's sudden popularity, but not even suicidal news readers can bolster viewing figures for ever.
p2425
aVAll give expert performances and there's a fine array of supporting characters, including Robert Duvall as an executive who canvases opinion on murder.
p2426
aVIt's Finch though who provides the film with its frenzied energy, denouncing TV journalism as cynical, exploitative bullshit and leading studio audiences through a chant of "I'm mad as hell and I'm not going to take it anymore."
p2427
aVIndeed there's so much going on here that director Lumet struggles to contain it all.
p2428
aVBut as an intense, impassioned piece of invective it's compelling stuff and a certain contender for one of the best films about television ever made.
p2429
aVVerdict\u000a																Fearless, funny and frank television satire that doesn't take any prisoners.\u000a
p2430
aV\u000aKingsley Amis thought Cameron's science fiction sequel "a flawless masterpiece" (he and son Martin once fell out over the subject) but that would be going too far.
p2431
aVIt is, however, a slick, satisfying and deeply influential movie which keeps its chase-plot going with furious momentum.
p2432
aVThe action involves Arnie's robotic killing machine from The Terminator returning to the present, but this time as guardian angel protecting little John Connor (Edward Furlong) from the murderous attention of a shape-shifting machine (Robert Patrick, sporting a wonderfully impassive expression throughout) from the future.
p2433
aVArnie's T-101 unit has been reprogrammed by the human resistance - by John himself in fact, who 35 years later is the leader.
p2434
aVThe shape-shifting T-1000, on the other hand, represents the computer enemy; he's out to destroy the boy and change the course of history.
p2435
aVThere are other things to hold the interest: Cameron's suggestion, for instance, that Arnie's leather-clad android would make a suitable father-figure for Furlong and an appropriate partner for his mother (Hamilton, muscular, sweaty, and single-minded).
p2436
aVThat's the chilling idea under the pyrotechnics, incessant machine-gun fire and innovative special effects (the morphing T-1000 was a landmark of digital animation) - if there is a future in which the robots go to war with humanity, it won't really matter much who wins.
p2437
aVIt's ripe stuff for deconstruction and beloved of film studies classes as much as of action movie nerds.\u000a \u000a
p2438
aV\u000aDarth Maul is back, this time waving his wand in 3D.
p2439
aV\u201cStar Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace\u201d was poorly received by critics when it debuted, so does it fare any better with its new up-conversion?
p2440
aVNot really.
p2441
aVThe sci-fi adventure contains so many mistakes in casting, characters and direction, it\u2019s still terribly difficult to like.
p2442
aVThe story is basically sound.
p2443
aVBut, writer-director George Lucas should have delegated the screenplay and piloting to someone more experienced and savvy.
p2444
aVSo many mistakes along the way.
p2445
aVSince this is only a summary, and not an essay or formal review, let me short-list the major disappointments:\u000a1.
p2446
aVDumbing it down for small children.
p2447
aVThat includes the disaster they call Jar Jar Binks.
p2448
aVBut, also the flawed performance of Jake Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker.
p2449
aV2.
p2450
aVActors being allowed to perform badly: Natalie Portman, Keira Knightley, Samuel L. Jackson and Lloyd all needed help from a good director.
p2451
aVThey didn\u2019t get it.
p2452
aV3.
p2453
aVThe writing.
p2454
aVDull, stilted and childish.
p2455
aVOn the positive side:\u000a1.
p2456
aVGood performances from Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor and Ray Park.
p2457
aV2.
p2458
aVDarth Maul was truly something to get excited about.
p2459
aVHe was a product of technology and competent acting skills.
p2460
aV3.
p2461
aVThe fight scenes were well-executed and absorbing.
p2462
aV4.
p2463
aVTech credits are just what you would expect from George Lucas.
p2464
aVSo, how was the 3D?
p2465
aVNo better than any other film up-converted to the format.
p2466
aVYour eyes strain to spot any differences from the original film.
p2467
aVBut, after a while you just sit back and watch it like any other film.
p2468
aVGrade: C\u000a \u000aWatch the trailer!http://www.starwars.com/watch/episode-i-3d.html\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2469
aV"He was some kind of a man... What does it matter what you say about people?"
p2470
aVIt could be Welles' epitaph as much as that of Hank Quinlan, the obese, vile and potentially corrupt US border cop.
p2471
aVIf Welles is to be remembered for something other than Citizen Kane, it would probably be the justly famous opening tracking shot here, the ideal introduction to a perfectly stylized noir.
p2472
aVTouch of Evil had a chequered history.
p2473
aVThe original script by Paul Monash was shelved by B-movie producer Albert Zugsmith.
p2474
aVWelles was employed to act in it, then encouraged to direct too.
p2475
aVHe didn't bother to read the source novel ('Badge Of Evil' by Whit Masterson).
p2476
aVAfter the best part of a decade working in TV or on international features (1955's Mr. Arkadin was a French/Spanish/Swiss production), Welles returned to Hollywood and created another masterpiece.
p2477
aVBut it's amazing the film survived at all - Welles was sacked in post-production and it very nearly never saw the light of day.
p2478
aVInstead, the studio hacked it into a supporting movie, a B-movie.
p2479
aVRestored as per his original notes in the 1990s, Touch Of Evil has emerged near faultless in style and characterisation; a confirmed masterpiece and one of the great American classics.
p2480
aVThe film concerns Mexican narcotics officer Mike Vargas (Heston, in a role that twisted his usual all-American heroic credentials) who is on honeymoon with young American wife Susan (Leigh) in a fictional border town (Los Robles, which was recreated in rundown Venice, California).
p2481
aVVargas gets caught up with political intrigue involving, among others, a sharp-tongued hooker (Dietrich, brilliant) and corrupt local cop Quinlan (Welles, brilliantly vile). 
p2482
aVBased on the 1962 short La Jetée, Terry Gilliam's brilliant dystopian thriller is his finest film yet, with its inevitably stunning visuals, a nail-biting plot, and the casting against type of Bruce Willis and Brad Pitt.
p2483
aVWillis, here remind everybody of his ability to alternate no-brain blocksbusters with smaller, interesting projects, is time-travelling convinct James Cole, who is sent from his futuristic prison back to the 1990s to prevent mankind from being destroyed by a virus which may have something to do with mental patient Jeffrey Goines (Pitt, earning a Golden Globe and an Oscar nomination).
p2484
aVKicking off with a bizarre sci-fi thriller - once sent back, Cole's babblings about the impending human wipeout land him in an institution alongside the clearly barmy Jeffrey - Gilliam goes on to deliver a movie that is not only rich in visual detail but offers an involving, occasionally baffling storyline and builds the tension to positively unbearable levels during the final reel.
p2485
aVWeighing in with a heavyweight work that tops anything he has done since 1992's Unforgiven, Clint Eastwood's boxing saga Million Dollar Baby is a relentlessly unsentimental melodrama that delivers its body-blows when you least expect them.
p2486
aVAfter the somewhat hysterical Mystic River - a flawed work dominated by a powerhouse performance from Sean Penn - this is a far more balanced piece, anchored by three terrific turns and some lean direction from Eastwood.
p2487
aVTo give away the secrets of the plot would be criminal.
p2488
aVSuffice it to say it's a story about redemption that embraces religion, family and social affairs.
p2489
aVEastwood plays grizzled boxing trainer Frankie Dunn, owner of The Hit Pit gym in downtown Los Angeles.
p2490
aVLaced with guilt, when he's not at the gym he's either attending mass (as he has done for 23 years) or writing letters to his estranged daughter, all of which come back marked 'return to sender'.
p2491
aVIf that wasn't enough, he also blames himself for the loss of an eye sustained in the ring by ex-boxer Scrap (Freeman), who Frankie used to train and who now looks after the day-to-day running of the gym.Narrated by Scrap - with Freeman's trademark soothing voice adding resonance to every line - the story sees Frankie reluctant to take his boxers the distance and get them shots at title fights.
p2492
aVWhen his prize asset, Big Willie Little (Colter), dumps him for new management, Frankie is left with little option but to take on a newcomer who has been hanging around the gym.
p2493
aVTrouble is, she's a girl - and he doesn't train girls.
p2494
aVA white trash waitress with a brother in prison, a sister on welfare and a mother who weighs 312lbs, Maggie Fitzgerald (Swank) may have been brought up on the wrong side of the tracks, but slowly she wears Frankie down until he takes her on.
p2495
aVBut, at 32, has she got what it takes to fight professionally?
p2496
aVIf it sounds like a mix of Girlfight and Rocky, nothing could be further from the truth.
p2497
aVEastwood dances around the dreaded clichés of punch-drunk sagas with impressive footwork.
p2498
aVAdapted by Paul Haggis from 'Rope Burns', a collection of short stories by FX Toole, the script has a sardonic wit about it, with Scrap in particular adding some much-needed humour.
p2499
aV"The planet can go back to spinning," he dryly notes, after Frankie, in a rare act of kindness, buys him a cheeseburger.
p2500
aVThere is also a nicely judged sub-plot featuring a weak-kneed wannabe named 'Danger' (Baruchel), desperate to challenge Thomas Hearns for the welterweight title, not knowing he retired years ago.
p2501
aVWith Swank proving that her Oscar for Boys Don't Cry was not a one-off, she is both physically and emotionally credible in her role.
p2502
aVFor once, in the training montage - a boxing movie staple - it actually appears as if her physique is becoming more toned and muscular, proving she really did shed blood, sweat and tears for the part.
p2503
aVAs for Eastwood, here offering his best performance since The Bridges Of Madison County (1995), it's delightful to see that he has once again found it in him to be able to direct himself.
p2504
aVWhile Frankie Dunn is a part less overtly iconic than 'Dirty' Harry Callaghan, Eastwood's turn is finely-judged and completely lacking in vanity - rather like the film itself. 
p2505
aV\u000aTimothy Spall gives an excellent performance as British painter J.M.W.
p2506
aVTurner in Mike Leigh\u2019s \u201cMr.
p2507
aVTurner.\u201d\u000aI\u2019m certainly not an expert on 19th century British painters, but I can imagine that \u201cMr.
p2508
aVTurner\u201d is made with such care that it could be a wonderful introduction to art students studying the life of Joseph Mallord William Turner (1775-1851).
p2509
aVDirector Mike Leigh and actor Timothy Spall have painted their own masterpiece.
p2510
aVTurner\u2019s genius was established early in his career, and Leigh chose to focus on the latter half of the artist\u2019s life when he became even better known and more eccentric.
p2511
aVTurner\u2019s devotion to his ailing father is clear in the film.
p2512
aVAs were the relationships with women that kept him unmarried, by choice, his entire life.
p2513
aVLeigh\u2019s screenplay also captures Turner\u2019s artistic independence, both his stubbornness and epic vision.
p2514
aVGreat accolades can be heaped on Spall\u2019s interpretation of Turner.
p2515
aVDid the artist grunt, groan and speak in spurts?
p2516
aVI don\u2019t know and don\u2019t care.
p2517
aVSpall dives deep and fascinates with his performance.
p2518
aVIt took me several minutes to adjust to his dialect, but I eventually heard every word spoken by this worthy actor.
p2519
aVMost of the ensemble cast checks out as well.
p2520
aVDorothy Atkinson generates sympathy as Hannah Danby, Turner\u2019s devoted housekeeper.
p2521
aVMarion Bailey does an admirable job as Sophia Booth, Turner\u2019s landlady and eventual lover.
p2522
aVShe made Turner\u2019s seaside home a peaceful, desirable retreat.
p2523
aVPaul Jesson excelled as Turner\u2019s father.
p2524
aVHe and Spall played well off each other.
p2525
aVThe mutual love and devotion between these two characters was realized.
p2526
aVThe costumes, the sets, the cinematography transport you magnificently to Turner\u2019s era.
p2527
aVI learned about art history and the human condition.
p2528
aVI\u2019m inspired to know more about the artist and see his works in person, thanks to Mike Leigh, his cast and crew.
p2529
aVThank you.
p2530
aVGrade: A\u000aBritish painter J.M.W.
p2531
aVTurner is both eccentric and fascinating as played by actor Timothy Spall.
p2532
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2533
aV\u000a\u000a\u201cThe sun is God,\u201d were the last words uttered by Joseph Mallord William Turner on Dec. 19, 1851.
p2534
aVNow proclaimed as Britain\u2019s greatest artist, his talent is the soul of Mike Leigh\u2018s new film, Mr. Turner.
p2535
aVComing after his other historical dramas\u2014the effervescent Topsy-Turvy, about Gilbert and Sullivan, and the dreary, bleak Vera Drake, which focuses on an abortionist in the 1950s\u2014this is perhaps his most spare, yet illuminating film to date.
p2536
aVHe\u2019s certainly picked a perfect subject: Turner was a bona fide genius who never stopped experimenting or challenging convention, yet, as Leigh shows, his personal life was a mess, including unhappy illegitimate children and a rather odd housekeeper who provided à la carte services for her boss.
p2537
aVThough Leigh\u2019s film follows a basic chronological approach, starting when the artist is at the height of his fame, it is arranged as a series of vignettes rather than a completely fleshed out, plot-driven movie.
p2538
aVAnd for someone as complex as J.M.W.
p2539
aVTurner, that is perhaps the best way to capture the dichotomy of the man.
p2540
aVCoddled by his father, who runs his household, sells his paintings and even mixes the valuable pigments and colours used to create those spectacular works of art, Turner is a crude, driven man comfortable in his selfishness.
p2541
aVHis world revolves around his ability to translate three-dimensional vistas into two-dimensional paintings.
p2542
aVHe thinks nothing of dropping everything, and everyone, for a painting excursion.
p2543
aVIt\u2019s actor Timothy Spall who brings what could have been a two-dimensional caricature to life.
p2544
aVSpall immersed himself in the Dickensian world of Victorian London, even spending two years learning to paint.
p2545
aVHis every twitch, lumpen step and grunt\u2014dialogue is at an absolute minimum\u2014conveys more than the wordiest of scripts.
p2546
aVAfter winning at Cannes, Spall is all but guaranteed to get an Oscar nomination.
p2547
aVRelated reading: Brian D. Johnson\u2019s best films of 2014\u000aThe other force behind Mr. Turner who should earn an Oscar nod is Dick Pope, the movie\u2019s cinematographer, who turned film into a work that would rival any Turner painting.
p2548
aVFrom the very first scene in the Dutch countryside, to the last of the dying artist, the lush visuals\u2014especially its raw landscapes and delicately gorgeous sunrises and sunsets\u2014celebrate the artist.
p2549
aVTurner lived in a time of deprivation and enormous wealth, an era when constant work and graft was the only way the son of a barber could rise to be one of the art world\u2019s greats.
p2550
aVYet, for all his achievements and financial security, the unpolished, slovenly genius constantly chafed against convention.
p2551
aVThe scenes of Turner sizing up his competition, including John Constable, at the Royal Academy, are deliciously subversive.
p2552
aVIronically, as his works become less recognizable and more and more evocative\u2014Rain, Steam and Speed: The Great Western Railway breathes the disruptive fury and power of the new-fangled trains\u2014his personal life became more pedestrian, even happy.
p2553
aVHe settled down with a widow, Sophia Booth, who fussed over Turner with the same un-awed affection of his father.
p2554
aVEven after his death, Turner was anything but normal: He gave most of his fortune away, and donated his collection of his own, best works to the nation.
p2555
aVEven today, his namesakes\u2014the Turner Prize, for example\u2014conjures up images of innovation and experimentation.
p2556
aVAs the Guardian stated, \u201cIf the sun is God, as Turner is supposed to have said, this incandescent painter was the sun\u2019s high priest and art is indebted to him.\u201d\u000a\u000a\u000a10 shares\u000a\u000a\u000a                Twitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse filmJ.M.W.
p2557
aVTurnerJMW TurnerMr.
p2558
aVTurnerReviewTimothy Spall \u000a\u000a\u000a
p2559
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aWith acting that goes from passable to laughable, dialogue cheesier than feta fondue, and a story that\u2019s as silly as ever, this fifth Step Up isn\u2019t going to win over naysayers.
p2560
aVTo the plot\u2019s credit, it does twist the typical \u2018dance tournament\u2019 storyline slightly but it\u2019s not going to cause epiphanies, and neither will the tacky romance between Miami Heat\u2019s Sean and The Street\u2019s Andie.
p2561
aVIronically, the brief love plot between the Robot Guy and Robot Girl has more heart.
p2562
aVHowever, as with martial arts films, dance flicks are ultimately valued for their choreography and complementary camera work.
p2563
aVWhile Miami Heat went bonkers with its set pieces, it didn\u2019t present them as effectively as Step Up 3D.
p2564
aVThankfully, All In reverts back to the latter with its sparsely-edited, smoothly-shot sequences that clearly show the dancers at the top of their game (including Kiwi girl Parris Goebel).
p2565
aVIt\u2019s also some of the best live-action 3D you\u2019ll see in a cinema.
p2566
aVThe three acts each have their one big dance battle that continually ups the ante, from an awesomely implausible \u2018impromptu\u2019 showdown in a bar to a more traditional \u2013 but even more impressive \u2013 mid-movie dance battle set in a boxing ring.
p2567
aVWhen the climax hits, All In lives up to its title, piling up characters from the Step Up universe for a mountainous finale.
p2568
aVStep Up isn\u2019t high art, but it is the Fast & Furious of dance flicks, and All In makes breakdancing as entertaining to watch as any highway car chase.
p2569
aV\u2018Step Up 5: All In\u2019 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p2570
aVTruman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is a happily married insurance salesman living a normal life in a small American town so perfect that he has never felt the need or desire to leave it.
p2571
aVHe has a loving wife (Laura Linney), and a loyal best buddy (the excellent Noah Emmerich).
p2572
aVLife is good until one morning a stage light drops from the skies and shatters on the ground perilously close to him.
p2573
aVIt is the trigger that sets him questioning everything around him.
p2574
aVWhat is behind the facades of the buildings he has never entered?
p2575
aVWhy do people seem to be travelling around him in a perfectly synchronized loop?
p2576
aVWhat is going on outside his home-town?
p2577
aVTruman is, it turns out, the unwitting star of a top-rated 24-hour-a-day TV docu-soap.
p2578
aVUnder the careful critical scrutiny to which it has been subjected, the plot turns out not to be watertight.
p2579
aVThis is to miss the point of what is a hilarious and breathtakingly conceived satire which also allows Carrey to edge away from broad comedy.
p2580
aVThe Truman Show is also oddly moving and has, as you would expect from a Weir film, a pronounced metaphysical slant with Ed Harris playing the show's archly named producer/creator Christof.
p2581
aVThe first and best of Stone's Vietnam trilogy, it's also one of his finest pieces of work.
p2582
aVHe avoids his trademark conspiracy theories, the editing and fancy camerawork are virtually mainstream and, instead of concentrating on a showy script, he builds an increasingly intense story of a young volunteer being broken down and remade in the dehumanizing conditions of war.
p2583
aVSheen is the college drop-out volunteer whose first experience of Vietnam is a fierce battle, the cursory concern of one sergeant, Elias (Dafoe), and the disdain of another, Barnes (Berenger).
p2584
aVThe film uses Sheen as the central observer of the increasing antagonism between the sergeants as more and more recruits are killed and Barnes (Berenger) is involved in a massacre.\u000a																
p2585
aV\u000a\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aHow far would you go to get your child back?
p2586
aVThe question, as answered in \u201cPrisoners,\u201d is pretty far.
p2587
aVHugh Jackman stars as Keller Dover, a man who never doubts the end justifies the means.
p2588
aVWhen his six year old daughter is abducted along with another girl, he kidnaps a mentally challenged man whose van was seen in his neighborhood at the time of the abduction.
p2589
aVAlex Jones (Paul Dano) clearly knows something, but is he really responsible for the crime?
p2590
aVKeller takes Jones to an abandoned rental property and proceeds to torture him until he gets some answers.
p2591
aVIt\u2019s clear that Jones may not be able to give Keller what he needs to know, even if he so desired.
p2592
aVMeantime, a police detective (Jake Gyllenhaal) is pouring his heart into the investigation with only limited success.
p2593
aVThe investigator and Dover battle over how involved Dover should be in the hunt for his missing daughter.
p2594
aV\u201cPrisoners\u201d is a complex story well told.
p2595
aVIt\u2019s gritty, violent and even nauseating at times.
p2596
aVIt asks the tough questions and the answers don\u2019t necessarily add up to happily ever after.
p2597
aVThe torture scenes are difficult to watch.
p2598
aVThe performances are strong.
p2599
aVAnd, the ending is as intense as it obscure.
p2600
aV\u201cPrisoners\u201d was originally rated \u201cNC-17\u2033 by the MPAA.
p2601
aVIt was trimmed to an \u201cR\u201d rating, but let\u2019s say it\u2019s still a \u201chard\u201d \u201cR.\u201d  Plenty of seat squirming ahead.
p2602
aVThe Blu-ray combo pack contains a couple of featurettes, but not much else.
p2603
aVI would have included the original cut of the film.
p2604
aVWould have been interesting to compare the two.
p2605
aVBottom line:  Intense drama that wrestles with moral issues.
p2606
aVNicely written and acted.
p2607
aVGenuine suspense.
p2608
aVGrade: B+\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: December 17, 2013\u000aFormats: Blu-ray/DVD combo pack and DVD Widescreen.
p2609
aVRuntime: 153 minutes\u000aRated: \u201cR\u201d for disturbing violent content including torture and language throughout.
p2610
aVReleased by Warner Brothers Home Entertainment\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2611
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aPrisoners is a pulpy crime thriller elevated to event film status by top-notch filmmakers.
p2612
aVIt outstays its welcome by a good half hour but still proves compelling, thanks in part to subject matter that practically demands emotional investment from an audience: children in peril.
p2613
aVA lot of attention will go to Jackman\u2019s turn as a survivalist dad driven to extremes to find his abducted daughter, and to his credit he gives it his all.
p2614
aVBut it\u2019s Gyllenhaal\u2019s performance as Detective Loki that feels the most lived in (although he does overdo it with a certain nervous twitch), and it\u2019s with him that our sympathies ultimately lie.
p2615
aVThe central mystery that drives the movie ends up being a bit silly, stitched together from similar films that suggest every small American town houses at least one raving loony.
p2616
aVA few of the more left-field plot turns remain puzzling once all has been revealed.
p2617
aVBut director Denis Villeneuve keeps the focus on the aftermath of the abductions, wallowing in the panic and grief and giving Jackman a chance to flex his acting muscles.
p2618
aVWith subject matter this dreary, Prisoners can be a bit of a slog at times.
p2619
aVVilleneuve has a point to make about people being capable of terrible things when pushed to extremes, and he makes it very bluntly, only to drop this line of thought once it\u2019s time for the big finale.
p2620
aVPrisoners can\u2019t seem to decide what sort of film it wants to be, and so it ends up slightly muddled, engrossing enough in the moment but frustratingly insubstantial on reflection.
p2621
aV\u2018Prisoners\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p2622
aV\u000aIt's no surprise that Aaron Guzikowski's original screenplay for Prisoners languished on The Black List, a register of inexplicably unfilmed scripts, for some time.
p2623
aVIt features elements seldom found in formulaic Hollywood studio projects: complicated characters, ambiguous motives and serious moral dilemmas.
p2624
aVIt's less of a surprise that French-Canadian film-maker Denis Villeneuve, whose award-winning 2010 film Incendies possessed all these qualities in spades, chose this script for his first English-language feature.
p2625
aVOr that having done so, he was able to attract a heavyweight cast of actors - Hugh Jackman.
p2626
aVJake Gyllenhaal, Maria Bello, Terrence Howard, Viola Davis, Paul Dano, Melissa Leo - to play both the leading parts and the more modest supporting roles.
p2627
aVPrior to the disappearance of his six-year-old daughter and her seven-year-old friend, Keller Dover (Jackman) was a hard-working blue collar guy who prayed for the best but prepared for the worst.
p2628
aVA survivalist whose basement was stuffed with tinned food and emergency equipment, Dover lived by his father's maxim: be ready.
p2629
aVBut nothing had prepared him for a parent's worst nightmare.
p2630
aVHis wife Grace (Bello), numbed by grief and anti-depressants, berates him for not protecting his family.
p2631
aVBut Detective Loki (Gyllenhaal) is forced to release the chief suspect (Dano), a man in his twenties with the mind of a child, after only forty-eight hours.
p2632
aVKnowing that his daughter's chances of survival are reducing with every passing hour, Dover abducts and tortures Alex, with the reluctant help of the other girl's father (Howard) and his passively complicit wife (Davis).
p2633
aVEncouraging the audience to identify with the father's dilemma, Villeneuve's film poses the ethical question, How far would you go, and what might you be capable of?
p2634
aVPersistent rain and Roger Deakins' extraordinary, near-monochromatic cinematography establish a murky atmosphere, creating a sense of characters enveloped by a miasma of impotent rage, primal fear and nagging doubt.
p2635
aVVilleneuve's emotionally charged direction draws the best from the actors, including the ever credible Melissa Leo as the suspect's over-protective aunt \u2013 a woman scarred by the disappearance of her husband and the earlier loss of her own son to cancer.
p2636
aVEven so, Jackman overplays his portrayal of the ruthlessly pragmatic Dover; this contrasts starkly with Gyllenhaal's laser-focused portrayal of the meticulous Detective Loki, which reveals layer upon layer of subtle complexity.
p2637
aVSadly, there are echoes here of Clint Eastwood's Mystic River, whose dense plotting and thought-provoking seriousness were ultimately undermined by a reliance on residual generic trappings and audience gullibility \u2013 as exemplified here by a transparently ludicrous red herring and a credibility-stretching plot twist.\u000a
p2638
aVWith the dialogue-free first act of WALL-E, Pixar challenged the assumptions underlying family animated movies.
p2639
aVThe little robot's courtship of EVE had the physical aplomb of a silent movie, each character constructed out of the minimum of elements required to make us love them.
p2640
aVThe achievement was recognised with an Oscar for Best Animation.
p2641
aVWith Up, Pixar and Disney continue their adventure in pared-back storytelling, repudiating the pernicious received wisdom that what children require from a film is the discharge from a blunderbuss of pop culture gags, demographically-engineered characters, infantile wisecracks and celebrity voices.
p2642
aVExcess is a sign of anxiety, of uncertainty about what works.
p2643
aVThe mission to strip out superfluity begins with the opening short film, Partly Cloudy.
p2644
aVWhere do babies come from?
p2645
aVA stork delivers them in a bundle.
p2646
aVEvery child knows that.
p2647
aVWalt Disney used this parental euphemism for the opening of Dumbo.
p2648
aVHere the Pixar-Disney team build around the premise, with clouds creating life and then handing it over to the weary storks to deliver.
p2649
aVNot a word is spoken.
p2650
aVThese shorts are proving grounds for the studio's upcoming talent: the remit is to return feature film animation to its roots, as a universal form of storytelling, reclaiming it from the sassy motormouth of the Shrek era.
p2651
aVUp begins with a downer.
p2652
aVA quiet boy called Carl is befriended by tomboy Ellie.
p2653
aV"You don't say much," she notices, tellingly.
p2654
aVCarl and Ellie are in thrall to the daring explorer Charles Muntz, whose adventures in the lost isle of Paradise Falls are captured in black-and-white Movietone reels.
p2655
aVCarl and Ellie pledge to go on adventures of their own.
p2656
aVBut love gets in the way.
p2657
aVThey get married.
p2658
aVThey do up their house and decorate the nursery.
p2659
aVThen in one heartbreaking moment, we realise they can't have children.
p2660
aVThe film is presented in 3-D, which requires the audience to wear special glasses.
p2661
aVThey don't work very well when your eyes are full of tears.
p2662
aVCarl and Ellie grow old together, and then she dies.
p2663
aVCarl is left alone in their house, surrounded by a building site.
p2664
aVA developer wants him to move.
p2665
aVHe refuses but then his anger gets the better of him.
p2666
aVOn the day they show up to take Carl away, he unfurls thousands of balloons, and he and his house float up, up and away.
p2667
aVBut he has a stowaway.
p2668
aVA tubby boy scout called Russell.
p2669
aVThe adventure of this odd couple begins.
p2670
aVChildlessness, the death of grandparents, and the crankiness of adults - all part of children's everyday lives.
p2671
aVCarl is a bold choice for the hero of a kid's film, but children are fascinated by what it might be like to grow old.
p2672
aVHayao Miyazaki explored this fascination in Howl's Moving Castle, in which the young heroine is transformed into an old woman and has to come to terms with aches and pains.
p2673
aVRoald Dahl knew a lot about the appeal of a quirky Grandpa Joe.
p2674
aVWhen they land in the wilderness, Carl and Russell have to drag the floating house behind them.
p2675
aVA house is the repository of our dreams.
p2676
aVThat is why we are so susceptible to property booms, to the fantasy of the house carrying us to paradise.
p2677
aVTethered to floating house he can no longer enter, Carl is bound to his unrealised dream, a negative equity of the soul.
p2678
aVAt Paradise Falls, they encounter the ageing explorer Charles Muntz who is pursuing his own Moby Dick, a rare and splendid bird that Russell has befriended and christened Kevin.
p2679
aVWhile the adults blindly chase after what is always out of reach, it is up to Russell and a faithful talking dog to provide necessary moral direction.
p2680
aVDug the talking dog demonstrates the Pixar-Disney style under the oversight of John Lasseter and Andrew Stanton.
p2681
aVOne of the highpoints of Disney's Bolt - executive produced by Lasseter - was the talking pigeons.
p2682
aVThe humour came from the animators giving voice to the birds' avian twitches and movements.
p2683
aVDug's dialogue is plausibly canine, and all the funnier for it.
p2684
aVPixar came back to Disney after the House of Mouse's farrago with Chicken Little, where they came unstuck pouring the brattish complexities of contemporary American youth into oversized chicken heads.
p2685
aVChicken Little stands as the nadir of confused groupthink filmmaking, and a low-point in anthropomorphism.
p2686
aVThe creative leadership of the Pixar team restores clarity, simplicity, and courage to storytelling, establishing a daunting gold standard for family films.
p2687
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aDreamWorks\u2019 surprisingly awesome How to Train Your Dragon wrangled together colourful and imaginative creature designs, resonating themes surrounding parent-child angst and ignorance through fear, and top-class animation that made flying look so damn cool.
p2688
aVThe sequel doesn\u2019t attempt to take things in a completely new direction, choosing instead to expand its world and characters with great success.
p2689
aVOh, and the flying sequences still look so damn cool.
p2690
aV(I got goosebumps at one point.)
p2691
aVHiccup is now 20 years old, wiser and more confident while maintaining his affectionate bond with both Toothless and Astrid \u2013 playfully demonstrated early on in one of the film\u2019s most subtle and memorable scenes.
p2692
aVHe\u2019s created new gadgets, new modes of flying and charted more territory, but still hasn\u2019t discovered a sense of who he is.
p2693
aVThat all changes when he happens upon his estranged mother, whose long absence from society has turned her into a sort-of cool crazy cat lady \u2013 but with dragons.
p2694
aVThe pair\u2019s rocky relationship feels light in comparison to the original\u2019s father-son conflict, but she\u2019s an extremely well-realised character nonetheless.
p2695
aVA new threat comes in the form of Drago, a chest-thumping man mountain who looks to dominate everything by making a dragon army and shouting an awful lot.
p2696
aVHe\u2019s a fairly one-note villain \u2013 conquering his fears by being fearsome is all there is to him \u2013 but it\u2019s in service of teaching its young male audience an important lesson in masculinity: trust is more powerful than control.
p2697
aV\u2018How to Train Your Dragon 2\u2032 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p2698
aV\u000aIn the five years since the events of How To Train Your Dragon  (2010), the island village of Berk has become a peaceful haven where  Vikings and dragons live in harmony, bothering nobody but the sheep that  they use as balls in Quidditch-like competitions.
p2699
aVYoung Hiccup (voiced again by Jay Baruchel) has won over the whole  community to his once rebellious dragon-loving ways, but remains  reluctant to replace his very different father Stoick (Gerard Butler) as  village chief, preferring to quest ever further afield in search of  more dragons - and the origins of his own nature.
p2700
aVThese he finds  simultaneously on a secret island whose sole human inhabitant is the  mysterious dragon-rider Valka (Cate Blanchett) - but Hiccup's travels  will also lead him to Drago Bludvist (Djimon Hounsou), a would-be tyrant  over dragons and humans alike.
p2701
aVWhile this sequel, again adapted loosely from the books of Cressida  Cowell, is still full of laughs, Hiccup himself is now an earnest emo  unsure of his own identity,   leaving most of the comic business to his  menagerie of friends and fellow villagers.
p2702
aVThis is a far more serious  film than its predecessor, even if writer/director Dean DeBlois  judiciously cuts away from some of the more adult moments in the film's  second half.
p2703
aVThe key theme here, at work in both human and dragon worlds, is the  complex (and gratifyingly unresolved) interplay between nature and  nurture, between genetic legacy and free will, between instinct and  choice.
p2704
aVSome - but certainly not all - characters exhibit a capacity for  profound change, while nobody, but nobody, questions the 'other reason'  that Gobber (Craig Ferguson) has never married.
p2705
aVTolerance,  mutual understanding and respect are the ideals that this film  champions, emblematised in the relationship between Hiccup and his  dragon Toothless - but How To Train Your Dragon 2 also demonstrates how  easily despots can manipulate and crush such values, bringing Hiccup's  brand of liberal-minded reasoning into violent collision with its own  limits.
p2706
aVThese are big issues indeed, as fitting for the post-millennial  as the Viking age - but for those uninterested in such matters, there  are also spit jokes and flights of fancy aplenty...\u000a\u000a
p2707
aVDenis Villeneuve's film opens with a striking prologue: a vision of a rich yet dry, mountainous landscape, which recedes to reveal a contrastingly bleak, though no less absorbing, tableau, of a spartan, stone-walled shell of a building overlooking the idyllic countryside.
p2708
aVInside it, a group of young boys, simply dressed, are having their heads shaved in what appears to be an initiatory rite.
p2709
aVThe camera finally alights on one innocent-looking child with a particularly intense gaze, then homes in on the three seemingly innocuous dots he has tattooed on his heel (which will later take on vital significance to the film's plot).
p2710
aVBreathtakingly photographed by Andre Turpin, its slow-mo, dreamlike quality is enhanced by the distant strains of Radiohead's 'You And Whose Army?'
p2711
aVwhich provides the soundtrack, and it's one of the most arresting opening sequences of a film I can remember seeing in years.
p2712
aVIt sets the bar improbably high for the rest of the film, a weighty, intricate inter-generational saga which unsurpirisingly struggles to extend the impressionistic power (though not the intensity) of its opening across its two hour-plus running time.
p2713
aVSet in an anonymous Middle Eastern country which resembles Lebanon in all but name, Canadian director Villeneuve's impressive drama, adapted from a play by Lebanese writer Wajdi Mouawad, strives to make emotional sense of decades of civil war through the prism of one family's complex emotional (and literal) DNA.
p2714
aVWhen Nawal (Lubna Azabal), an expatriate living in Canada and mother to adult twins Jeanne and Simon, dies suddenly, she leaves the pair two sealed envelopes and an instruction that they be delivered to their father (who they had previously been led to believe was dead) and an older brother who they never knew existed.
p2715
aVThis quest takes Jeanne and Simon far from their drizzly Quebec neighbourhood to their mother's childhood home in the Middle East, where Nawal's painful personal narrative and professional recruitment by the Muslim paramilitary is sketched by lengthy flashback sequences, as well as the twins' own detective work.
p2716
aVThrough Nawal's experiences, the film paints a compelling portrait of incitement to political radicalism, as well as the scorching scars of civil war, as suggested by the title; and it's refreshing to see a film that approaches Lebanon's complex political past not through straight military or historical drama, but by using family as allegory, and focussing primarily on its impact on mother and daughter.
p2717
aVIf that sounds abstract or academic, Incendies certainly feels it at times, and finally it only works if viewed as such - not least because the eleventh hour revelation on which the film hinges (a twist tragic enough to make Oedipus count his lucky stars) would be pretty hard to swallow otherwise.
p2718
aVHailed as the original screwball comedy and winner of a then unprecedented five Oscars, It Happened One Night nearly didn't happen at one point due to little interest in the script and even less from any actors (Myrna Loy and Robert Montgomery turned the film down).
p2719
aVUnable to rely on star power and with a restricted budget Frank Capra and screenwriter Robert Riskin cooked up a strong story with witty dialogue to carry the film, and when an 'expensive' Clark Gable and 'difficult' Claudette Colbert got involved expectation - including, reportedly Gable's - was defied.
p2720
aVColbert's spoilt and rebellious heiress Ellie Andrews is intent on escaping her father's clutches and dives off his yacht in a desperate bid for freedom.
p2721
aVEvading him once again by catching a bus (she's too posh for this normally), she falls in with jobless newspaperman Peter Warne (Gable) who, knowing her true identity and having read the headlines, is intent on exploiting the situation in order to rejuvenate his career.
p2722
aVIt's not detrimental to the plot to say the couple eventually fall in love, since there's nothing here that would constitute a plot twist for modern viewers.
p2723
aVThe joy of the film is watching the couple's time-honoured screwball manoeuvres - instantly disliking each other and constantly bickering and bantering during their forced proximity.
p2724
aVThe humour is less laugh-out-loud than pleasantly amusing - the couple find themselves in increasingly ironic situations as they reluctantly, and finally forcibly, break the conventions of their time.
p2725
aVThe film is pure Depression-era escapism, showing audiences that couples can fall for each other over dunking donuts and that love will always win out over class difference and financial inequality. \u000a																
p2726
aVSpike Lee is in typically provocative style as he serves up one of the great heatwave films - a setting he would return to in Summer Of Sam.
p2727
aVThe action, captured with sometimes stylised, mobile camera-work and accompanied by a pumping soundtrack, takes place over one very hot day in one corner of Brooklyn.
p2728
aVPetty racial tensions among the locals simmer - and then boil over into an orgy of empty, destructive violence.
p2729
aVLee himself plays Mookie, a young black man who lives with his irritable Hispanic girlfriend (Perez) and works in a pizza parlour run by a proud Italian (Danny) and his two sons, the ever-excellent John Turturro, a Lee regular, and sweet-natured Edson.
p2730
aVAs the temperature rises (and you really feel the heat), the peacemakers vie with the agitators - but some kind of conflagration seems inevitable.
p2731
aVLee has the guts - he has never lacked nerve - to let the story unravel in its messy, complex, human and ambiguous fashion.
p2732
aVThis is an intelligent work, entertaining and complex, filled with fine performances.
p2733
aVHe hasn't matched it since for maturity or deftness of touch.
p2734
aVA never-better Paul Newman is the non-conformist, anti-hero loner of the title.
p2735
aVArrested for vandalizing parking meters, he ends up on a chain gang in a Southern prison.
p2736
aVPigheadedly resisting authority, he gains the respect of his fellow prisoners, and becomes a hero to them, more so after hearing of his mother's death, when he makes persistent attempts to escape.
p2737
aVThe Luke-as-Christ religious allegory has come in for some critical stick, but it's still cracking entertainment.
p2738
aVThere are unforgettable scenes (you'll never look at hard-boiled eggs the same way again) and superb acting.
p2739
aVNewman is irresistible, Donn Pearce's adaptation of his novel is quite brilliant and Conrad L Hall's cinematography is stunning.
p2740
aVTwelve nameless men retire to the jury room after hearing the case of a young Spanish-American man accused of murdering his father.
p2741
aVMost believe he is guilty, but one juror has doubts.
p2742
aVEach man is confronted with his own prejudices and preconceptions.
p2743
aVThe assured direction belies the fact that this was Lumet's big-screen debut.
p2744
aVFew films use a one-room setting as effectively as 12 Angry Men.
p2745
aVThe tense, stagy atmosphere is absolutely right for the wordy battles of the protagonists, who drip with sweat in the claustrophobic heat.
p2746
aVAs these men slowly reveal more than they may wish to strangers, their anger is directed at society, each other or inwardly towards themselves.
p2747
aVIn an excellent cast Fonda is effective and understated as the good guy who forces the others to face the reality of their task, and Cobb is particularly memorable.
p2748
aVRent movies from great directors on Film4oD
p2749
aVWith Nicolas Winding Refn's apocalypticepic Valhalla Rising (2009) out in cinemas at the end of April, and the altogether more family-friendly How To Train Your Dragon coming right at us in full 3D a month earlier, 2010 is shaping up to be the year of the Viking - although Dean DeBlois and Chris Sanders' film probably has more in common with Avatar (2009) than with anything in Refn's bleak odyssey.
p2750
aVOnce again we have a male protagonist caught between his allegiance to his fellow humans and his growing affection for a perceived enemy - and an initiation that involves the union between man and flying, phallic beast.
p2751
aVUnlike Cameron's film, however, How To Train Your Dragon is a joyously absurd adventure that wears its themes lightly.
p2752
aVScrawny accident-prone adolescent Hiccup (voiced by Jay Baruchel) is desperate to impress his gruff alpha-male father Stoick (Gerard Butler), hulking chieftain of the island village of Berk.
p2753
aVDuring a night raid by marauding dragons, Hiccup manages to bring down an elusive, all-black Night Fury - but when Hiccup discovers the beast still alive but helpless, instead of killing it he offers it friendship and a new tail, and is soon learning that everything that generations of Berk villagers have believed about dragons is wrong.
p2754
aVThis newfound knowledge may be turning him from zero to hero in his dragon-training class, and even attracting the eye of his hyper-competitive fellow student Astrid (America Ferrera) - but the day is approaching when he will have to prove himself a man by killing a dragon, which is now the last thing he wants to do.The opening scenes of How To Train Your Dragon shows most of Hiccup's village being burnt to the ground in an aerial assault from dragons.
p2755
aVIt really ought to be terrifying, but Hiccup instead chooses this sequence to introduce (in wry voice-over) the ordinary community life, 'pests' and all, from which he, as a teen, feels so alienated.
p2756
aVThat he and his classmates are voiced by graduates of the Apatow school of slacker comedy (including Jonah Hill, Christopher Mintz-Plasse and Kristen Wiig) only adds to the nervy hilarity of it all, as though living with constant danger from above were no different from trying to be superbad in senior high or coping with getting a girlfriend knocked up.
p2757
aVHere dragons form part of the everyday fabric of Viking life - although they are not quite as integrated as they were in Cressida Cowell's rather different 2003 novel of the same name - and they furnish a perfect background for Hiccup's acts of teen rebellion and rites of passage.
p2758
aVIf Hiccup's dragon bears more than a passing resemblance to the mischievous alien from Lilo & Stitch (2002), that is only because both films were written by the same writer-director team.
p2759
aVIf the Scots accents of the adult Vikings (although curiously not of the younger ones) recall Shrek (2001), that is because this too comes from Dreamworks Animation.
p2760
aVThe messages, too, about both being true to yourself and embracing the other, are familiar from any number of other children's film titles - as is the focus on the father-son relationship.
p2761
aVEven the Tru 3D is, if we are honest, hardly a necessary addition to the film's imagery.
p2762
aVStill, it a fast-paced, funny adventure, offsetting its more grounded scenes with some breathtaking flights of fancy - and, rather cleverly for a free adaptation in an age when fundamentalism and secularism are constantly at war, it teaches children never simply to believe what they read.
p2763
aVMel Gibson chews the scenery as Tom Mullen an impetuous self-made New York millionaire who embarks on a reckless plan to rescue his son when it becomes clear that the FBI have failed him.
p2764
aVRon Howard's remake of an obscure 1950s Glenn Ford vehicle (Ransom!)
p2765
aVjettisons genre conventions to offer a surprisingly dark psychological thriller in which Gibson's strategy is presented as the desperate act of a bruised macho ego that the kidnappers are able to manipulate.
p2766
aVNot only does our hero risk his son's life, but he also runs his marriage (to wife Russo) on to the rocks in the process.
p2767
aVConsidering Howard made his directorial name with such light-weight, sentimental fare as Splash and Cacoon, this is a remarkably mature film.\u000a																 
p2768
aV"You see someone else, and what the other person is going through helps you see your own life."
p2769
aVBuenos Aires, the mid 1970s.
p2770
aVBenjamin Esposito (Ricardo Darin), a deputy clerk at a criminal court, may be investigating the rape and murder of a beautiful young schoolteacher, but he has come to see in the intense love and loss of the victim's husband Ricardo Morales (Pablo Rago) a reflection of his own impossible longings for his new boss Irene Menendez Hastings (Soledad Villemil), whose high social status, not to mention her engagement to another man, puts her out of the civil servant's league.
p2771
aVAided by his dipsomaniac assistant Pablo Sandoval (Guillemo Francella), Esposito relentlessly pursues his chief suspect Isidoro Gomez (Javier Godino), but the injustices of Argentina's political history will help Gomez evade his life sentence.
p2772
aV25 years later, a recently retired Esposito finds himself unable to forget, and so commences writing a novel-cum-memoir about the unresolved case.
p2773
aVTurning for help to Irene (now a DA, married with children), and armed with a faulty old typewriter, he sets about finding the right beginning and ending to the "life full of nothing" that he, Morales and Gomez have all, in their different ways, shared ever since.
p2774
aVAt the 2010 Academy Awards, Juan Jose Campanella's The Secret In Their Eyes was the surprise winner of the Oscar for the year's Best Foreign Language Film over such big hitters as Michael Haneke's The White Ribbon and Jacques Audiard's A Prophet, at a time when few people had even heard of the Argentinian film, let alone seen it.
p2775
aVIn fact Campanella's film has something in common with Haneke's, in that both feature an older man looking back upon unresolved crimes in his past and their relationship to the broader history of his nation - but here Haneke's sterile chill is replaced with a rich warmth and humour that are altogether more appealing.The Secret In Their Eyes boasts a breathtaking central scene in which the camera swirls over, around, and through a football stadium as Esposito and Sandoval pursue their quarry amidst the crowds - all apparently shot in a single unbroken take.
p2776
aV"There's too many people, this is impossible!"
p2777
aVexclaims Esposito, and viewers can only agree, wondering how on earth this bravura sequence could ever have been orchestrated and carried out with such gripping fluidity.
p2778
aVIn fact fluidity of a more general kind characterises Campanella's deft handling of different timelines and multiple flashbacks, simultaneously driving both backwards and forwards to an ending that is as satisfying as it is unpredictable.
p2779
aVCampanella uses the twin genres of the thriller and the romance, as well as twin narratives of punishment eluded and love unfulfilled, to give vividly palatable form to his themes of memory, justice and loss.
p2780
aVDespite the challenge of playing their characters over two different generations, the lead actors show incredible range, complementing their subtle dialogue with looks and gestures that are no less nuanced - in a film where what is unsaid or unseen is of crucial importance.
p2781
aVHere Esposito's Olivetti, with its broken 'a' key, comes to encapsulate a story full of gaps, ellipses and missing parts, just waiting to be supplemented by the viewer's own fears and loves.
p2782
aVThe Secret In Their Eyes will at the very least engross you with its excellent performances, intricate plotting, consummate filmmaking craft, and its narrative that dramatises the time frozen and justice suspended by Argentina's last military junta.
p2783
aVYet even as the film harks back to a traumatic past, it also looks forward to a better future, in a perfect merging of the personal and the political.
p2784
aVFor the real secret of this character-based mystery drama is that it is also a national epic.
p2785
aV\u000aWith the TV programme no longer required viewing, some pondered the wisdom of a Simpsons feature film.
p2786
aVBut just as the show still occasionally counters its critics, so Matt Groening managed to pull yet another rabbit out of the hat.
p2787
aVOkay, it has a so-so plot and few major surprises, but then you can say the same thing about many of the best episodes.
p2788
aVAnd The Simpsons Movie is right up there with classics such as 'Radio Bart', 'Homer Badman' and 'Flaming Moe's'.
p2789
aVIt's a largely environmental tale, with Springfield's eco-vandalism in general and Homer's new pig in particular causing so much damage that President Arnold Schwarzenegger (who looks a helluva lot like Austrian muscleman-turned-movie star Rainier Wolfcastle from the TV series) decides to imprison the town under a massive glass dome.
p2790
aVThere then follows some stuff about Alaska, an encounter with a large-breasted Eskimo and a fantasy sequence along the lines of the one in 'El Viaje Misterioso De Nuestro Homer'.
p2791
aVOh yes, and Lisa has a new admirer, a nice Irish boy called Colin.
p2792
aVAs you can see, the plot isn't particularly clever, but then that's because it isn't terribly important.
p2793
aVNo, what counts here are the gags, and there are some absolute crackers, many involving Homer's new porcine pal Spider-Pig (or Harry Plopper, as he's later rechristened).
p2794
aVThis being The Simpsons, there are also a smattering of star cameos, including Tom Hanks giving his best performance in years and Green Day transforming from new punks to a string trio when their floating stage starts to sink, Titanic-style.
p2795
aVThe Simpsons also make the transition to the big screen successfully.
p2796
aVWith the new medium offering the animators all manner of fresh opportunities, the feature film is right up there with Pixar's best work.
p2797
aVElements that particularly benefit from the change in scope include the 'Itchy And Scratchy' short, which sees the put-upon cat and malevolent mouse take nuclear war to its natural, slapstick conclusion.
p2798
aVAs for how The Simpsons plays at 80-plus minutes, there is a stage around the halfway mark where gag-fatigue sets in.
p2799
aVWhich isn't to say the film isn't funny, rather the jokes come so thick and fast, you almost need an interval to recover from them.
p2800
aVIn a nutshell: Rumours of The Simpsons' demise have been greatly exaggerated.
p2801
aVHysterically funny, genuinely cinematic - and you get to see Bart's  doodle, too.
p2802
aVBy Richard Luck\u000a
p2803
aVPaul Schrader was in a pretty bad way when he wrote the screenplay for Taxi Driver.
p2804
aVReduced to living out of his car, the once hot scribe's poor financial situation was matched by a level of mental decay that reduced him to sucking on a loaded revolver in order to get to sleep.
p2805
aVIn the midst of this depression, Schrader pumped out the Taxi Driver script, a piece of writing peppered with references to his passion for firearms and his unhealthy interest in pornography.
p2806
aVWith the screenplay done, Schrader left LA for his family home in Michigan in the hope of gaining both perspective and peace of mind.
p2807
aVWhile no one would wish misfortune such as Schrader suffered upon anyone, these dire straits are at least partially responsible for the Taxi Driver script remaining unmatched in either the writer's cannon or in the sub-genre of the vigilante movie.
p2808
aVOver the years, there have been so many pictures made about edgy outsiders that God's lonely men don't seem so lonely anymore.
p2809
aVAdd the grit of Schrader's bitter experience to the burgeoning talent of Martin Scorsese and the amazing power and otherness of Robert De Niro and you're some way towards understanding why, 35 years on from its original release, critics and audiences continue to hail Taxi Driver.
p2810
aVNew York City in the mid-1970s is a far from bucolic burgh.
p2811
aVAs whoring and street crime have reached epidemic proportions, so the once proud avenues have become clagged with the detritus of daily life.
p2812
aVThrough this foul landscape cruises Travis Bickle (De Niro), an insomnia-wracked 'Nam vet completely estranged from modern society.
p2813
aVAlthough his attraction to political activist Betsy (Shepherd) hints at a normal life, Bickle's disdain for the city and its spawn overwhelms him.
p2814
aVCome the final reel, normalcy feels like a long forgotten land as Travis becomes obsessed with political assassination and rescuing child prostitute Iris (Foster) from her vicious pimp Sport (Keitel).While it might not contain enough sex and violence for modern moviegoers, Taxi Driver's disturbing qualities remain intact.
p2815
aVAfter all, who needs graphic assaults when you have Martin Scorsese cameoing as a passenger bent on shooting a woman in the holiest of holies.
p2816
aVAnd while the film's sexual content comprises a snatch of the Swedish porn film Language Of Love, the sound of Iris unfastening Travis's zip is as unsettling as a 'sex' scene can be.
p2817
aVWith Taxi Driver having been the subject of so much academic study and critical appraisal, it's hard to say anything about Scorsese's movie that's not been said 100 times before.
p2818
aVIf the film highlights anything, however, it's the importance of competition within the film industry.
p2819
aVSure, the studios have always been at one another's throats for control of the box-office, but for film to flourish, it's the artists who require rivals.
p2820
aVWhen they set about making Taxi Driver, Martin Scorsese was very much in the shadow of fellow 'Movie Brat' Francis Ford Coppola, Robert De Niro was slugging it out with Al Pacino, and Paul Schrader was locked in a battle for artistic supremacy with none other than his elder brother Leonard.
p2821
aVSuch skirmishes might sound petty, the product of state-sized egos.
p2822
aVBut if you look at the films made in America in the 1970s then compare them with the committee-produced products of today, you can't help but feel the artform would be in better shape were the creatives as obsessed with improving upon one another's work as with eclipsing their contemporaries' pay cheques.
p2823
aVThe story of how an unknown supporting actor called Sylvester Stallone came from nowhere to become champion of the motion picture industry overnight parallels the story of Rocky, a routine heavyweight who gets an unexpected crack at the world championship.
p2824
aVBurgess Meredith's old-time manager Mickey gets underdog Rocky Balboa into shape in a series of training sequences that reek of sweat.
p2825
aVThe tension builds up to the climactic confrontation in the square circle where Rocky goes toe-to-toe with the Ali-esque Apollo Creed, winningly played by Carl Weathers.
p2826
aVThe happy ending is irresistible in an old-fashioned way, satisfying audiences' need to believe in the American dream.
p2827
aVStallone's likeable performance as the good-hearted pug makes simple sentimental situations palatable.
p2828
aVStallone, who claimed to have written the script in three and-a-half days, was wise to demand a percentage of the profits - it was the biggest boxing movie for 20 years, and won three Oscars.
p2829
aVAnd to think, the studio wanted Burt Reynolds to play Balboa.
p2830
aVA village in medieval Japan is repeatedly falling prey to a troop of marauding bandits.
p2831
aVAt last in desperation the villagers turn to an old samurai warrior Kambei (Shimura) to assemble a team of similarly disenfranchised fighters to protect them.
p2832
aVThis he does, recruiting five other samurai and one untrained renegade (Kurosawa regular Mifune), offering them no more payment than a few bowls of rice per day.
p2833
aVThe samurai move into the village, where they find their employers initially suspicious, before together they face the bandits as they return for their annual raid.
p2834
aVWith elegant compositions, Kurosawa presents a vibrant story with languid sequences punctuated only rarely by scenes of action - most memorably the magnificently orchestrated climactic battle in the rainstorm.
p2835
aVJohn Sturges transported the story to the West, remaking it as The Magnificent Seven, and stuck closely to the original in the narrative structure and in several of the characters.
p2836
aV\u000aThere's something almost criminal about the way Spirited Away took over two years to reach Britain after its original Japanese release.
p2837
aVIn Japan, Hayao Miyazaki is both commercially successful (his films regularly beat box office records) and highly respected (Akira Kurosawa said: "I am somewhat disturbed when critics lump our works together.
p2838
aVOne cannot mimimise the importance of Miyazaki's work by comparing it to mine.").
p2839
aVIn Britain, however, his work has barely got more than a few cursory arts venue screenings.
p2840
aVAt least Spirited Away - which took the Berlin Golden Bear in 2002 and the Best Animated Film Oscar in 2003 - made it.
p2841
aVBetter late than never.
p2842
aVAfter the stress of making his last film, 1997's Princess Mononoke, Miyazaki had a breakdown and retired.
p2843
aVBut he came out of retirement when an idea to create another, lighter film began to take shape.
p2844
aVPrincess Mononoke was an action-packed epic that ranged across 15th century Japan.
p2845
aVFor Spirited Away he returned to the quieter - but no less serious - themes that he addressed to a degree in 1988's My Neighbor Tortoro.
p2846
aVBoth films feature a family moving house, girls getting used to upheaval, and elements of Alice In Wonderland.
p2847
aVBut where the 1988 film used a few specific motifs from Lewis Carroll's book (a plunge into a 'rabbit hole', a version of the Cheshire cat), Spirited Away casts its 10-year-old protagonist, Chihiro (voiced by Rumi Hîragi; or Daveigh Chase in the US dub), fully into a Wonderland, a mystical otherworld populated by animal spirits and gods.
p2848
aVChihiro arrives in this realm by accident.
p2849
aVHer parents, heading for their new home, take a road that leads into the woods.
p2850
aVArriving at a dead end, they walk down a corridor through a building and emerge in what dad takes to be "an abandoned theme park".
p2851
aVIt's something like a Japanese Portmeirion, but eerily deserted.
p2852
aVWhile her parents greedily help themselves to food, Chihiro wanders off and meets Haku (Miyu Irino; or Jason Marsden), a boy who warns her to leave before dark.
p2853
aVShe's too late though - a lake has appeared, blocking her route, ghostly forms have populated the town and her parents have turned into pigs.
p2854
aVShe's trapped.
p2855
aVThe only way to survive, Haku tells her, is to get work in the bath house that dominates the town.
p2856
aVHere "eight million gods rest their weary bones", according to Yubaba (Mari Natsuki; or Suzanne Pleshette), the witch who runs the establishment.
p2857
aVChihiro makes her way to meet Yubaba with the help of Kamajii (Bunta Sugawara; David Ogden Stiers), a multi-limbed codger who runs the boiler house, Lin (Yumi Tamai; Susan Egan), a serving woman with a taste for "roasted newt", and even a 'Radish God', a giant sumo of a chap with tuber-like appendages.
p2858
aVYubaba is hardly forthcoming - her realm is "no place for humans" - but she's forced to give Chihiro work, thanks to an oath she swore.
p2859
aVChihiro gets work helping Lin.
p2860
aVBut the management give them the worst jobs - such as assisting a hideous oozing creature they take to be a "Stink God; an extra large stinker at that".
p2861
aVIt's an entity so foul its smell makes food rot instantaneously, while its suppurations fill the room with a noxious gloop.
p2862
aVChihiro - or Sen as she becomes when Yubaba takes her name as part of her contract - does get by in the bath house, but it's not without further incident.
p2863
aVShe may lose her identity, but she retains her decency.
p2864
aVOne act of kindness results in a dangerous spirit, No Face, getting into the bath house and wreaking havoc by playing on the greed of the other employees ("Gold springs from his palms!").
p2865
aVShe even gets involved in an adventure that reveals her mysterious bond with Haku.
p2866
aVBut can she save her parents?
p2867
aVAlthough Miyazaki insists it's not his role to be didactic, all of his work (notably his second feature Nausicaa Of The Valley Of The Wind and Princess Mononoke) has strong messages about ecology and the human relationship with the natural world.
p2868
aVBut he's also fascinated with coming-of-age stories, notably about how girls (many of his protagonists are young females) can not only face up to adult responsibility, but also how they can become strong, principled members of society.
p2869
aVHere Chihiro is forced to grow up fast, but the process, while gruelling, is not without real benefits, as her understanding of the way society functions and experience of adult emotions develops exponentially.
p2870
aVSome aspects of the film are likely to be too foreign for Westerners - we're ignorant of Japanese belief systems, with their hierarchies of entities - but Miyazaki's work has the power to transcend such culturally specific elements.
p2871
aVWhile many of his earlier films drew on European stories (such as 1986's Castle In The Sky, from Jonathan Swift), the folkloric features he reworks are often universal.
p2872
aVBut most of all, his team's animation - here utilising more digital techniques, while still being grounded in 2D traditions - is always beautiful and, in places, breathtaking.
p2873
aVLocations are atmospheric, details are immaculate (you can identify the flower species in the gardens) and characters are diverse.
p2874
aVYubaba, for example, is a bizarre creation, a stocky woman with a huge head and even bigger hairdo; the bath house itself is stocked with all sorts of weird and wonderful creatures, from a Kermit-like assistant, to creatures reminiscent of his cuddly woodland deity from My Neighbor Tortoro, to troll-like beasts that look related to Maurice Sendak's Where The Wild Things Are).
p2875
aVIn a nutshell: It's no wonder the likes of Pixar's John Lasseter (who executive  produced the US dub) are so full of praise for Miyazaki.
p2876
aVHe's a true  genius, an artist and great filmmaker who happens to work in animation -  a medium often belittled as childish in the West.
p2877
aVSpirited Away is  wonderful.
p2878
aVBy Daniel Etherington\u000a
p2879
aVSteven Spielberg was still in his twenties when he signed up to direct the shark movie that would transform his career - and Hollywood itself.
p2880
aVThe production was notoriously chaotic yet, with the help of a major marketing campaign, Jaws became the biggest box office success ever, until the release of Star Wars the next year.
p2881
aVThe cast is top-notch.
p2882
aVRoy Scheider is police chief Brody, a hydrophobe taking up his new posting on Amity Island off America's East Coast.
p2883
aVHis buddies in battling the killer fish are rich-kid ichthyologist Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss) and maverick fisherman Quint (Robert Shaw).
p2884
aVThe film has political undertones - it is marked by a post-Watergate distrust of authority - but also owes a debt in its theme of self and mutual reliance to those twin classic 1950s westerns of contrasting political colours: High Noon and Rio Bravo.
p2885
aVJohn Williams' great and justly revered score is instantly evocative of the film and its power to terrify, and there are several stand-out shock moments and wonderfully sustained suspense scenes.
p2886
aVBut the film's real master stroke - keeping the monster unseen for as long as possible - was, ironically, forced on the production by the refusal of the various mechanical sharks to function on demand.
p2887
aVMilos Forman's well-crafted adaptation of Peter Shaffer's superior play turns out to be a very entertaining film, although it lacks the inventiveness of the original production.
p2888
aVAll traces of theatricality have been eradicated, and Amadeus on the big screen is an entirely different experience to watching it on stage.
p2889
aVThe action centres around Salieri (F Murray Abraham), a mediocre but passionate court composer who comes to detest the young genius Wolfgang Amadeus  Mozart (Tom Hulce).
p2890
aVMozart seemingly effortlessly composes his flawless masterpieces while finding the time to womanise and and behave outrageously.
p2891
aVHulce plays Mozart as a vulgar, obscene nit-wit (replete with punky pink wig), so it is easier to sympathise with Salieri's plot to bring him down.
p2892
aVThe filmmaker's decision to go for naturalism instead of the stylistic devices to the theatre may have watered down the essence somewhat, but ultimately seeing Salieri consumed by the natural talent he longs for is very moving.
p2893
aVDavis gives one of the performances of her career portraying aging stage diva Margot Channing with a painful air of authenticity: the camp star, still awesome but aware of the ravages of time and the threat of younger actresses snapping at her heels.
p2894
aVWhat she needs is someone to follow her around, look after her and worship her, and that person seems to arrive in the form of Eve (Baxter), an apparently innocent, adoring fan.
p2895
aVBut of course appearances can be deceptive, and we know from the opening scene that somehow the mousy, unassuming Eve has herself become a big star.
p2896
aVMankiewicz triumphs as writer and director.
p2897
aVThe piece fizzes with energy and the bitchy lines flow, largely from Davis' wickedly crooked mouth.
p2898
aVThe entire cast is on top form (Marilyn Monroe makes an early, fleeting cameo appearance), although among the actors only Sanders won an Oscar for his superb turn as the louche theatre critic, Addison De Witt, who also serves as the film's narrator.
p2899
aV\u000aIt begins with a journey through a man's brain.
p2900
aVIt ends with a city collapsing to the accompaniment of The Pixies.
p2901
aVIn between times, David Fincher's Fight Club visits unchartered parts of the human mind and the American underworld.
p2902
aVPlanes and apartments blow-up, men beat one another senseless, a man quits his job, soap gets made - yes, all human life is here.
p2903
aVAdapted from the cult novel by Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club is different things to different people.
p2904
aVWhat it isn't is a movie that deserved to flop massively on its original release - budgeted at $67 million, it took under $40 million at the US box office.
p2905
aVHow ironic that a film with an anti-globalisation message should have proved so difficult to market.
p2906
aVOur Narrator (Norton) is an unhappy soul.
p2907
aVStuck in a lucrative but dull job, his unsatisfying consumerist lifestyle has left him unable to sleep.
p2908
aVBriefly finding comfort by attending victim support groups, his bliss is shattered by Ms Marla Singer (Bonham Carter), a ball-busting free-spirit.
p2909
aVTrapped once again, the Narrator finds fresh hope in the form of Tyler Durden (Pitt), a good-looking, charismatic man who even has answers to the most difficult questions.
p2910
aVHow do you get ahead of the consumer game?
p2911
aVYou don't play it.
p2912
aVHow do you stop being crushed by your employment ambitions?
p2913
aVDon't have any.
p2914
aVHow do you rid yourself of frustration?
p2915
aVYou join Fight Club.
p2916
aVA picture overloaded with dark comedy, disturbing imagery and intense assaults (the fist fights are as nothing compared to the beatings handed out at Ikea and Starbucks), Fight Club is so brain-melting that watching it more than once is a necessity.
p2917
aVTake the character of Marla (Bonham Carter's greatest performance): the woman who comes on like a barmy devil on the first screening seems more like an angel second time around.
p2918
aVAlthough it has the good grace not to answer the myriad questions it asks, Fight Club does clear up a range of issues.
p2919
aVIs Edward Norton one of the greatest actors of his generation?
p2920
aVAbsolutely.
p2921
aVCan Brad Pitt step up to the plate come the big occasion?
p2922
aVBut of course.
p2923
aVDid David Fincher get lucky with Se7en?
p2924
aVNot a bit of it.
p2925
aVGiven that it is a picture about cruel irony, it's amusing that something as cash-brutal as the film industry could spawn so anti-corporate a movie as Fight Club.
p2926
aVSome might argue that the reason Fox backed the film was due to the fact that, under the surface, Fincher's film is far less brutal than it first appears.
p2927
aVBut as repeat viewings attest, continued exposure to Fight Club only enhances your admiration for both the movie and its message.
p2928
aVIn no way a secret endorsement of the system, this is a film that leaves your third eye squeegeed clean so that you can face a brave new world.
p2929
aVGot soap?\u000a
p2930
aV\u000a\u000a\u201cThe Amazing Spider-Man\u201d has everything you could ask from a summer movie.
p2931
aVAction, romance, imagination and smart writing.
p2932
aVAt the center of it all is the onscreen chemistry between leads Andrew Garfield (Peter Parker/Spider-Man) and Emma Stone (Gwen Stacy.
p2933
aV)  Without an adequate love story, an action film is only that, an action film.
p2934
aVThe story borrows from the first installment of Sam Raimi\u2019s trilogy.
p2935
aVAt least as it pertains to the offing of Parker\u2019s Uncle Ben (Martin Sheen).
p2936
aVBesides that, the screenwriters, including Steve Kloves, keep it interesting and imaginative.
p2937
aVNot everything is revealed at the end.
p2938
aVBut, the story is strong and holds your interest, unlike most films this time of year.
p2939
aVDespite that death in the family, Garfield\u2019s Parker is more energetic, excited and tougher than his predecessor, Tobey Maguire.
p2940
aVHe is the spark that drives the action.
p2941
aVHe\u2019s fun to watch and he seems to be having fun.
p2942
aVThis Spidey is less reflective and more decisive than the version that ran before.
p2943
aVDirector Marc Webb shows Hollywood how its done.
p2944
aVMake a film with excellent pacing and just enough romance to bring in a larger audience.
p2945
aVThis reboot is a major success and I hope the inevitable sequel will be just as good.
p2946
aVGrade: A-\u000aFast Facts:\u000aRelease Date: July 3, 2012\u000aRuntime: 136 minutes\u000aRated: PG-13\u000aReleased by Sony Pictures\u000a\u000a \u000a \u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p2947
aVHow many times can you retell the same story?
p2948
aVIf it's an origin, apparently the answer is "quite a few".
p2949
aVFrom Casino Royale to Batman Begins to Star Trek, we just love seeing a fresh take on how our heroes got started.
p2950
aVIn the case of The Amazing Spider-Man, they're retelling the story of Peter Parker's first days as a superhero just ten years after Sam Raimi and Tobey Maguire's hugely successful version.And during a long opening act, Marc Webb's take on Marvel's famous webslinger struggles to justify the tear-up-and-start-again approach.
p2951
aVIf we hadn't seen Spider-Man onscreen for decades, then perhaps the refresher would be necessary - but it's hard to shake the feeling that the major beats (outsider nerd, loving adoptive family, mutated spider bite, avoidable ironic tragedy) are iconic enough that they could have been dispensed with in an opening montage.
p2952
aVThe changes - flashbacks to Peter's parents, a revamped Aunt and Uncle (Sally Field and Martin Sheen, safe hands in slightly under-serving roles), and a new reason for Peter to visit the fateful Oscorp laboratory - are nuanced rather than dramatically game-changing.But from the moment Spider bites Man, this new take comes alive - and as the deviations from both the comic book source material and Raimi's films grow, it's hard to deny that they're canny and sure-footed throughout.
p2953
aVTaking a cue from Nolan's Bat-flicks, there's a determination to show the path by which Peter ends up throwing on a red-and-blue unitard and jumping around the city as being a logical and natural progression of events.
p2954
aVOnce fully suited up, meanwhile, the new wallcrawler feels far more torn from the page.
p2955
aVLithe and spindly, he dances around the screen dispensing exactly the right blend of irritating wisecrackery.
p2956
aVWebb, meanwhile, shows far more of a head for heights than his predecessor \u2013 delighting in throwing his hero (and the audience) through the air high above a New York City that takes its rightful place as a character in the story.
p2957
aVWhisper it, but when it comes to the visceral thrill of webslinging, this is arguably a better take than Raimi's.As Peter Parker, Andrew Garfield makes a compelling leading man in a performance that balances muted awkwardness with extroverted heroism.
p2958
aVHe's also, notably, recognisable as the same person both under and out of the mask - no mean feat.
p2959
aVHe also benefits from tangible chemistry with the excellent Emma Stone playing a Gwen Stacy that owes little to her comic book counterpart's personality, but is nevertheless one of the strongest superhero love interest roles since Margot Kidder's Lois Lane.The Amazing Spider-Man's biggest problems aren't on the geek-satisfaction level, but are instead matters of more basic pacing and structure.
p2960
aVEarly plot threads are discarded in later acts, while a promising subplot with Denis Leary as Gwen's police chief father emerges far too late in the day.
p2961
aVIt also feels like there's an entire middle section missing in which the hero properly establishes his reputation among the good folk of NYC.
p2962
aVIn the end, though - and despite lacking a villain of real conviction - the film gets by on a heady wave of confidence.
p2963
aVIt has the brass neck to make significant changes to the established lore and - on joyous occasion - to let its hero truly soar.
p2964
aVIt's the sort of confidence that could be mistaken for arrogance; but then, isn't that our Spidey through and through?
p2965
aV\u000aDescribed by Laughton as a "nightmarish Mother Goose", this profoundly disturbing psychodrama marked both the beginning and the end of his career as a director.
p2966
aVDriven by a performance by Mitchum that goes a long way to defining on-screen evil, both tone and tale are absolutely compelling throughout.
p2967
aVThe complicated plot has a logic all its own but the central story follows psychopathic preacher Harry Powell (Mitchum) as he searches obsessively for the $10,000 hidden by a condemned convict.
p2968
aVMarrying then murdering the dead man's wife (Winters), he swiftly turns his attention to her kids (Chapin and Bruce), pursuing them to a conclusion of mythical proportions.
p2969
aVMet with bemusement at the time of its release, the creepy atmosphere gives rise to some extraordinarily eerie images.
p2970
aVThere's Shelley Winters, dead in her car at the bottom of a river, hair swirling about her face.
p2971
aVThere's Mitchum, knuckles tattooed with the words 'Love' and 'Hate', casting a shadow across the kids' bedroom wall.
p2972
aVAnd there's the hallucinatory boat trip with its oversized flora and fauna undertaken by the children as they try to escape.
p2973
aVDrawing on sources as diverse as German Expressionism and rural American fable, this is a strange, tense and at times dream-like film that still sends a shiver down the spine.\u000a \u000a
p2974
aVIt takes a true visionary to see exactly how the times are a-changing.
p2975
aVIn the latter half of the 1970s, with only Thunderbolt and Lightfoot (1974) to his name, Michael Cimino approached the Hollywood studios with his pitch for The Deer Hunter.
p2976
aVThey all baulked, unconvinced that the American cinema-going public was ready to see the recent wounds of Vietnam reopened.
p2977
aVUnconcerned, Cimino secured financial backing outside the usual channels by turning to Britain's EMI, and then took further decisions that, at least at the time, seemed crazy: making the film last a whopping three hours (with a Russian Orthodox wedding sequence near the film's beginning matching the length of all the war scenes in the middle), and placing alongside his established star Robert De Niro an ensemble of relative or total unknowns, as well as John Cazale, whose cancer meant there was a real risk that he would not live to complete his final part (in fact he died shortly after the production ended).
p2978
aVThe rest is history.
p2979
aVThe Deer Hunter swept the board at film awards ceremonies, was a phenomenon at the box-office, and launched the cinematic careers of newcomers Meryl Streep and Christopher Walken.
p2980
aVThe reasons behind its great success are easy enough to see: it boasts extraordinarily nuanced performances from what is, at least in retrospect, a dream cast; it is technically very accomplished, without once seeming flashy or ringing false; and it manages to root its grand epic themes in a compellingly intimate human drama.
p2981
aVThe Deer Hunter is, in short, a deserved classic.The film also, in its day, courted considerable controversy, chiefly because of its portrayal of Vietcong soldiers forcing their prisoners (American and Vietnamese alike) to play Russian roulette.
p2982
aV'Hanoi' Jane Fonda, whose own, similarly themed film Coming Home was in fierce competition with The Deer Hunter at the 1979 Academy Awards, accused Cimino of racism, historians denied that there was any evidence of Russian roulette being played in the conflict, while a confederacy of psychologists and media pundits blamed the film for a spate of Russian roulette-related deaths in the US following its release.
p2983
aVThere is no doubt that Cimino's chosen focus is on his American characters, although whether this constitutes racism is more open to question - he certainly does not shy away from showing American brutality.
p2984
aVCimino has subsequently defended his film's bhistorical accuracy by claiming that Russian roulette is used on POWS even to this day as a weapon of torture - but it does not follow from this that it was ever used in Vietnam, and the uncomfortable probability remains that the 'continuing', if thankfully marginalised, practice in today's conflicts is inspired less by the realities of the Indo-Chinese experience than by the accessible fictions of The Deer Hunter itself.
p2985
aVWhat is certain is that the film's Russian roulette sequences constitute an arresting metaphor for the random cruelty of death in war and, thanks to the care which Cimino has taken in building up the viewer's investment in his tormented characters, these scenes are as involving, upsetting and unbearably tense as anything that has ever appeared in cinema.Viewed now, some decades after it was made, what seems most striking about The Deer Hunter is the sensitivity with which it charted the shifting mood of its times.
p2986
aVAfter Vietnam, after Watergate, after nearly a decade of self-examination, anti-authoritarianism and cynicism, when all the old American verities had fallen away and patriotism had become a dirty word, Cimino seemed almost alone in discerning that, in a nation shaken to its very foundations by distrust, there still remained a growing desire to return to some of the old faiths, values and traditions.
p2987
aVHis story of three young working-class men from the heartlands (De Niro, Walken, Savage), whose lives are all forever changed by their tour of duty in Vietnam, is a harrowing reflection of America's experience in the first half of the 1970s; but the film's final, ambivalent sequence, in which the two survivors gather at a wake for the third with a small group of friends and lovers and find solace in the words of 'God Bless America', instead looks forward to the future.
p2988
aVCimino's characters, who are only semi-articulate at the best of times, never actually voice an opinion on America's Indo-Chinese ventures, and it is not clear whether Michael, Nick and Steve go to Vietnam because they are patriots, or conscripts, or because it is in their eyes, much like the mountains back home where they hunt for deer, just another all-male domain in which they can play out their games of cameraderie and machismo.
p2989
aVIn this way, Cimino side-stepped the narrow ideological controversies of his times, making a film that could (and did) touch both fervent supporters and vehement opponents of the Vietnam War - and the same is true for his ending, which seems to reassert an America that rests on faith and patriotism, even as it calls into question whether such terms can any longer have the same meaning as they did before.
p2990
aVIt is a mixed message that looks back to all the doubts and disillusionments of the seventies, while at the same time paving the way for the new conservatism of the eighties under Reagan.
p2991
aVOn top of all this, The Deer Hunter is at once a war epic (whose focus on the homecoming of De Niro's hero Michael Vronsky evokes both Homer's 'Odyssey' and Tolstoy's 'War and Peace'), a realistic portrait of a sleepy Russian Orthodox steeltown in Pennsylvania, and a story of male friendship that, post-Brokeback Mountain, seems full of unspoken desire and sublimated longings.
p2992
aVIt is rich, messy, and unmissable.
p2993
aVWhen the American Film Institute held a survey to find American film's greatest hero, it was no great surprise that To Kill A Mockingbird's Atticus Finch romped to victory.
p2994
aVOne of literature's most admirable characters before he belonged to the movies, Finch, as brought to life by Gregory Peck, is a walking embodiment of decency and courage.
p2995
aVIndeed, such are Peck's dimensions and physiognomy, that when Finch is fighting for justice, you could be forgiven for thinking that Abraham Lincoln had walked out of a history book and straight into a law court.
p2996
aVAs Finch is one of Hollywood's greatest champions, so To Kill A Mockingbird is one of America's true film triumphs.
p2997
aVIts success is in part due to its source material - Harper Lee's best-selling novel tells a fierce story.When a black man is charged with raping a white woman, Alabama lawyer Finch does the right thing and defends the lad.
p2998
aVIt's a decision that doesn't sit well with the locals who give Atticus every reason to quit.
p2999
aVWhile his young family makes him vulnerable, Finch's determination to teach his children the difference between right and wrong makes him see the case through.
p3000
aVWinner of three Oscars, To Kill A Mockingbird is one of those films where all the elements came together perfectly.
p3001
aVBesides hiring one of the biggest stars in Hollywood, producer Alan J Pakula secured an esteemed director, Robert Mulligan, gifted DP, Russell Harlan and acclaimed composer, Elmer Bernstein.
p3002
aVPakula also struck gold when it came to the supporting roles, and the cast here do much to carry the film - particularly a young unknown by the name of Robert Duvall.
p3003
aVFew films really deserve such enthusiastic plaudits as 'heart-warming', 'classic' and 'inspirational', but Frank Capra's Christmas fable is worthy of them all - and more.
p3004
aVSmall-town life has never seemed quite so appealing.
p3005
aVModern filmgoers are going to have to face facts: we're never going to live in such a gloriously friendly place as Bedford Falls.
p3006
aVBecause the town, as portrayed in It's A Wonderful Life, no longer exists - if, indeed, its values ever existed anywhere other than in Capra's imagination.
p3007
aVNevertheless, he crafted a magical, uplifting place that, happily, we can still visit any time we wish.
p3008
aVThe film is a deceptively simple tale of redemption and hope versus hopelessness.
p3009
aVJames Stewart's George Bailey is desperately unhappy; reaching his all-time low when he sinks into alcoholic depression and considers suicide.
p3010
aVClarence (Travers), an angel as desperate to please as George and hoping to achieve his wings, saves him.
p3011
aVIn a classic sequence, Clarence unwraps George's life, showing him what might have been had he never existed, and convincing him that life is sweeter than he thinks.
p3012
aVIn creating this comfortable world in which to exist for the duration of the movie, Capra and his co-writers have fashioned something timeless, where just about anyone can find solace.
p3013
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aWith Bryan Singer returning to the X-Men series and the film tapping into one of the comic books\u2019 most well-regarded storylines (written and drawn by Chris Claremont and John Byrne, the guys who made the X-Men cool), X-Men: Days of Future Past represents the franchise\u2019s best opportunity for something special in a while.
p3014
aVThe resulting work does a pretty nifty job of tidying up the series\u2019 convoluted and contradictory chronology, and features a couple of pretty cool set-pieces, but it\u2019s not the triumph it was surely designed to be.
p3015
aVDespite the ambition of the time travel story, the narrative feels narrow.
p3016
aVThe epicness is stated rather that shown, and the world created consequently feels a bit small.
p3017
aVThe films\u2019 treatment of the Mystique character has always veered away from the source material, but it\u2019s hard to see her centrality here as anything more than a reflection of Jennifer Lawrence\u2019s rising star.
p3018
aVEvan Peters makes am impression as Quicksilver, but he checks out of the movie early on, suggesting that he was perhaps a last-minute addition.
p3019
aVThe awe-inspiring set-piece focused on his super-speed abilities is the best thing in the movie, and nothing that happens afterwards lives up to it.
p3020
aVX-Men: Days of Future Past veers between interesting and insipid for much of its running time.
p3021
aVSinger\u2019s affection for the characters is clear, but the script is mostly sombre platitudes, and lacks the critical playfulness that Joss Whedon brought to The Avengers.
p3022
aVCould\u2019ve been much worse though.
p3023
aV\u2018X-Men: Days of Future Past\u2019 Movie Times (also in 3D)\u000a\u000a
p3024
aV\u000aMagneto is back to his levitating ways in \u201cX-Men: Days of Future Past\u201d\u000a\u201cX-Men: Days of Future Past\u201d is more than just a gathering of super-heroes.
p3025
aVIt\u2019s a symphony of superbly coordinated action scenes that, as a whole, will appeal to the mainstream, not just the comic book crowd.
p3026
aVHow do I know?
p3027
aVWell, I\u2019m not particularly into the X-Men mythology.
p3028
aVI barely know the difference between Rogue and Shadowcat; Beast and Colossus.
p3029
aVIf I can make sense of Bryan Singer\u2019s new film, anyone can.
p3030
aVSo, why is this new X-Men film so good?
p3031
aVMany reasons.
p3032
aVMost of all, it\u2019s the writing and direction.
p3033
aVA complicated time travel story with a huge cast, including then and now versions of our multitudinous heroes, is adeptly presented in glorious 3D.
p3034
aVAnd, with a minimum of confusion.
p3035
aVLike I said before: It\u2019s a symphony.
p3036
aV\u201cX-Men: Days of Future Past\u201d borrows a bit from the \u201cStar Trek\u201d reboot.
p3037
aVBy involving time travel, some of the previous X-Men exploits are wiped clean and a younger generation of mutants are allowed to move the story forward in future sequels.
p3038
aVThe year is 2023 and most of the mutants have been wiped out by flying robots called Sentinels.
p3039
aVThese monstrosities absorb the individual superpowers of the mutants they encounter, thus fighting fire with fire.
p3040
aVWhatever the mutants can do, the Sentinels can do better.
p3041
aVAnd, they use their new skills to kill the mutants, one by one.
p3042
aVMagneto (Ian McKellen) and Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart), often enemies, unite in this dystopian future to send Wolverine (Hugh Jackman) back in time to keep Mystique (Jennifer Lawrence) from killing the Sentinels inventor.
p3043
aVBolivar Trask (Peter Dinklage) was martyred by Mystique\u2019s bloodworks, prompting President Richard Nixon\u2019s approval of the Sentinels program.
p3044
aVHow do you stop Mystique?
p3045
aVMagneto and Xavier decide to send Wolverine back to 1973, using the time travel powers of Shadowcat (Ellen Page).
p3046
aVHow do you tell such a complicated story stocked with so many characters without having the audience go crazy trying to keep up?
p3047
aVGet the guy who\u2019s done it before many times, Bryan Singer.
p3048
aVNot only is he a veteran of previous X-Men films, he knows how to handle complex plots (The Usual Suspects).
p3049
aVOf course, a director is only good as his writer.
p3050
aVAnd, Simon Kinberg gets huge kudos for making this breathtaking story jump from the page.
p3051
aVFinally, the actors.
p3052
aVNot only the truly talented thespians I mentioned previously.
p3053
aVBut, how about a tip of the hat to James McAvoy (young Professor X) and Michael Fassbender (young Magneto) and a breakthrough performance by Evan Peters as Quicksilver.
p3054
aVPeters is bright, hip and oh so likable as the mutant with the ability to run at supersonic speeds.
p3055
aVOh, and a \u201cGame of Thrones\u201d alert.
p3056
aVPeter Dinklage is interesting to watch as the chief villain, Trask.
p3057
aVBut, this is the only role that could have been improved.
p3058
aVIt\u2019s a bit of a one-note character, and that\u2019s not the fault of the excellent actor who plays Lord Tyrion on the popular HBO series.
p3059
aV\u201cX-Men: Days of Future Past\u201d is one of the best films I\u2019ve seen so far in 2014.
p3060
aVIt\u2019s more than just a super hero movie.
p3061
aVIt\u2019s a true champion of summer fun.
p3062
aVGrade: A\u000a \u000aX-Men are about to be x\u2019d out permanently in the year 2023.
p3063
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3064
aV\u000aHaving cut her teeth on the cult TV sitcom Parks and Recreation, first-time feature writer Katie Dippold lucked out when Bridesmaids director Paul Feig fell in love with the first draft of her spec script for The Heat.
p3065
aVAnd she lucked out big-time when Feig leveraged the box-office success of his début feature to cast Sandra Bullock and Bridesmaids break-out star Melissa McCarthy as seriously mis-matched buddies in this affectionate, female-inflected pastiche of 80s cop movies such as 48 Hrs.
p3066
aVand Lethal Weapon.
p3067
aVBullock's tight-arsed New York FBI agent is essentially a loose variation on her Miss Congeniality character, Gracie Hart: a book-smart professional with no friends, no family, no boyfriend and both eyes on a potential promotion, Sarah Ashburn is not a team player.
p3068
aVSent to Boston to investigate some gangland murders, the arrogant Ashburn sparks an explosive clash of wills when she tries to steamroller her Irish working class partner Shannon Mullins, a loud-mouthed local gal with street smarts, a fridge full of weapons and an intimate knowledge of her jealously-guarded home turf.
p3069
aVPolice work initially takes a back seat as the two determined women go head-to-head: Ashburn likes getting inside the criminal's heads; Mullins would rather crack them open.
p3070
aVSo, naturally, there's a bonding scene in a blue collar Boston-Irish bar, in which Ashburn gets roaring drunk and busts some ill-advised dance moves with the hard-drinking Mullins.
p3071
aVAfter which, they see one another in a different light.
p3072
aVFeig makes no secret of the fact that he prefers broad, physical humour to clever, wordy comedy, so there's nothing subtle about the violent slapstick action or rude jokes: Mullins' graphic description of Ashburn's neglected nether-regions is a case in point.
p3073
aVLike Mullins herself, The Heat is initially hard to warm up to, as it tries too hard to establish its belligerent bolshiness and take-no-prisoners crudity; but like Mullins the film is ultimately both extremely funny and undeniably loveable.
p3074
aVEngagingly acted character comedy takes precedence over the nominal action-comedy plot, which involves the usual mysterious crime kingpin and the whereabouts of a big shipment of drugs.
p3075
aVOne might almost see this as an unconventional love story: two female cops, both in their own way ostracised misfits, start out hating one another, but gradually realise that they have complementary skill-sets and quite a lot in common.
p3076
aVAnd while their contrasting characters are learning to get along, Bullock and McCarthy get to swear up a storm and kick some criminal butt.\u000a
p3077
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aHaving realigned the rom-com and feminised the bromance with the hilarious Bridesmaids, director Paul Feig now attempts to makeover the action-comedy with slightly more mixed success.
p3078
aVFor while Sandra Bullock and Melissa McCarthy make for an engaging mismatched pair to rival Riggs and Murtagh and Foley and Rosewood, they\u2019re saddled with a predictable drug cartel plot that seems to needlessly stretch the running time by an extra 20 minutes.
p3079
aVThe central relationship initially also seems depressingly similar to McCarthy\u2019s earlier 2013 effort Identity Thief.
p3080
aVLuckily, after a while McCarthy\u2019s loose cannon (and her The Fighter-esque Boston family) and Bullock\u2019s by-the-book agent start to grow on you, particularly when given the chance to let loose on one another\u2019s fashion sense, hygiene and dating life.
p3081
aVBoth also get plenty of opportunities to showcase their adeptness at physical and visual gags, while a black humour approach to the action will have many cinema-goers wincing while doubled over with laughter.
p3082
aVThe Heat might lack the sheer balls-to-the-wall, gag-a-minute quality of The Other Guys or even the wacky charm of last year\u2019s 21 Jump Street remake, but it\u2019s both a reminder of Bullock\u2019s comedic talents and one of the best female comedic pairings since Tina Fey met Amy Poehler.
p3083
aVRead more on \u2018The Heat\u2019 and find movie times.\u000a\u000a
p3084
aV\u000a\u000aA female cop-buddy movie is pretty rare.
p3085
aVSo, it\u2019s doubly disappointing that the producers went cheap and stupid on the script.
p3086
aVSandra Bullock plays her uptight FBI agent from \u201cMiss Congeniality\u201d and Melissa McCarthy is a slovenly Boston cop.
p3087
aVTogether, they look to take down a mysterious drug kingpin plaguing Bean town in \u201cThe Heat.\u201d\u000aIt\u2019s refreshing to give us something new like a big-screen version of \u201cCagney and Lacey.\u201d  But, when you bombard us with every cop-buddy cliché in the book, are we supposed to roll over and say it\u2019s pure genius?
p3088
aVNo, can\u2019t do it.
p3089
aVEverything\u2019s predictable.
p3090
aVBefore they even meet each other, they fight over a parking spot in front of the police station.
p3091
aVThey fight over the clothes they wear on the job.
p3092
aVThey wind up bonding and bust the bad guys, complimenting each other by the end.
p3093
aVIs it fun to see the morbidly obese McCarthy curse like a sailor nonstop for two hours?
p3094
aVNo.
p3095
aVIf writer Katie Dippold had been a bit more sparing, the verbal fireworks might have been more effective.
p3096
aVIs it fun to see Bullock NOT be able to curse for nearly two hours?
p3097
aVNo.
p3098
aVBut, we know that by the end she\u2019ll be up to speed and that\u2019s supposed to be hilarious.
p3099
aVNo, \u201cThe Heat\u201d didn\u2019t miss a single cop-buddy cliché.
p3100
aVAll it did was place two women in the roles instead of two men.
p3101
aVKudos for doing that, but give the women something to work with.
p3102
aVYuk!
p3103
aVGrade: D\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3104
aVA dreadful bit of mid-70s soap opera, with Elizabeth Taylor as the rich bored wife who scrabbles desperately to regain her youth by having plastic surgery in an exclusive Swiss clinic, the upshot being she finds herself forced to choose between her fragile marriage ( to Henry Fonda) or the lure of the toyboys who have begun paying her untold attention since the docs ironed her face out.
p3105
aV"Who am I?
p3106
aV", wonders a pet chameleon, surveying the world rushing past his glass case as he is transported along a Nevada freeway.
p3107
aV"I could be anyone."
p3108
aVThis lizard with thespian aspirations is voiced by that most chameleonic of actors, Johnny Depp, and shows a similar range.
p3109
aVWhen we first meet him in his display box, he contemplates play-acting a scenario in which he is a 'sea captain' (like Depp's Jack Sparrow) - and later he will have a desert vision modelled closely on Captain Jack's hallucinatory underworld experiences in Gore Verbinski's previous film, Pirates of the Caribbean: At World's End (2007).
p3110
aVYet the chameleon also has the crazy eyes and Hawaiian shirt of Depp's Hunter S. Thompson from Fear And Loathing In Las Vegas (1998) - and will soon briefly come face-to-face (or at least face-to-windscreen) with the 'real' Thompson.
p3111
aV"I knew it!"
p3112
aVThompson will exclaim - after all, he was always seeing lizards in Terry Gilliam's film.
p3113
aVSo while Rango may eventually target the spaghetti western as its genre of choice, and our herpetological hero-in-the-making may soon find himself 'blending in' as a vainglorious gun-slinger in the dried-out town of Dirt, there is the sense that any genre could fit, just so long as he is prepared for once to commit to seeing his story through to its end.
p3114
aVEven a raid on a wagon in a canyon - a sequence that ought to be pure oater cliché - is played out by a menagerie of desert critters while somehow overtly referencing movies as generically wide-ranging as Apocalypse Now (1979), Star Wars (1977), Raiders Of The Lost Ark (1981) and Mad Max 2: The Road Warrior (1981).
p3115
aVIn this cowboy flick, anything goes - and it tends to go fast, furious and funny.The western may privilege Men with No Name, but 'Rango' himself, true to his film's postmodern sensibilities, is a man with too many names (he is even "one of the few men to have a maiden name") - and it is telling that when, near the end, he has a mystical encounter with the original Man With No Name, Clint Eastwood's drawling figure (voiced by Timothy Olyphant) should not be riding a saddled horse, but rather a golf buggy festooned with his many Academy Awards.
p3116
aVHere everything is an act, and Verbinski is happy to wear whatever shoe matches the performance - especially in the interests of raising a laugh.
p3117
aVRango plays out like a full-length version of the surreal scene in Alejandro Jodorowsky's The Holy Mountain (1973) where the Conquest of Mexico is re-enacted on a scale model by costumed chameleons and toads.
p3118
aVIn their first animated feature, VFX house Industrial Light & Magic offer a photorealistic (yet highly mannered) microcosm of our own era, as 'Rango' stands off against the forces of property foreclosure, resource depletion and corrupt exploitation, and in so doing, lives up to his own myth - complete with a band of mariachi owls to sing with bleak relish of his evolutionary destiny ("the lizard - he's going to die").
p3119
aVA fish out of water in a town out of water, our swivel-eyed protagonist will come to fit in precisely by improvising and adapting to his hostile new environment without ever sacrificing his peculiar idiosyncrasies.
p3120
aVIf he, like his film, is an incongruous amalgam of clashing types and conventions, always clad in artifice, then he is also a man (or at least a reptile) for our times, creating his own reality from the flotsam and jetsam of culture.
p3121
aV"We each see what we want to see," as the accident-prone armadillo Roadkill (Alfred Molina) puts it.
p3122
aV"Beautiful isn't it?"
p3123
aVIt is - and thigh-slappingly hilarious to boot, as its state-of-the-art animation collides with postmodern pastiche on a busy road along which wayside legend will always count for more than supposed progress.
p3124
aVContains some spoilers\u000a																 \u000aIn the final part of what some see as one of the most successful money-making commercial properties ever and some see as the treasured and magical realisation of childhood dreams, but most acknowledge as both, screenwriter Steve Kloves and director David Yates are tasked with tying together loose ends, concluding emotional arcs and visualising a brief coda that required key cast members to age by 19 years.
p3125
aVPhew.
p3126
aVIt's not exactly a case of wave a magic wand and - accio climax!
p3127
aV- it appears.
p3128
aVAssessed as a film on its own terms, this eighth entry is entertaining stuff, no more, no less.
p3129
aVThe Horcruxes and Hallows feel like sub-Tolkien plot-drivers, and we all know who will win, who will die, and who will snog.
p3130
aVFine, job done.
p3131
aVBut the thing is, you can't seriously assess these films (and least of all this final entry) on their own terms: they're bound to each other, to the books, and to what - for want of a better word - has been called "the Potter Phenomenon".
p3132
aVAs part of this multi-media, many-headed hydra, how do these 130 minutes fare?
p3133
aVUnusually for a Potter movie, the minutes seem to fly by.
p3134
aVCertain sections even feel rushed - not as if their shooting was rushed, but as if perhaps the editors were charged with leaving not a shred of extraneous fat on the narrative (an approach that has been sorely needed in previous instalments but actually could have been fractionally relaxed here).
p3135
aVThe best sequence involves Severus Snape's back story, and I'd have been content to watch this unfold all day.
p3136
aVBefore the books were all finished, author JK Rowling told Alan Rickman what was in store for Snape, allowing him to play the part to pitch-perfect effect throughout.
p3137
aVHere, his long and meticulous groundwork pays off in a montage of flashbacks and new material of such emotional power it's a shame they don't linger just a touch longer.
p3138
aVRickman has always been one of the most engaging of the actors  whose characters appeared in all eight movies.
p3139
aVBut perhaps as much as  the main players, it's the evolution of eternal minor characters like  Matthew Lewis's Neville Longbottom that bring home with a bump how far  this series has come.
p3140
aVFrom a chubby kid in a tale of boarding school  hi-jinks blurting "Sorry, but have you seen a toad at all?
p3141
aVI've lost  him!
p3142
aVHe keeps getting away from me!"
p3143
aVin 2001, to a big damn hero with  bloodied brow taunting a grim rabble of mercenaries - "Yeah, you and  whose army?"
p3144
aV- in 2011, Neville's evolved under our noses from Billy  Bunter to Braveheart without that even being a main plot point -  something you couldn't credibly achieve in any old sword 'n' sorcery  series.
p3145
aVThe Harry Potter series saw its leads grow up alongside their  characters over eight films: there are no perpetual 10-year-old Bart  Simpsons here.
p3146
aVThis makes the series unique in film history (though of  course plenty of TV series have allowed real-time ageing) and  contributes to the feeling that something unprecedented is ending.
p3147
aVWhether you are a fan of the Potter films or merely tolerated them  annually like a Christmas visit from cousins you don't really get on  with, for audiences of a certain age, they had become a cinematic  certainty.
p3148
aVMaybe you couldn't stand Hermione, but it's hard to imagine  not hearing each year that she's once again excelled in all classes.
p3149
aVIt would be a fitting legacy if one of the many children we're  constantly told have been inspired to read because of Harry Potter grew  up to write something worthy to take its place.
p3150
aVIt's on this note that  the series closes, with proud dad Harry bidding young Albus Severus  Potter a fond farewell as lil Al heads off to Hogwarts for the first time.
p3151
aVOnce you get over the shock of Radcliffe playing middle-aged, it  becomes clear exactly why it had to end this way: it's a hopeful passing  of the baton by JK Rowling to the next generation.
p3152
aVRead our reviews of the rest of the Harry Potter series
p3153
aVThe first five minutes of The Social Network lay the film's cards brilliantly on the table.
p3154
aVAfter a humiliating and totally justified romantic rejection, 19 year old Facebook founder Mark Zuckerberg (an utterly on-fire Jesse Eisenberg) returns to his rooms at Harvard, grabs a beer, logs on to his blog and rants bitterly.
p3155
aVIn this he's no different to countless contemporary students.
p3156
aVThe difference emerges as Mark's drunken anger evolves from slagging off the lady in question - "Erica Albright's a bitch.
p3157
aVYou think that's because her family changed their name from Albrecht or because all B.U.
p3158
aVgirls are bitches?"
p3159
aV- to coding a website called Facemash that allows users to compare the hotness of female Harvard undergraduates.
p3160
aVIt's a tiny step down a road that eventually leads to the creation of Facebook.
p3161
aVAs Mark steals women's pictures for Facemash by hacking Harvard's online directories of student photographs college by college, the action cuts between this excluded teen's dorky dorm room and a hedonistic party given by the socially connected elite of Harvard.
p3162
aVScriptwriter Aaron Sorkin (The West Wing) says "We don't know if this party is real or if the party exists in Mark's head as the place where he can't be while he's doing all this, but I think that - like all of us - Mark would like to feel the way other people look."
p3163
aVTrent Reznor (Nine Inch Nails) and Atticus Ross' consistently superb score grinds through this interlocking scene (drink, drugs and truckloads of girls versus coding, computers and pictures of girls), helping bring out all the bitter tensions between Mark's misogynistic fantasy of promiscuous hedonism and the provocative thrill of creating Facemash.
p3164
aVThis, the work of a single, solitary evening - presented as a lonely, intoxicating power trip - sets the stage perfectly for the film to come.The online politics of relationships, the need to not only belong but be at the top, the excitement of rage-fuelled creation and destruction, where exactly inspiration comes from and whether you can own it, the nature of friendship, the nature of competing truths, the impossibility of objectivity - these are huge ideas and The Social Network tackles them head on with a stylish wit.
p3165
aVSorkin tells the story of Facebook, but the film isn't really about Facebook.
p3166
aVIt's about what happens when a timeless antagonist - an intelligent and often very funny but bitter and arrogant post-adolescent male - chances to be born at a time and place when his particular set of abilities and drives are exactly those required to found a new nation state of the online world.
p3167
aVEisenberg wonderfully portrays a character of whom we believe all this without question.
p3168
aVOn the one hand his Mark radiates abundant talent and ambition, on the other he successfully projects the screwed-up bile that stems from his failure to grasp the subtleties of real-world human interaction.
p3169
aVHe understands the rules of the game, but can't or won't play.
p3170
aVEqually, and far more laudably, Mark is also shown throughout to be motivated by a desire to tear down social barriers rooted in tradition and privilege, with Harvard a steaming microcosm of global social hierarchies.
p3171
aVCould there be anything more indicative of Mark's Spock-like view of social interaction than Facebook's - and therefore Mark's - choice of the word "status" to qualify whether one is in a relationship or not?
p3172
aVRelationships are a trophy, an elusive uncodifiable mystery that this outsider tries so very hard to codify, literally as far as the millions of lines of code that go into creating his social networking site are concerned, but also in the more figurative sense.
p3173
aVAs more people selectively share more and more of themselves online, this is a subject aching for a clear-sighted, smartly-executed treatment, and David Fincher and Aaron Sorkin have provided exactly that treatment.
p3174
aVThat they've done so through a compelling human story, expertly acted, intensely re-watchable, and with plenty of LOLs along the way, is what makes The Social Network one of this year's few truly essential films.
p3175
aV\u000aWarner Bros. Pictures\u000aThere\u2019s no contest.
p3176
aVThe Dark Knight Rises, which opens next week, is the most hotly anticipated movie of the summer.
p3177
aVAnd yes, it lives up to the hype.
p3178
aVBut what\u2019s most astonishing is not Batman\u2019s new flying machine that zooms around skyscraper canyons, or a flirty Anne Hathaway poured into a skin-tight catsuit and stiletto boots, or a muzzled terrorist who looks like an S&M wrestler on steroids.
p3179
aVNo, the most breathtaking moment in the epic finale of the Batman trilogy is when Michael Caine weeps.
p3180
aVWhy?
p3181
aVThat would be a spoiler.
p3182
aVLet\u2019s just say the domestic bickering between Bruce Wayne (Christian Bale) and Alfred (Caine), his paternal butler, finally comes to an emotional head.
p3183
aV\u201cSir Michael Caine is always going to surprise you,\u201d says writer-director Christopher Nolan, on the phone from Los Angeles.
p3184
aV\u201cHaving worked with him on five movies, I knew he was going to bring something special to that scene.
p3185
aVBut when he performed it, it was absolutely gutting.
p3186
aVWe sat there in dailies and people were just sobbing.\u201d\u000aDon\u2019t be surprised to see Caine honoured at the Oscars, or to see The Dark Knight Rises vie for Best Picture.
p3187
aVSome franchises simply peter out.
p3188
aVNolan\u2019s trilogy, like the Lord of the Rings and Harry Potter sagas, has an engineered momentum that builds to a monumental climax.
p3189
aVAfter Batman Begins (2005) and The Dark Knight (2008), \u201cthis is not another episode in a series for us,\u201d says Nolan.
p3190
aV\u201cIt\u2019s the third act in one large story.\u201d\u000a\u000aIt also lands as the third act of a superhero summer, the last of three blockbusters after Marvel\u2019s The Avengers and The Amazing Spider-Man.
p3191
aVAs an action movie with physical and emotional heft, The Dark Knight Rises would appear to be the heavyweight contender.
p3192
aVBut The Avengers vaulted past the Potter, Pirates and Transformers franchises to become the third-highest-grossing movie in history after Avatar and Titanic, reaping a worldwide box office of $1.4 billion.
p3193
aVTough act to follow\u2014even though The Dark Knight earned over $1 billion.
p3194
aVTwenty years ago, who could have predicted that Hollywood would be a comic-book kingdom?
p3195
aVBlame it on Tim Burton\u2019s Batman (1989), which spawned a breed of dark, operatic spectacles for grown-up fanboys.
p3196
aVNow every self-respecting star needs a franchise and a mask, while comic-book culture ravages the ecology of the multiplex like an invasive species.
p3197
aVBut Nolan doesn\u2019t see his work as part of the trend.
p3198
aV\u201cWe never saw our films as comic-book movies,\u201d he says.
p3199
aV\u201cThe jumping-off point for Batman Begins was to make a movie, like any other adaptation.\u201d Yet he realizes that Rises\u2019 anchor spot in this superhero summer will affect its fate.
p3200
aV\u201cHow it\u2019s going to do, I have no idea,\u201d says the 41-year-old British director.
p3201
aV\u201cAll I can do is make the best film I can and hope people go along for the ride.\u201d\u000aThere is a lot riding on it.
p3202
aVEverything about The Dark Knight Rises seems to be an escalation of scale.
p3203
aVWith an estimated budget of $250 million, it clocks in at a mighty two hours, 44 minutes.
p3204
aVHalf the movie was filmed in the giant IMAX format, while the rest was shot on 70-mm and 35-mm film.
p3205
aVStubbornly old-school, Nolan refused to use digital video or 3D.
p3206
aVAnd he often chose bravura stunts over computer graphics\u2014from men dangling off a plane to 11,000 extras watching a football game as the field erupts with explosives.
p3207
aV\u201cAudiences are ruthless in their demand for freshness and novelty,\u201d says Nolan.
p3208
aV\u201cThey don\u2019t want to see the same thing again and again.
p3209
aVThey need to see it done in a different way and in a different place.
p3210
aVIt\u2019s a particular challenge with a sequel because you want familiar elements.\u201d\u000aAlong with Caine, they include Gary Oldman and Morgan Freeman who return as Wayne\u2019s two other father figures, Commissioner Gordon and his CEO Lucius Fox, respectively.
p3211
aV(\u201cHe\u2019s got a lot of fathers for an orphan,\u201d Nolan concedes.)
p3212
aVBut he has two new divas to play with: Hathaway\u2019s cat burglar Selina Kyle and philanthropist Miranda Tate (Marion Cotillard).
p3213
aVThe Dark Knight Rises picks up the story eight years after The Dark Knight.
p3214
aVHaving taken the fall for the death of district attorney Harvey Dent, Batman has vanished.
p3215
aVBruce Wayne, the tycoon behind the cowl, is now a bearded recluse who walks with a cane, holed up in Wayne Manor like a Gotham Howard Hughes.
p3216
aVWhen a ferocious new villain named Bane (Tom Hardy) lays siege to his financial empire, he hauls the batsuit out of storage.
p3217
aV(It\u2019s surprising how little screen time it gets\u2014first we wait for Batman\u2019s return, and later, while Wayne is imprisoned in a pit, we wait for him to rise again.)
p3218
aVScarred by a horrific injury (what comic-book villain isn\u2019t?
p3219
aV), Bane is masked by a contraption that pumps him with painkillers\u2014though its main effect is to turn his accented voice into an unearthly growl while channelling shades of Hannibal Lecter and Blue Velvet\u2019s Dennis Hopper.
p3220
aVBane\u2019s dialogue could benefit from subtitles, especially since he has to explain so much of the plot.
p3221
aVBatman\u2019s voice is distorted, too, so when they converse it\u2019s like listening to talking dogs.
p3222
aVNo matter: in the end, it all comes down to a fist fight.
p3223
aVThis time Batman is not just fighting crime, but saving his city from annihilation.
p3224
aVUnlike Heath Ledger\u2019s Joker, who picked off victims one by one for sheer sport, Bane is a terrorist on a doomsday mission, armed with a nuclear device stolen from Wayne Industries.
p3225
aV\u201cThat was an important part of giving this film the scale it needed,\u201d says Nolan.
p3226
aV\u201cWhen you\u2019re just stuck in Gotham, there\u2019s a danger things start to feel a bit village-y.\u201d\u000aBetween the spectre of epic terrorism and the allure of lethal women, there\u2019s more of a James Bond feel to this Batman opus than the others.
p3227
aV\u201cBut it\u2019s been there throughout,\u201d says Nolan.
p3228
aV\u201cWe\u2019ve been shamelessly plundering the Bond movies that I loved growing up.
p3229
aVIt would be more obvious if it had an English character at the head.
p3230
aVThis is a very American story.\u201d Even if this Brit director has stocked it with Brit actors\u2014Bale, Caine, Oldman and Hardy.
p3231
aV\u201cYou go for the right people for the job,\u201d he says, \u201cand they turn out to be English.\u201d\u000aThe pedigree of the cast imparts automatic gravitas.
p3232
aVAnd unlike so many comic-book movies, from Iron Man to The Avengers, Nolan\u2019s work is not a maze of jokey, postmodern asides.
p3233
aVThese are action movies freighted with dramatic and intellectual ambition.
p3234
aVHathaway\u2019s Catwoman may come on like a Bond girl, an agent of comic and erotic relief, but she has a subversive agenda.
p3235
aV\u201cThere\u2019s a storm coming,\u201d she tells Wayne.
p3236
aV\u201cYou and your friends better batten down the hatches, because when it hits, you\u2019re all gonna wonder how you ever thought you could live so large and leave so little to the rest of us.\u201d\u000aSound like Occupy Wall Street?
p3237
aVNolan did just that when he used 1,000 extras to film a pitched battle between cops and mercenaries in Manhattan.
p3238
aV\u201cWhen we went to Wall Street to film, the Occupy movement had grown up around it and there were ridiculous reports we had chosen it for that reason.
p3239
aVBut it took a year of planning, and the scene had been written two years before that.\u201d While 9/11 casts a long shadow over Gotham\u2019s scenes of terrorist destruction, the Occupy echoes are prescient.
p3240
aVNolan \u201chad no way of knowing,\u201d says Bale.
p3241
aVFilming just blocks from the protest, he recalls, \u201cI was looking at him\u2014how did you know?\u201d Gotham, explains Nolan, \u201cis a parallel world, and you wind up mirroring the concerns of the time.\u201d\u000aOne concern among those who care about cinema is that it\u2019s being overrun by comic-book franchises: the masked superhero has usurped the face of the movie star as Hollywood\u2019s most powerful icon.
p3242
aVWhich Nolan doesn\u2019t dispute.
p3243
aV\u201cWe\u2019re definitely well into a phase where our actors are not willing to brand themselves as movie stars the way actors of the past did,\u201d he says.
p3244
aV\u201cWhen you look at a guy like Christian, whether he\u2019s wearing a mask or not, this is one of our great actors.
p3245
aVBut he wants to be different in every film.
p3246
aVHe doesn\u2019t want the audience to go to a Christian Bale movie; he wants them to come see the character he\u2019s playing.
p3247
aVThat\u2019s true of most leading men working today.
p3248
aVThat wasn\u2019t true 20 years ago.\u201d\u000aNolan and Bale say they are both done with Batman\u2014although The Dark Knight Rises ends on a note that will allow another filmmaker to pick up the franchise where they left off.
p3249
aVBut Nolan, still a force behind Hollywood\u2019s superhero hegemony, is producing next year\u2019s Superman reboot, Man of Steel.
p3250
aVThe key to comic-book material, he insists, is to treat it as \u201ca source for movies of different types, not a genre\u2014if the comic-book movie is a genre, like the western, the audience will want something different.\u201d\u000aAs for his own directing future, \u201cI have no idea where I\u2019m going next,\u201d says Nolan.
p3251
aVDown the road, a Bond movie would not be out of the question.
p3252
aVAnd he doesn\u2019t even rule out 3D, if it\u2019s appropriate.
p3253
aV\u201cI\u2019m all about choice,\u201d he declares.
p3254
aV\u201cI don\u2019t like being told the way I should make a film.\u201d For one of the few filmmakers who can stand up to the studios, that may be the ultimate Hollywood superpower\u2014the ability to say no.
p3255
aVTwitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse Christian BaleChristopher NolanDark Knight RisesMichael Cainesuperheros Anne Hathaway \u000a\u000a\u000a
p3256
aV\u000aHas Christopher Nolan EVER made a bad movie?
p3257
aVThe answer continues to be \u201cno.\u201d\u000a\u201cThe Dark Knight Rises\u201d is a magnificent way to close out an exciting trilogy.
p3258
aVAfter eight years of self-imposed exile, the caped crusader (Christian Bale) deals with an urban terrorist called Bane (Tom Hardy.
p3259
aV)  Batman\u2019s alter ego, Bruce Wayne, hides away in Wayne Manor, but no longer.
p3260
aVHe emerges as well, after catching a young woman rifling his safe.
p3261
aVThe Catwoman\u2019s (Anne Hathaway) strange agenda is somehow connected to an overall master plot to bring Gotham City to its knees.
p3262
aVBane seems to have everything working to his advantage, but it\u2019s a grand mystery what he\u2019s up to.
p3263
aVThere are quite a few new characters in \u201cThe Dark Knight Rises,\u201d and that\u2019s the way Nolan likes it.
p3264
aVNolan\u2019s films are intelligent, complex and scream for repeat viewings.
p3265
aVWarner Brothers won\u2019t mind a bit.
p3266
aVJust look how the director\u2019s earlier films have fared at the box office.
p3267
aVI\u2019ve seen \u201cInception\u201d at least a dozen times and could watch it again tonight without thinking twice.
p3268
aVGetting back to \u201cThe Dark Knight Rises,\u201d that\u2019s about as much description as you will find in my review.
p3269
aVGetting into the story is half the fun and I don\u2019t want to rob you of that pleasure.
p3270
aVIt\u2019s a story that demands your full attention.
p3271
aVBesides the stellar screenplay and amazing cast, you just have to MARVEL at how Nolan interweaves his characters.
p3272
aVAnd, unlike the second film, I found the last 45 minutes of \u201cThe Dark Knight Rises\u201d to be the strongest act.
p3273
aVThe twists, the turns and the reveals are first-rate.
p3274
aVGet out there, Batfans!
p3275
aVSee it.
p3276
aVGrade: A\u000aFast Facts:\u000aRelease Date: July 20, 2012\u000aRuntime: 165 minutes\u000aRated: PG-13\u000aFormats: IMAX and D-Box available\u000aReleased by Warner Brothers\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3277
aVSomething is rotten in the city of Gotham.
p3278
aVAn uneasy peace, founded on a tenuous lie, has allowed business as usual to flourish.
p3279
aVAnd by business, we do mean business: big business, as in "protecting the interests of", cued up visually as the film opens with a dapper crowd being served canapés by waiting staff on an appreciably different rung of the ladder.
p3280
aVLater, Anne Hathaway's cat burglar Selena Kyle silkily promises: "You're all going to wonder how you ever thought you could live so large and leave so little for the rest of us."
p3281
aVHoly Marxist dialectic, Batman!
p3282
aVIs this seriously the first radically anti-capitalist movie to make millions of dollars worldwide?
p3283
aVOf course not.
p3284
aVWe're not supposed to be on the side of the bankers here, sure, but a plot that starts off with ideas around taking back power from the few and putting it in the hands of the many is hamstrung as political commentary by the fact that this redistribution functions simply as a villain's smokescreen in a genre that demands the villain be, well, villainous.
p3285
aVThe big bad's eventual motivations are murkier and more difficult to comprehend, and not just because Bane sounds like a drunk Furby.Much has been made of Bane's distorted speech; it isn't always easy to hear what he's saying (and that's obviously no accident - Nolan has cutting edge technology at his disposal; do we really think the sound mix was a Poundland job?).
p3286
aVThis communications breakdown is ironic given he is leading a coup based on the mass support of the common man-turned-criminal - he is truly a macabre people's terrorist.
p3287
aVMost rabble rousers rely on their ability to communicate simply and fluidly; perhaps Bane's appeal as a boss is that his followers are able to project what they want onto him, hear what they want to hear.
p3288
aVThey're certainly not there for the competitive health plan; he's hardly gentler with his employees than his enemies.The Dark Knight Rises is most interesting both at a great distance - the big ideas, the sweeping cityscapes, the operatic themes of family and vengeance - and also in extreme close-up.
p3289
aVSelena Kyle, Bruce Wayne, Commissioner Gordon (Gary Oldman) and John Blake (Jo Gordon-Levitt) are wonderful characters I would loved to have spent more time with, just hanging out, hearing them talk, watching them interact.
p3290
aVThe film is on stickier ground with the mid-range stuff: the minute-by-minute mechanics of the plot and the oddly not-quite-thrilling-enough action sequences (the best bits in the fight scenes are close-up character moments).
p3291
aVThere's also the nagging sense that we don't care too much about what's at stake.
p3292
aVIt doesn't feel like the filmmakers or audience are willing Batman on to save poor old Gotham - there's more tragic spectacle to be had in its destruction.
p3293
aVPerhaps the film's inherent nihilism erodes what ought to be this sense of huge jeopardy - a whole city in peril - replacing it with something a lot closer to Selina Kyle's express desire to watch Rome burn.
p3294
aVA film for our times, then.
p3295
aV\u000aYou have to take your big pointy hat off to director Peter Jackson (Brain Dead, Heavenly Creatures).
p3296
aVHis adaptation of fantasy's founding trilogy is unprecedentedly ambitious.
p3297
aVShooting all three epic films back to back was fraught with logistical nightmares (all those extras and special effects shots, a punishing 274-day shooting schedule) and commercially audacious, defying the will of original backers Miramax, who would have preferred a self-contained blockbuster.
p3298
aVHis The Fellowship Of The Ring opens with a brisk primer of Middle-earth history, loading the exposition up front.
p3299
aVRings were issued to the leaders of the various peoples of this fantasy land, yet one was created that could control them all - an evil Ring worn by the dark lord Sauron.
p3300
aVWar ensues, in another one of those epic CGI-enhanced battles.
p3301
aVThe immense Sauron decimates ranks of men with a single blow, only to have his ring finger severed by the leader of men, Isildur (Harry Sinclair).
p3302
aVThe world is saved.
p3303
aVTwo and a half thousand years later, the Ring has fallen into the hands of the hairy-footed hobbit Bilbo Baggins (Ian Holm), who lives in the Teletubbyland-meets-Home Counties idyll of The Shire.
p3304
aVBilbo is celebrating his hundred and eleventh birthday, yet he doesn't look a day over 50.
p3305
aVThe Ring may be evil, but it has preserved Baggins awfully well.
p3306
aVUnfortunately, it has also corrupted his soul, and amidst all the ale-and-pie birthday celebrations, Holm switches from friendly hobbit to beady-eyed avariciousness.
p3307
aVHis old friend and wizard Gandalf (Ian McKellen) makes him realise it is time he gave up the Ring to his nephew, Frodo, played with sweet wide-eyed pathos by Elijah Wood.
p3308
aVUnfortunately for Frodo, the evil Sauron has returned in the distant land of Mordor and he wants his Ring back.
p3309
aVDeathly black riders, Ring Wraiths, pursue him, chasing him out of his home, through the lands of Men and finally to the land of the Elves.
p3310
aVThere a fellowship is formed, including a Scottish dwarf (John Rhys-Davies), an Elfen archer (Orlando Bloom), and a descendent of Isildur (Viggo Mortensen) to guard Frodo as he quests to Sauron's forge, the only place on earth where the ring can be destroyed.
p3311
aVExpertly tunnelling its way through part one of Tolkien's baggy 1,000-page tome, this first film embraces its inherent darkness.
p3312
aVWith the film coming at the tale end of a particularly noxious year for the Hollywood blockbuster, Peter Jackson and studio New Line deserve plaudits for artistic integrity, avoiding opportunistic demographic engineering and above-the-title stars.
p3313
aVInstead, we have an excellent cast who give their characters a lived-in look, all bitten-down fingernails and back story, with Viggo Mortensen's Aragorn and Sean Bean's Boromir (another human member of the Fellowship) appearing particularly haunted.
p3314
aVBut it is McKellen's Gandalf that is the truly stand-out performance.
p3315
aVBased on Tolkien himself with a tincture of King Lear and a pinch of Prospero, the wizard conceals howling power behind the persona of a genial, weed-puffing college don.
p3316
aVAny problems with the film lie outside the purview of the production.
p3317
aVThere is a large swathe of the population who will never be able to take elves seriously.
p3318
aVThe film's intricately realised Middle-earth of hobbits, wizards, orcs, trolls, and goblins has been so heavily quoted over the years, in everything from prog rock to Dungeons And Dragons, that its spectaculars are rather familiar.
p3319
aVThen there are the difficulties with the fantasy genre itself - unlike science fiction, which has delusions of satire, sword and sorcery is all escapist power fantasy.
p3320
aVIt self-consciously inhabits a cultural vacuum, the source of its appeal to its fans, and the reason why so many instinctively revile it.\u000a
p3321
aV\u000a\u000aIt may be time to put the \u201cDie Hard\u201d series to rest.
p3322
aVOf course, the box office for \u201cA Good Day to Die Hard\u201d may tell a different story.
p3323
aVSuffice it to say that the fifth film in the series is the weakest of the bunch.
p3324
aVJohn McClane (Bruce Willis) travels to Russia to help his estranged son find his way out of prison.
p3325
aVWhen he arrives, it seems Jack (Jai Courtney) doesn\u2019t need any help.
p3326
aVAn explosion at a Moscow courthouse destroys the building, killing just about everyone except, of course, Jack and his fellow inmate, a Russian whistleblower and all around rich guy (Sebastian Koch).
p3327
aVThe two escape with Bruce Willis in tow.
p3328
aVThat\u2019s about as much of the plot that I reveal here.
p3329
aVWait a minute!
p3330
aVThat\u2019s almost the entire plot.
p3331
aVThe rest of the film is a series of chases and explosions.
p3332
aVSo many, in fact, it reminds me of a monster truck rally.
p3333
aVPeople go to them, but I honestly wonder why sometimes.
p3334
aVThe special effects were impressive, but unless you have a good story to go with it, they mean nothing.
p3335
aVThe story is dumbed down to the point that you question whether the writers even know whether Chernobyl (site of that massive nuclear disaster) is in Ukraine.
p3336
aV\u201cA Good Day to Die Hard\u201d has a heavily armed helicopter cruising over to Chernobyl without even being challenged by the Ukrainian military.
p3337
aVNot likely, since the two countries don\u2019t actually get along.
p3338
aVThis is just a big, dumb action flick written by people who don\u2019t seem to know even the most basic information about the former Soviet Union.
p3339
aVTo quote SCTV, \u201cMay the good lord take a likin\u2019 to you and blow you up real soon.\u201d  Grade: D\u000a\u000a \u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3340
aVRent this film now on Film4oD \u000aOr rent other films that stand the test of time from Film4oD\u000a \u000aStand By Me is fondly regarded as the coming-of-age adaptation of Stephen King's semi-autobiographical story, 'The Body'.
p3341
aVThe film opens as author Dreyfuss learns about the death of an old school friend.
p3342
aVThe news reminds him of a childhood adventure that turned out to be the pivotal moment in his life when, encouraged by the friend, he made the decision to become a writer.
p3343
aVChris (Phoenix), Teddy (Feldman), Vern (O'Connell), and the budding novelist, Gordie (played as a kid by Wheaton) set off on a weekend trek to find a dead body that's been spotted by Vern's brother.
p3344
aVReiner's film drips with nostalgia but is wholly evocative of childhood conversations and trembling fears, peer pressure, boyish affection and the ludicrous lengths to which children will go to prove themselves.
p3345
aVCredit must go to Reiner and King, but it's the kids themselves who lend the film so much charm.
p3346
aVPhoenix's performance as an introspective, abused child is a poignant reminder of a lost talent.
p3347
aV\u000aIf Mr Oscar is a hungry fish, the critical and marketing momentum behind The King's Speech would have us believe Tom Hooper's film is the juiciest of haute cuisine worms, wriggling enticingly at the end of a perfectly poised rod.
p3348
aVA dramatisation of the relationship between incurable stammerer George VI (Colin Firth) and self-styled "unorthodox and controversial" Aussie speech therapist Lionel Logue (Geoffrey Rush), the film is a postcard from simpler times - a from-a-true-story royal postcard, no less.
p3349
aVDespite pricey period production (think nostalgically picturesque London fog and Bovril ads painted on brick walls), ample stiff upper lip stereotypes for Anglophile US audiences to lap up and a moving dash of anachronistic psychologising, all the pomp and circumstance is kept in check by Logue's underdog charm.
p3350
aVNominations, at the very least, for Colin-"2011-has-to-be-his-year"-Firth, Rush and screenwriter David Seidler are as good as guaranteed.
p3351
aVBish bash bosh.
p3352
aVBatter those statuettes and wrap em up in fish and chip paper.
p3353
aVTo give the film its dues, the awards nods are as roundly deserved as they are predictable.
p3354
aVFirth is reliably outstanding as the taciturn monarch-in-waiting: younger brother to a rather odious, bullying playboy (a not entirely convincing Guy Pearce as Edward VIII), wife to the future Queen Mother (an iron-gloved, velvet-fisted Bonham Carter) and son to tyrannical patriarch George V (an intimidating Michael Gambon).
p3355
aVThe part of the emotionally repressed, hot-tempered but warm-hearted overshadowed sibling, son and diffident heir is a gift for Firth, and Firth a gift for the part.
p3356
aVEnter Rush as his foil, "a jumped-up jackeroo from the outback", who instantly raises hackles, insisting on calling George by his family nickname, 'Bertie', and insisting Bertie visit him at his ramshackle office ("my castle, my rules").
p3357
aVThe film unfolds as a snugly satisfying two-hander, and it's no surprise that Seidler's elegantly witty script was originally conceived for theatre.
p3358
aVWe are treated to montages of the odd couple performing comically absurd therapeutic exercises, Firth loosening his tongue with a tour de force in posh profanity, an eleventh hour tiff between patient and soon-to-be-crowned king and a stirring reconciliation on the eve of war.
p3359
aVAs Elizabeth concedes, having been instructed to bounce up and down on her husband's diaphragm, "This is actually quite good fun."
p3360
aVIt's just quite cosy fun.
p3361
aVIn a nutshell: If you don't go in believing the hype, you'll probably enjoy this more.
p3362
aVTop-drawer performances and a script spun from an intriguing episode in  the British blueblood annals, this is a solid, slick but undeniably  conventional crowd-pleaser.
p3363
aVBy Sophie Ivan\u000a
p3364
aVOne of Hollywood's greatest acts of alchemy saw a classic romantic thriller created from unprepossessing raw materials: a modest play with a questionable grasp of historical facts, a director with a poor command of English, and a confused cast that was due, at one stage, to be headed by Ronald Reagan and Ann Sheridan.
p3365
aVBut it was the film that cemented Bogart's stardom with a role perfectly suited to his new sympathetic tough-guy persona.
p3366
aVThough avowedly a cynic, Rick is seen consistently to be a soft-hearted romantic.
p3367
aVHaving had his heart broken some years earlier, he has set himself up as a bar-owner in Casablanca, a stop-off point for fugitives from the Nazis during the Second World War.
p3368
aVOne day his old love Ilsa (Bergman), married to an important figure in the resistance movement (Henreid), comes to his bar...  With its romantic story, the songs performed by Wilson, the supporting cast, fantastic script, the singing of 'La Marseillaise', the climactic sequence at the airport and its perfect final line, Casablanca has entered the popular consciousness, becoming utterly familiar while remaining fresh and vital.
p3369
aV\u000aIn Mercury Rising, Bruce Willis played an uptight FBI agent who befriends a disturbed and vulnerable little boy.
p3370
aVThere's a great improvement here as the normally macho Willis lends a weighty yet sympathetic air to his role as Crowe, a child psychologist personally suffering as the result of a traumatic incident in the home is shared with his wife (Olivia Williams).
p3371
aVHe arrives to help Cole Sear (Hayley Joel Osment), an emotionally fraught boy who has prior knowledge of death that frightens him and terrifies his despairing mother Lynn (Toni Collette).
p3372
aVWith his third feature after the little-known Praying With Anger (1992) and Wide Awake (1998) 29-year-old writer-director M Night Shyamalan had his breakthrough, finding a tone that was to see him through his subsequent films.
p3373
aVHe positions the thoroughly creepy horror elements within a convincingly dowdy, urban middle-class milieu so that this is not a genre flick but a mainstream drama which ended up with Oscar nominations (six, alongside a slew of other nods and awards).
p3374
aVThanks to Willis' generously supportive performance, well used locations and fine technical credits, The Sixth Sense was a hit, and the knowing but never artful performance by Osment was the cherry on the cake.
p3375
aVThe peripheral pleasures within this classy supernatural thriller will more than compensate on a second viewing for knowing the shock twist to the movie.\u000a
p3376
aVIn a Southern town a black city detective (Poitier) is picked up by bigoted rednecks as he waits at a railway station and learns the meaning of small-town racism.
p3377
aVThe local sheriff (Steiger) takes longer to learn humility and understanding.
p3378
aVThe investigation of the crime that the duo undertake is not the meat of the film, but the learning process is, as a lonely, boozy guy gropes towards some understanding of his colleague's identity.
p3379
aVThe cleverness of Silliphant's script is in combining the investigation of a murder with a message film.
p3380
aVTo the movie's credit, at the end the duo keep their distance.
p3381
aVNo false note is struck.
p3382
aVSteiger took the Oscar, but there's not a hair's breadth between the quality of the performances.
p3383
aV\u000aBarbara Stanwyck is ice-cold as Phyllis Dietrichson, the brassy blonde with the ankle bracelet who persuades insurance salesman Walter Neff (MacMurray) to murder her husband and claim on his insurance.
p3384
aVThe perfect crime until Neff realizes the extent of her duplicity and starts to doubt her motives.
p3385
aVWith ruthless claims investigator Keyes (Robinson) hot on his trail, Neff is a drowning man from the get-go.
p3386
aVDouble Indemnity uses the voice-over narration technique (in a similar way to Sunset Boulevard) to deliver a hard-boiled, retrospective description of events.
p3387
aVKasdan's 1981 homage Body Heat never came near to emulating Stanwyck's raw sensuality (was an ankle chain ever so sexy?)
p3388
aVand certainly couldn't come close to Seitz's moody camerawork, which perfectly captured both urban grit and the untamed sexuality of the duplicitous, femme fatale star.
p3389
aVIn a nutshell: Right up there with Billy Wilder's very best work.\u000a\u000a
p3390
aV\u000aWith Alien, Ridley Scott delivered more than just a memorable 'haunted house in space' campfire tale.
p3391
aVHe and screenwriter Dan O'Bannon used the monster as a Freudian symbol, launched a franchise that lasted for more than 20 years and set the unknown Sigourney Weaver en route to stardom.
p3392
aVThe crew of the mining vessel Nostromo investigate a distress signal from another ship - but realise too late that it's in fact a warning to stay away.
p3393
aVThey uncover a huge store of eggs discovered alongside the body of an unidentified alien.
p3394
aVFrom here, it's a rollercoaster ride of goo-spewing androids, chest-rupturing horror and monster cat-and-mouse, until only Ripley remains to battle the 'bitch' that has used the vessel as a nest for her vicious spawn.
p3395
aVSuperb performances add to Scott's stylish direction.
p3396
aVAnd if a film can be judged by the amount of rip-offs it generates, Alien must rank as one of the most influential movies ever. \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a \u000a
p3397
aV\u000a\u000aOn screen together for the first time:  Al Pacino, Christopher Walken and Alan Arkin star in \u201cStand Up Guys,\u201d an action comedy about three washed up gangsters on a last fling.
p3398
aVAll three legends bring the spice to a sub-par story.
p3399
aVBut, the total is not enough to keep this flick from stinking.
p3400
aVPacino is the just-released-from-prison Val.
p3401
aVThe guy who would rather do 28 years of hard time than give up his confederates.
p3402
aVNevertheless, a crime boss wants him dead and he\u2019s put the squeeze on Doc (Walken) to do the deed.
p3403
aVIn fact, Doc has only a few hours to complete the task or he\u2019ll also be toast.
p3404
aVVal and Doc have a couple of adventures including a randy introduction to an ED drug and some action at a local brothel.
p3405
aVOh, yes, we\u2019ve been here before.
p3406
aV\u201cStand Up Guys\u201d has nothing original to offer.
p3407
aVThe pace does pick up a bit when the duo decides to become a trio by rescuing their former getaway driver (Arkin) from a local rest home.
p3408
aVWhen all three actors are together, you can almost forgive the mediocre writing, because it then becomes about three fun actors playing onscreen versions of their past characters.
p3409
aVWe love Pacino, Walken and Arkin.
p3410
aVAnd, that makes \u201cStand Up Guys\u201d even harder to take.
p3411
aVGrade: C-\u000aFast Facts:\u000aStreet Date: May 21, 2013\u000aFormats:  Blu-ray and DVD\u000aRuntime: 95 minutes\u000aRated: R\u000aReleased by Lionsgate Home Entertainment\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3412
aVGleeson is Martin Cahill, the small-time crook terrorizing Dublin with his scams and thieving, Voight is the inspector who is out to get him but can't help admiring his cheek when dealing with the authorities.
p3413
aV\u000aBrowse our gallery of 50 Films To See Before You Die\u000a \u000aIn the lengthy gestation period during which Ken Kesey's modern classic was transposed from book to the big screen, Kirk Douglas was forced to abandon his dreams of producing and starring, handing over the former duties to son Michael, the latter to Nicholson.
p3414
aVThe resulting film was an artistic, commercial and critical triumph which swept the board at the Academy Awards - it was just the second movie (after It Happened One Night) to win the big five: Picture, Director, Actor, Actress and Adapted Screenplay.
p3415
aVNicholson, in the middle of a hot run, gives one of the great performances of the decade as McMurphy, a social misfit who finds himself locked up in an insane asylum.
p3416
aVThere he encourages his disparate fellow inmates (DeVito, Lloyd and Dourif among them) into acts of rebellion, joyous freedom and self-expression.
p3417
aVThe authorities, principally in the shape of Fletcher's formidable Nurse Ratched, react with increasing violence to McMurphy's dangerous ideas.
p3418
aVThe film remains as fresh, shocking, depressing and exhilarating as when it was released.
p3419
aVIts conspicuous success marked the high point of the counter-culture assault on Hollywood that had begun in the late 1960s with Easy Rider.
p3420
aVThe lunatics had, briefly at least, taken over the asylum.\u000a
p3421
aVHawks' masterful gangster picture is as startling now as when originally released.
p3422
aVPreceded by a disclaimer that there is any glorification of the underworld he depicts, and demanding action from the audience to change the society that breeds such men as Tony Camonte ('What are you going to do about it?
p3423
aV'), Hawks shows a desperate environment of rich pickings, easy women, casual violence and the 'rat-tat-tat' of the Gatling gun, and throws in a hint of incest for good measure.
p3424
aVMuni is astonishing: amoral, irredeemable and wretched; you can't take your eyes off him.
p3425
aV'The World Is Yours.'
p3426
aVBut why would you want it?
p3427
aV\u000aIf Oscars were given for most convincing on-screen couple, Annette Bening and Julianne Moore would be a shoe-in here as Nic and Jules, a married couple whose children, conceived via artificial insemination, decide in their late teens that they'd like to meet the man from whose seed they sprang.
p3428
aVBening and Moore nail the rhythms, intonations and body language of long-term lovers, comfortable with each other and far from jaded but also, naturally, no longer in the first flush of romance.
p3429
aVSailing into their cosy marriage, Mark Ruffalo as the biological dad is charming without being too sleazy, and his aura of irresponsibility is finely judged; he's never an annoying manchild, but equally it's easy to see why his grubby-fingernailed laissez faire style has the effect it does on this picture-perfect family.
p3430
aVThe kids themselves are, as promised, all right, with Mia Wasikowska more effective than she was allowed to be in the woeful 2010 Alice In Wonderland, but Josh Hutcherson slightly in danger of being upstaged by his foul-mouthed toxic best friend (Eddie Hassell).
p3431
aVThe Kids Are All Right is mostly quite cosy, comfortable stuff, with the studio responsible, Focus Features, close to becoming an American version of the UK's own Working Title, home of Notting Hill and Bridget Jones's Diary.
p3432
aVThe Kids Are All Right is not quite as broad as those films, but don't let the right-on characters fool you: this is a traditional comedy about the tensions between generations and within marriages, and is finally even rather conservative in its resolution.\u000a \u000a \u000a
p3433
aVBuilding on Steven Speilberg's reputation as all-round family entertainer, and Harrison Ford's post-Star Warsaction-hero credibility, Raiders Of The Lost Ark retreads the Saturday matinee cliff-hanger serials of the 1930s and 1940s for more cynical times, making for a hugely enjoyable romp.
p3434
aVUnsuprisingly, that other titan of popcorn cinema, George Lucas, was also in the mix - he developed the script and executive produced.
p3435
aVThe director does little to update his source material.
p3436
aVThe plot is pretty standard get-the-girl-and-kill-the-baddies stuff: the race between rugged archaeologist Indie (Ford) and, intriguingly, pre-World War II ambassadors for Hitler to claim the Ark of the Covenant, believed to hold the Ten Commandments.
p3437
aVBut he adds a contemporary sense of humour that leaves you breathless at its invention, and setpieces that have an audacity that has be seen to be believed.
p3438
aVThe picture that effectively introduced the world to Audrey Hepburn, this is feelgood fare of the first order driven by good old-fashioned star power.
p3439
aVHepburn is the poised but pampered princess on holiday in Rome.
p3440
aVWeary of her official duties, she bunks off and ends up in the arms of fast-talking newspaperman Joe Bradley (Peck).
p3441
aVHepburn's performance still looks brilliantly fresh and she gets surprising comic mileage out of her girlish innocent abroad act.
p3442
aVAs the affair gathers momentum, an initially prickly Peck puts professional considerations aside and allows himself to be won over by her relentlessly cute allure.
p3443
aVTheir romance is played out against the sights and sounds of a beautifully shot Rome, and in one of the many memorable moments the couple visit the Mouth of Truth, where an ad-libbing Peck pretends to have his hand bitten off.
p3444
aVThe focus rarely moves away from the stars, but Eddie Albert proves a great comic foil as a highly strung bohemian photographer. 
p3445
aV\u000a\u000aYou may have seen \u201cThe Wizard of Oz 3D\u201d in the IMAX format recently.
p3446
aVNow, the Blu-ray 3D version is here.
p3447
aVThe classic MGM musical from 1939 has been lovingly restored and up-converted to 3D.
p3448
aVIt was quite impressive on the big screen.
p3449
aVAnd, now you can choose from a regular Blu-ray or a 3D Blu-ray version for your home theater entertainment system\u2026.be it big or small.
p3450
aVThe special features are impressive and include interviews with the actors who played the Munchkins, including the late Margaret Pelligrini.
p3451
aVIf you want an even better glimpse into what Warner Home Video is offering, visit The-Wizard-of-Oz-dot com.
p3452
aVIt\u2019s a very impressive website.
p3453
aVAnd, well, it should be.
p3454
aV\u201cThe Wizard of Oz\u201d is one of the best family films of all time.
p3455
aVIf you would like to hear an audio version of my report with film clips\u2026just click on the audio link below.
p3456
aVShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3457
aVSiegel always denied that his adaptation of Jack Finney's classic science-fiction chiller was intended as an attack on McCarthyism, although film buffs have always chosen to interpret it as such.
p3458
aVIndeed, the film could just as easily be seen as right-wing propaganda, a cautionary tale about the advancing Red menace.
p3459
aVWhatever the case, it is one of the most brilliantly paranoid of all movies, with the upstanding Dr Miles Binnell (McCarthy) in a small Californian town slowly realizing that the population is being replaced by soulless alien replicas born out of ghastly giant vegetable pods.
p3460
aVIt's a tribute to the film's alarming impact that the studio decided to append a bogus happy ending, rather than leave it with McCarthy wandering aimlessly across the freeway screaming "You're next!"
p3461
aVto the oblivious motorists.
p3462
aVRent Inception now on Film4oD\u000a \u000aThe Lord Of The Rings ushered elves and orcs into the cinematic mainstream, The Matrix made computer hackers cool and Twilight somehow made fancying werewolves an acceptable cultural norm.
p3463
aVWitness the power of film.
p3464
aVNow, with Inception, director Christopher Nolan rehabilitates that old daytime TV soap cliche: "...and I woke up and it was all a dream."
p3465
aVNo longer a shoddy excuse to wrap up a narrative that's going nowhere, in Nolan's capable hands a dream is a place where real danger, real drama and some of the most elegantly sculpted, visually stimulating landscapes you'll see all year unfold for your viewing pleasure.
p3466
aVAnd there's only one scene where it all looks a bit like a Sony Bravia advert.
p3467
aVImpressive.
p3468
aVMost impressive.
p3469
aVLeonardo DiCaprio plays Cobb, a conflicted thief heading up a team whose aim is to pull off a heist in reverse, inside a man's mind.
p3470
aVThis is a film that benefits from not knowing too much about the set-up before you see it, so let's simply say that while Cobb's normal scam is to extract ideas from his subject's subconscious, here his challenge is to plant an idea.
p3471
aVThis process is known as inception.
p3472
aVHe's confident it can be done, but the subconscious is a dangerous place, and like all the best heist movies, he'll need assistance from a crack team boasting various skills.Like Nolan's The Dark Knight, there is no weak link in the cast.
p3473
aVIt's one of DiCaprio's best performances, but this ensemble thriller is never unbalanced by the A-list star power of its lead.
p3474
aVJoseph Gordon-Levitt is wry and likeable as Cobb's right hand man, Arthur, exchanging understated banter with Tom Hardy (Bronson), who is entirely suited to playing a charmingly dissolute English forger.
p3475
aVCillian Murphy, who often seems ill at ease in Everyman roles, is perfect as an elite Murdoch-in-waiting rich boy.
p3476
aVEllen Page draws the short straw as Ariadne, the character frequently called upon to ask questions eliciting explanations for the benefit of the audience, or to provide exposition on her own terms.
p3477
aVAt least she gets an extremely knowing name.
p3478
aVIt's Marion Cotillard who provides the creepy heart of the film, the skewed emotional touchstone.
p3479
aVTo say why would spoil things, but she provides a revelatory riposte to those who have found Nolan's work to date too cold and artful.
p3480
aVThis character brushes aside the entrancing distractions of Inception's industrial origami landscapes and slices to the heart of a timelessly tragic imperative - the need to let go of love for the sake of remaining true to what made it meaningful.
p3481
aVI saw Inception twice, the second time on an IMAX screen where the haunting Hans Zimmer score and sheer scale of the film made a huge impact, and, like a recurring dream, it felt more uncanny on a second viewing.
p3482
aVBut the love story, embedded deep in the root of what makes the film work, doesn't need any bells and whistles to ring true.
p3483
aVInception is not especially original in its sources: this is all about the execution.
p3484
aVThis is Nightmare On Elm Street minus the bogeyman, The Matrix stripped of the naff cod-philosophy, with a helping of Blade Runner's existential uncertainty played out in a landscape designed in a partnership between MC Escher and Stanley Kubrick.
p3485
aVLike the best dreams, Inception has more resonance than a simple breakdown of reference points can hope to convey.
p3486
aV\u000aSince it first appeared on our screens in 2005, not much has changed in Sin City.
p3487
aVHow could it?
p3488
aVBasin City is, after all, a locus of the imagination, built on pure genre, a place familiar from every hard-boiled novel you have ever read or film noir you have ever seen - although it has been most directly inspired by a series of homonymous graphic novels by Frank Miller, who here serves as screenwriter and co-director (with Robert Rodriguez).
p3489
aVIn this town, seemingly every man is corrupt or a killer, and every femme is fatale or a whore, and as several episodes are woven around both each other and the three that featured in the first film, you might well become as forgetful of the relative chronology as Marv (Mickey Rourke), the tank-like bruiser whom we first meet flying through the air and struggling to remember how he got in this predicament.
p3490
aVHe was in the first film too - indeed, he met his end in it - as were several other characters, although not all have the same faces or are played by the same actors, and at least one (Bruce Willis' Hartigan) is now a mere ghost, haunting the troubled psyche of stripper Nancy (Jessica Alba).
p3491
aVThere are also some newly introduced characters: Johnny (Joseph Gordon-Levitt), the gambler on a roll who is about to be taught by Senator Roark (Powers Boothe) that power trumps luck; and Ava Lord (Eva Green), the apotheosis of cruel seduction whose forward sexuality and frequent nudity the filmmakers are banking (no doubt correctly) will prove as irresistible a siren call to many viewers as to her former lover Dwight (here played by Josh Brolin, in a prequel to the story from the first film where he was played by Clive Owen).
p3492
aVThe addition of 3D to the Brechtian spareness of the first film's backgrounds, to the mannered monochrome occasionally splashed with colour, to the cartoonishness of the violence, and to the archetypal nature of the scenarios and their players, highlights all the more the overt artifice of a world constructed from potboiler literature and B cinema.
p3493
aVFor this is a multi-dimensional necropolis, full of flat yet larger-than-life folk who collide with each other at oblique angles like the comic book figures drawn on turning, flickering pages.
p3494
aVThe only pity is that the film comes rather frontloaded, with its most explosive material at the beginning, and no real sense of a climactic ending to give these episodes shape or meaning.
p3495
aVStill, there are probably eight million stories in Sin City, and this has been just four of them.\u000a
p3496
aV\u000a(from left) Michael Fassbender, Lupita Nyong\u2019o and Chiwetel Ejiofor in '12 Years a Slave'\u000aHalloween is almost a week away, but the horror is already upon us.
p3497
aVOf the weekend\u2019s four new releases reviewed here, only one qualifies as a horror movie\u2014Carrie.
p3498
aVBut there\u2019s more genuine horror in both 12 Years a Slave and A Touch of Sin than in Kimberly Pearce\u2019s post-feminist remake of Brian De Palma\u2019s classic.
p3499
aVSteve\u2019s McQueen saga of 19-century bondage and Jia Zhangke\u2019s contemporary epic of vengeance in a corrupt China are  powerful pictures that confound us with jarring images of human brutality amid natural beauty.
p3500
aVBoth will likely find a place on my year-end top 10.
p3501
aVAs for The Fifth Estate, a thriller about unchained data, the horror is only of the psychological kind.
p3502
aVBut as played by Benedict Cumberbatch, protagonist Julian Assange could give Hannibal Lecter lessons in sangfroid.
p3503
aV12 Years A Slave\u000aOf the four films, 12 Years A Slave is by far the most harrowing, and momentous.
p3504
aVThere are still more films to come in 2013, but from where we stand now, it\u2019s shaping up to be the movie of the year.
p3505
aVI haven\u2019t seen it since TIFF, but its images have not left me.
p3506
aVHere\u2019s an expanded version of what I wrote about it at the time:\u000aEven though it\u2019s based on a true story that happened before the American Civil War, 12 Years A Slave waylays us with a sense of tremendous urgency.
p3507
aVI say \u201cus,\u201d not just \u201cme,\u201d because I walked out of the theatre with that weight of collective sorrow you get from a good funeral.
p3508
aVLeaving the cinema in a hushed congregation.
p3509
aVAfraid to break the silence.
p3510
aVLost for words.
p3511
aVFeeling that nothing I could say or write could begin to address the injustice, horror and degraded nobility that the movie so eloquently portrays.
p3512
aVBut I was left with contradictory responses.
p3513
aVYou wonder how a movie so hard to watch can be so ripe with beauty: the narrative is gilded with lush Southern landscapes that serve as a silent witness to the cruelty.
p3514
aVYou are amazed that the movie exists, such an opulent vision of atrocity, yet appalled that its story has taken so long to reach the screen.
p3515
aVNot just this specific story, but the story of American slavery.
p3516
aVLurking in the background of so many Hollywood movies, it never been so fully represented until now.
p3517
aV12 Years A Slave is based on the memoir of Solomon Northup, a free black man in the North, and a skilled carpenter and fiddler, who was lured to Washington, D.C. by a pair of circus promoters in 1841, then kidnapped and sold into slavery in New Orleans.
p3518
aVAfter the cartoonish pulp of Quentin Tarantino\u2019s exhilarating revenge fantasy, Django Unchained, Steve McQueen\u2019s epic is sobering, to say the least.
p3519
aVPlayed with simmering yet titanic force by Chiwetel Ejiofor, Northup is no Django-like action hero.
p3520
aVHe is a literate, sophisticated man who struggles to defend his dignity as it is assaulted, diminished and ground into the dirt.
p3521
aVMcQueen has marshaled a strong cast.
p3522
aVBenedict Cumberbatch has a smallish role as the plantation boss who first purchases him at auction.
p3523
aVAlthough he has no compunction about separating a slave woman from her children, this patriarch\u2014who goes so far as to give Northup a violin\u2014is a relatively gentle man compared to his next owner, an alcoholic sadist named Epps (Michael Fassbender) who runs a cotton plantation.
p3524
aVYet Fassbender makes this monster utterly credible.
p3525
aVAs with Hunger and Shame,  McQueen doesn\u2019t pull any punches.
p3526
aVThere are scenes of unmitigated brutality, both a lynching and a flogging.
p3527
aVYet despite the extremity of the drama, McQueen has not crafted a black-and-white morality tale of good vs. evil.
p3528
aVIt\u2019s not relieved by the typical \u201ctriumph of the human spirit\u201d that passes for catharsis in Hollywood.
p3529
aVIt\u2019s too troubled and complex for that, as McQueen delves into the layers of compromise and guilt slaves endured in their struggle to survive.
p3530
aVNorthup isn\u2019t just a victim.
p3531
aVHe suffers the more nuanced indignity of collaboration, as he lives by his wits, using his education, while being careful not reveal too much of it.
p3532
aVThe heart of the narrative revolves around a young female slave named Patsey, the plantation\u2019s most productive cotton-picker, who becomes the target of Epps\u2019 sexual lust.
p3533
aVLupita Nyong\u2019o\u2014a Mexican-born, Kenyan-raised graduate of Yale\u2019s film school\u2014makes her screen acting debut in this role, and her performance is a revelation.
p3534
aVThe movie\u2019s most wrenching scene is one in which she is whipped for what feels like an eternity.
p3535
aVMcQueen shoots it in a single unbroken shot, not allowing the camera, or the audience, to look away.
p3536
aVProducer Brad Pitt made the movie happen, and gave himself a modest role as the story\u2019s white knight, a Canadian carpenter who eventually comes to Northup\u2019s rescue.
p3537
aVBut freedom comes as more of a sad denouement than a salvation.
p3538
aVThe tragedy cannot be undone.
p3539
aVThis is not a Brad Pitt movie, a tale of a white guy saving a slave; he\u2019s just the story\u2019s concierge.
p3540
aVThe film belongs to Chiwetel and the remarkable ensemble that surrounds him.
p3541
aVWith McQueen, they\u2019ve created a landmark picture of devastating power.
p3542
aVCarrie\u000aChloe Moretz in 'Carrie'\u000aWhy remake Carrie?
p3543
aVGood question, given that the original movie was so potent, and that Sissy Spacek\u2019s iconic performance as Carrie was so definitive.
p3544
aVThe 1976 movie that Brian De Palma adapted from Stephen King\u2019s novel has become a landmark of sorts.
p3545
aVIt\u2019s the original Mean Girls, a cautionary tale about high-school bullying with catastrophic consequences, made decades before social-media shaming pushed the issue to the fore.
p3546
aVBut if you are going to update Carrie, Kimberly Peirce, who made the Oscar-winning Boys Don\u2019t Cry (1999), that seminal movie about persecuted sexuality, would seem an interesting choice of director.
p3547
aVYou would expect this feminist filmmaker to take a radically different approach from De Palma, who opened his movie with voyeur\u2019s paradise of frontal nudity in the girls\u2019 shower room.
p3548
aVBut Peirce\u2019s 2.0 upgrade is not as different as you\u2019d expect.
p3549
aVIt\u2019s a very literal remake of the De Palma movie with some revisionist touches.
p3550
aVFirst the differences.
p3551
aVFor those who don\u2019t want to wait all the way to the end for a blast of horror, Pearce kicks things off with a grisly childbirth scene, in which Carrie\u2019s screaming mother gives birth to her alone, and is torn between embracing this spawn of Satan or killing her with a pair of scissors.
p3552
aVThen fast-forward to high school, and things start took look more familiar\u2014though Peirce, predictably,  eliminates even a soupcon of nudity in the shower sequence.
p3553
aVShe goes through the motions of making a post-feminist, post-Internet Carrie, set in the Facebook world of contemporary youth.
p3554
aVThe director dutifully incorporates the issue of cyber-bulling\u2014in the shower scene, after Carrie reacts to her first period with bewildered screams, a cellphone camera captures her humiliation as the girl mob pelts as her with tampons.
p3555
aVThe video will go viral.
p3556
aVChloe Moretz, who cut her baby teeth as the action star of Kick-Ass, may seem an apt choice for the lead.
p3557
aVYet she faces an impossible task.
p3558
aVNo one could top Spacek\u2019s visceral yet ethereal performance, which still seems utterly real almost four decades later.
p3559
aV(I re-screened De Palma\u2019s film again this week.)
p3560
aVAnd the Moretz version of the character is cut from different cloth.
p3561
aVSpacek was a fragile, damaged creature who could see her own weirdness in the mirror.
p3562
aVShe channelled her telekinetic power as a terrifying force beyond her control, even in the end.
p3563
aVMoretz is self-possessed right from the start.
p3564
aVShe gets a kick out of her powers and works to master them, like a nascent comic-book superhero, doing levitation exercises on the furniture and orchestrating flying objects with her hands.
p3565
aVIn one of the key changes from the original script, she turns her powers on Mom before heading off to the prom and locks her in the closet.
p3566
aVShe doesn\u2019t just dodge Mom\u2019s mad Christian rants; she corrects her: \u201cI didn\u2019t sin.
p3567
aVYou sinned!\u201d And in the final act, this heroic, hyper-conscious Carrie takes her vengeance much further than in the original.
p3568
aVIt\u2019s more protracted and diabolical.
p3569
aVPlus, she\u2019s armed with an arsenal of digital special effects\u2014 Kick-Ass Carrie has powers that film technology could not dream of in 1976.
p3570
aVCast as her mother, Julianne Moore takes an even more marked departure from her original character, who was over-played by Piper Laurie.
p3571
aVThough she got an Oscar nomination for her over-acting, Laurie\u2019s performance doesn\u2019t hold up\u2014her unmitigated hysteria flies way over the top, as if she\u2019s failing an audition for a Tennessee Williams play.
p3572
aVMoore seems to have over-compensated, keeping the character on a low, psychotic simmer.
p3573
aVShe\u2019s a repressed knot of self-hatred.
p3574
aVShe\u2019s also acquired a habit of abusing herself by cutting and scratching her skin\u2014some clinical mortification of the flesh.
p3575
aVTo that extent, she is less of a villain, more a victim of her own self-hatred in Peirce\u2019s feminist-lite paradigm.
p3576
aVIncidentally, the filmmakers have also upped the ante of high-school sexuality, adding a dash of teenage sex (as normal dating activity) and a pregnancy.
p3577
aVBut aside from all those tweaks, the new Carrie has been very closely cloned from the old one.
p3578
aVEntire scenes, shots and lines of dialogue are recycled from the original.
p3579
aVAnd the structure remains completely intact.
p3580
aVIt\u2019s as if Peirce and her screenwriters (Lawrence D. Cohen and Roberto Aquirre-Sacasa) wanted to rehabilitate a classic and perform some cosmetic surgery, but were scared to mess with the bones of a story that worked so well in the first place.
p3581
aVBut by taking a safe, piecemeal approach\u2014and treating the original a sacred text rather than completely reinventing it\u2014the result at times seems weirdly anachronistic.
p3582
aVAlthough fundamentalist Christianity is alive and well in America, it\u2019s much less likely these days that a schoolgirl of Carrie\u2019s age would be ignorant of menstruation.
p3583
aVAnd although bullying is a serious problem in contemporary schools, it\u2019s also a hot-button issue.
p3584
aVThere\u2019s no apparent awareness of bullying among the characters, who seem stuck in a time warp.
p3585
aVWhich brings us back to the question, why remake the movie at all?
p3586
aVThere\u2019s a commercial rationale, of course.
p3587
aVIt\u2019s a property that can be re-packaged and resold for a young audience that hasn\u2019t seen the original.
p3588
aVThe problem is, Carrie has penetrated pop culture so deeply that even kids who haven\u2019t seen the 1976 movie are aware of it.
p3589
aVHow can can you shock people when it\u2019s impossible to spoil the ending: the blood-soaked girl in a prom dress is one of those images that\u2019s been permanently carved into the Halloween canon.
p3590
aVEven Carrie\u2019s pig\u2019s-blood humiliation does not so tragic, because we are just waiting for her to unleash her superpowers.
p3591
aVA Touch of Sin\u000aA Touch of Sin\u000aAgainst panoramic vistas, China\u2019s Jia Zhangke directs a suite of four stories splattered with vigilante gun violence, not all of it reprehensible.
p3592
aVA kind of Chinese Pulp Fiction with a political pulse, it adds up to a powerful portrait of desperate individuals driven to extremes by official corruption and runaway commercial development.
p3593
aVThey range from a mine worker (Jiang Wu) who picks up a shotgun to get even with a super-rich boss, to a sauna attendant (Jia\u2019s wife and longtime leading lady Zhao Tao) who wreaks bloody vengeance against a sexual predator.
p3594
aVAs a contemporary revision of the W?xiá genre, these ultra-violent tales of explosive retribution are set against gorgeous landscapes in various far-flung corners of China.
p3595
aVWhat\u2019s remarkable is that Jia partly based his stories on sensational real-life crimes that were well-known from the country\u2019s newspapers.
p3596
aVThey add up such a massive critique of China\u2019s new Cultural Revolution\u2014the decadence of unbridled state capitalism\u2014that it\u2019s surprising government censors have allowed the film to reach the screen.
p3597
aVFor my interview with the director, conducted during TIFF, go to: Jia Zhangke on violent redemption, censorship and Ai Wei Wei.
p3598
aVThe Fifth Estate\u000a(from left) Benedict Cumberbatch, Carice van Houten, Daniel Brühl, Moritz Bleibtreu in 'The Fifth Estate'\u000aThis breathless thriller that treats the speed of data as a matter of life and death.
p3599
aVDirected by Oscar-winning filmmaker Bill Condon (Kinsey, Dreamgirls), this propulsive drama does for Julian Assange what The Social Network did for Facebook mogul Mark Zuckerberg.
p3600
aVIt portrays him as a visionary who is pathologically insensitive, a genius with a cruel wit whose single-minded ambition leads him to betray his partners and his sources.
p3601
aVBut unlike Zuckerberg, who seems to have no higher goal in life that personal power, Assange comes across as a genuine revolutionary with a mission that unfolds like a sub-atomic particle accelerator.
p3602
aVHe\u2019s a cyber-hybrid of hero and villain.
p3603
aVLike his long-suffering accomplice, Daniel Domscheit-Berg (Daniel Brühl), we can\u2019t help but get caught up in his vortex, especially when the actor is Benedict Cumberbatch, who so on fire these days you wonder if he\u2019s human.
p3604
aVLike the character, the film\u2019s narrative arc of ambition and betrayal is a construct that may be too conveniently symmetrical.
p3605
aVCritics intimate with WikiLeaks claim that it is grossly one-sided, as it\u2019s based on Domscheit-Berg\u2019s book.
p3606
aVBut the issues raised by the film are compelling\u2014especially in the frenzied WikiLeaks negotiations with the mainstream press, which is personified by a Guardian editor played by the always-sharp David Thewlis.
p3607
aV(There is, of course, nothing new about creating suspense from the largely silent and uneventful business of delivering news to a deadline\u2014the newsroom has been as exciting as the O.K.
p3608
aVCorral for as long as Hollywood has been romancing journalism.)
p3609
aVAnd to its credit, the film playfully cops to its own lack of impartiality.
p3610
aVIn an amusing post-modern coda, Assange speaks directly to the camera, questioning and ridiculing the very notion of a WikiLeaks movie.
p3611
aVFor more on The Fifth Estate, check out my recent interview with director Bill Condon.
p3612
aVTwitter            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Facebook            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Google+ Share            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                LinkedIn            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Reddit            \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                Email            \u000a\u000a \u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a                                googletag.pubads().definePassback('/1016727/MME_ROS_TextAd_Bottom',[660, 30]).display();\u000a                                \u000a\u000aBrowse 12 Years A SlaveA Touch of SinBenedict CumberbatchCarrieThe Fifth Estate \u000a\u000a\u000a
p3613
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aDespite reports to the contrary, Steve McQueen\u2019s Oscar-bait drama is not the greatest film ever made.
p3614
aVIt may well be the greatest film ever made about slavery, but that says more about the movie world than the work itself.
p3615
aVPlaying real-life free man Solomon Northup, who was kidnapped and sold into slavery in 1840\u2032s Louisiana, Chiwetel Ejiofor gives a typically strong performance.
p3616
aVAs do his starry co-stars \u2013 producer/saviour Brad Pitt, slave trader Paul Giamatti, progressive plantation owner Benedict Cumberbatch, and Solomon\u2019s main tormentor, psychotic owner Michael Fassbender \u2013 who inhabit a picaresque purgatory of almost Dickensian grotesquery.
p3617
aVLike Tarantino before him, McQueen pulls no punches in the depiction and infliction of violence.
p3618
aVQuite the opposite.
p3619
aVSolomon is beaten until the whip breaks, Eliza (Adepero Oduye) wails as her children sold off.
p3620
aVMeanwhile, the scene where poor Patsey (the excellent Lupita Nyong\u2019o) is whipped almost to death by a drunk, ranting Fassbender is so horrifying it eclipses the other 130 minutes.
p3621
aVIt\u2019s an unflinching film, and extremely well made, but it\u2019s also a limited one: overlong, schematic, a touch distant.
p3622
aVSometimes it seems McQueen is only comfortable showing the nadir of human behaviour, something borne out in both Shame and Hunger.
p3623
aVAnd no matter what Solomon endures, he\u2019s never more than a noble cypher, a figure lost in the landscape.
p3624
aVThe ultimate irony is that, even with an incredible true story, a once-in-a-lifetime cast and much technical expertise at his disposal, McQueen still can\u2019t manage to make Solomon a person.
p3625
aVSurely we\u2019ve come further than that?
p3626
aV\u201912 Years a Slave\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p3627
aVA modern thriller masterpiece that established intellectual murderer Dr Hannibal Lecter in the canon of cinematic monsters, as much for his manifest intelligence as for his violent and cannibalistic tendencies.
p3628
aVWhen a serial killer (dubbed 'Buffalo Bill') is on the loose, an FBI profiler approaches the imprisoned serial killer Lecter (Hopkins) for psychological advice on the murderer.
p3629
aVLecter refuses to work with anyone other than rookie agent Clarice Starling (Foster), offering her titbits of information in return for her life story.
p3630
aVHer FBI boss, Jack Crawford (Glenn), warns her "Believe me, you don't want Hannibal Lecter inside your head," but that's where he's heading.
p3631
aVThe famous exchange that leads to her childhood memory that gives the film its title begins with him coercing painful reminiscences out of her.
p3632
aV"After your father's murder, you were orphaned.
p3633
aVYou were ten years old.
p3634
aVYou went to live with cousins on a sheep and horse ranch in Montana.
p3635
aVAnd...?"
p3636
aVA devious complex character, there's more to Lecter's agenda, however, than messing with Clarice's head.
p3637
aVThere's the small matter of his relationship with Buffalo Bill, and his plans for escape - which, of course, include him indulging his cannibalism.
p3638
aVAlthough some claim that the previous portrayal of Lecter (then spelt Lecktor) by Cox in Manhunter is superior, Hopkins makes the role his own.
p3639
aVWith flashes of urbanity, wit and fierce intelligence he creates an unforgettable grotesque.
p3640
aVAgainst him, Foster is the embodiment of pluck, desperately fighting to understand Lecter's gnomic utterances and capture Buffalo Bill.
p3641
aVMurray has too rarely appeared in films worthy of his talent.
p3642
aVHere his old sparring partner Ramis, as director and co-writer, gives him a part tailored for his ultra-cynical persona.
p3643
aVIt is a classic tale of redemption, wrapped up in a brilliantly simple narrative idea.
p3644
aVMurray is jaded weather man Phil Connors who is yet again forced to report from the annual Groundhog Day festivities in Punxsatawney.
p3645
aVOnce there he finds himself reliving, seemingly ad infinitum, the same drab February 2nd.
p3646
aVIt is never explained why this Sisyphean punishment is inflicted on Connors, but it slowly dawns on him that he is being given not merely a second chance, but countless second chances.As well as a perfect star vehicle, the film is a brilliant analysis of the implications of the film's simple conceit.
p3647
aVRamis and Rubin explore all the comic possibilities and also many of the serious ones, while skilfully avoiding mawkishness.
p3648
aVHaving given up thoughts of suicide after several successful attempts, Connors becomes a skilled criminal, an expert ice-sculptor, a serial womanizer, a gourmand, a linguist, an accomplished pianist, a great doer of good deeds, a successful romantic and, like George Bailey in the not dissimilar It's A Wonderful Life, the richest, most popular man in town.
p3649
aV\u000aYou can imagine The Lone Ranger's inception meeting at Disney.
p3650
aV"I want to make a blockbuster based on a pop-culture phenomenon from the 1930s," comes the pitch.
p3651
aV"It's a Western\u2026 for kids!"
p3652
aVAbsolute silence.
p3653
aV"I'll need a budget of around $250 million, and it's going to be two and a half hours long."
p3654
aVConcerned faces all round.
p3655
aVSome papers are shuffled.
p3656
aVThere is some giggling at the back.
p3657
aV"Oh, and did I mention I'm Gore Verbinski, director of the unfathomably successful Pirates Of The Caribbean franchise?"
p3658
aVA beat.
p3659
aV"Where do you want your truck full of money parked, sir?"
p3660
aVcomes the studio's reply.
p3661
aVTonally uneven and with a running time likely to leave little ones saddle sore, it's not difficult to see why audiences in the US left this Ranger well alone.
p3662
aVIn truth, The Lone Ranger is far from the disaster some critics have pegged it as: it's admirable in scale, features two charismatic leads in Depp and Armie Hammer, and climaxes with a joyous train heist sequence set to the rollicking sounds of Hans Zimmer's take on the William Tell Overture.
p3663
aVThe problem is you have to sit through two hours of dry, barren blockbuster to get your reward.
p3664
aVBy now, Depp can pull off quirky characters like this in his sleep, but Pirates scribes Ted Elliot and Terry Rossio give Tonto the bulk of the back-story, if not the emotional range to make it matter.
p3665
aVHammer is far more lively as Reid, giving what could have been a bland leading role some much needed comedic edge.
p3666
aVFrequently the pair detour to shoehorn in an unnecessary set-piece; Helena Bonham Carter's brothel madam is surplus to requirements, and her shtick \u2013 a gun hidden in a prosthetic leg \u2013 is no substitute for character.
p3667
aVLike the Pirates sequels, The Lone Ranger is a movie in desperate need of tightening up \u2013 at a lean two hours it would feel like less of a slog.
p3668
aVStick with it, through the countless flashbacks and framing devices and needless side-quests, and The Lone Ranger eventually endears due to its refusal to pander to the pocket-money crowd.
p3669
aVIt is unmistakeably a Western at heart and requires all the patience the genre demands.
p3670
aVIf nothing else, it is stunningly shot and stirringly scored.
p3671
aVDestined to be remembered as a Disney misfire, don't make the mistake of lumping The Lone Ranger in with John Carter's lot; an odd, uncompromising film it may be, but it still manages to entertain in spite of itself.\u000a
p3672
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aYou can\u2019t fault Disney for pitching The Lone Ranger as \u2018Pirates of the Wild West\u2019.
p3673
aVBut while you can hold a bright candle to that comparison, Gore Verbinski\u2019s ability to imitate the earnest enjoyment of its source material is what really shines through.
p3674
aVThe familiar greed, land confiscation, political corruption, and attempted genocide that come with screen depictions of American Natives vs.
p3675
aVThe White Man serve as background fodder here.
p3676
aVThe real story comes with Johnny Depp\u2019s Tonto moulding Armie Hammer\u2019s goody-two-shoes John Reid into the hero he could be \u2013 though he would have preferred his brother Dan Reid.
p3677
aVIt\u2019s all book-ended by an older Tonto retelling the adventure to a young-un \u2013 a narrative device that could have been chopped off the two-and-a-half hour running time.
p3678
aVJohnny doesn\u2019t take his Jack Sparrow shtick to new Depp-ths, but Hammer feeds off his antics far better than Orlando Bloom ever did.
p3679
aVWilliam Fichtner brings a great cob of corn to his savage outlaw Butch, Helena Bonham Carter is effectively distracting as a dolled-up professional \u2018dancer\u2019 and Tom Wilkinson does a good Tom Wilkinson impression.
p3680
aVIt\u2019s too bad that Luther\u2019s Ruth Wilson is underused as a distressed damsel involved a weird incest-in-law romantic sub-plot.
p3681
aVThe constant wackiness of The Lone Ranger seems jarring in this modern age of frowny-faced blockbusters.
p3682
aVYet the cheesy tone acts as momentum to justify the creative absurdity of its finale, a dual train chase that features all manner of stunts that lean towards the right side of ridiculous.
p3683
aVThe result is an action sequence so vastly joyous that it nudges a three-star film into four-star territory.
p3684
aVRead more on \u2018The Lone Ranger\u2019 and find movie times.\u000a\u000a
p3685
aV\u000a\u000aTHE big-budget western of 2013 is here and it\u2019s less-than-overwhelming.
p3686
aV\u201cThe Lone Ranger\u201d stars Armie Hammer as the masked vigilante and Johnny Depp as his Indian sidekick, Tonto.
p3687
aVThe film opens in 1933 at a traveling sideshow where Tonto appears as part of the attraction.
p3688
aVHe\u2019s a bit older, of course.
p3689
aVAnd, this kid dressed up as Woody in \u201cToy Story\u201d asks Tonto if the legend of The Lone Ranger was true, or just a story.
p3690
aVTonto relates his adventures although his memory appears foggy at times.
p3691
aVHe\u2019s got to be over 90, maybe a hundred.
p3692
aVAnyway, John Reid (Hammer) is a prosecuting attorney determined to bring peace and justice to Texas as the transcontinental railroad is linked.
p3693
aVHe doesn\u2019t fare well after being deputized as a Texas Ranger by his brother so he can help bring an escaped killer to justice.
p3694
aVHis brother is killed, but Reid won\u2019t see red.
p3695
aVHe still believes that everyone is entitled to a fair trial.
p3696
aVHo hum!
p3697
aV\u201cThe Lone Ranger\u201d is the story of how Reid gets his mind changed on how to dispense the law.
p3698
aVTonto and Reid find a common interest, revenge.
p3699
aVBut, they initially don\u2019t get along.
p3700
aVDepp brings his usual quirkiness to the role of Tonto.
p3701
aVHe\u2019s often amusing.
p3702
aVBut, Hammer is plain vanilla as the masked lawman.
p3703
aVHe never quite makes the role truly his.
p3704
aVAnd, his transformation to vigilante trods along without much real emotion.
p3705
aVOn the down side, the film is way too long at two and a half hours.
p3706
aVWay too violent for Disney.
p3707
aVAnd, quite anachronistic.
p3708
aVThat\u2019s a fancy word for stuff that ain\u2019t supposed to be in the film\u2019s time period.
p3709
aVAll movies suffer from this.
p3710
aVBut, you seem to take better notice when you\u2019re bored.
p3711
aV\u201cThe Lone Ranger\u201d certainly won\u2019t revive the western genre.
p3712
aVMove along, little doggie.
p3713
aVGrade: C\u000a\u000aShare this:FacebookTwitterLinkedInGoogleEmailPrint\u000a
p3714
aVThis immensely entertaining WWII story about a group of Allied officers' attempt to escape from a German POW camp is based on a true story, even though much of it must have been twisted out of recognition.
p3715
aVBut with Hollywood storytelling of this quality, who's complaining?
p3716
aVMost memorable is McQueen as the Captain Virgil Hilts, 'The Cooler King', turning in a typically nonchalant performance as the perennial thorn in the camp commandant's side.
p3717
aVOn the debit side, Coburn's 'Australian' accent is truly horrific.
p3718
aVOnce the boys have made their break-out, Hilts's attempt to motorcycle himself out of trouble rates as one of the most memorable action sequences ever, while the rest of the movie ticks along just nicely with its finely tuned mixture of humour counterpoised with darkness when many of the officers are re-captured and summarily executed.
p3719
aVWatching the starry cast is always entertaining, and while The Great Escape has little new to say about war, this is really not a criticism.
p3720
aVKaufman's well-judged remake of Don Siegel's 1956 classic, based on the novel 'The Body Snatchers' by Jack Finney, works a treat.
p3721
aVThe action has been transferred from small town California to San Francisco.
p3722
aVDonald Sutherland is Matthew Bennell, a health inspector who notices that his friends are beginning to act rather oddly.
p3723
aVNo prizes for guessing they have been turned into pod people, but soon the lines between who is who become more ambiguous.
p3724
aVThis update may lack the profound Cold War subtext of the original, but this Invasion Of The Body Snatchers manages to instil just as much paranoia, as well as commenting on the appeals of conformism.
p3725
aV\u000a\u000a\u000aFilled to the brim as it was with some of the finest older British actors around, 2012\u2032s sleeper smash The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel was often referred to as \u2018The Avengers for pensioners\u2019.
p3726
aVWhich I suppose would make this follow-up \u2018Age of Ultron for pensioners\u2019.
p3727
aVThe level of quality sustained in this sequel bodes well for Joss Whedon\u2019s impending blockbuster.
p3728
aVThe superlatively talented cast is effortlessly engaging, and while there isn\u2019t a huge amount of drama in their various arcs, it\u2019s still a significant delight to spend more time in their company.
p3729
aVMaggie Smith in particular is the heart and soul of these films, and this often feels like a well-deserved ode to her unique charms.
p3730
aVBill Nighy and Judi Dench also manage to inject some life into the well-worn \u2018Will they or won\u2019t they?\u2019 trope.
p3731
aVNew cast additions Richard Gere and Tamsin Grieg (the Quicksilver Fox and Scarlet Witch of this film?)
p3732
aVfit into the environment nicely, with Gere once again proving his worth as an old-fashioned romantic leading man.
p3733
aVA misjudged subplot about murder-for-hire aside, this rarely puts a foot wrong.
p3734
aVMore sequels could stand to be this tuned in to what their audiences want.
p3735
aV\u2018The Second Best Exotic Marigold Hotel\u2019 Movie Times\u000a\u000a
p3736
aVMarty McFly (Fox) is a typical twentysomething Hollywood teenager (sic), whose quarrelling parents, vindictive schoolmaster and general angst give him cause for concern.
p3737
aVBefriending the local neighbourhood mad scientist, Dr Emmett L Brown (Christopher Lloyd), he becomes involved in a time travelling experiment that sends him back to the 50s, and the high school days of his parents.
p3738
aVHis presence manages to interfere with their nascent love affair and they split up, but he realises he needs to get them back together in order to have any future himself.
p3739
aVFrom the Spielberg stable (he executive produced), directed by Robert Zemeckis (Romancing the Stone), Back To The Future is a film that has 'feel good' running through it like a stick of rock.
p3740
aVFox (then known primarily for TV's 'Family Ties', who took over from original choice Eric Stoltz) and Lloyd put in performances that make them almost impossible to dislike.
p3741
aVThe De Lorean time machine-cum-car and special effects date it slightly, but this is a film almost unique for 1980s Hollywood, one that is charming, clever and genuinely weird (check Crispin Glover's discomforting turn and the undisguised Freudian plot).
p3742
aVThe third the longest and many would say the most enjoyable instalment of Indiana Jones's-big-screen adventures.There's much to enjoy in the neat idea of introducing the young Indiana (Phoenix) to us, with a cursory explanation of what makes him the guy he is.
p3743
aVBetter still is the plausible injection of Dr Jones (Connery), who is about the only actor who could convince us that he sired Phoenix/Ford (even though he's actually only 12 years older than the latter).
p3744
aVThe relationship between the serious Doc and his son, who this time is in search of the Holy Grail, no less, is the film's cornerstone.-
p3745
aVDirector David Lean made his name with smaller, more intimate movies like Brief Encounter  and Oliver Twist, but by the time of The Bridge On The River Kwai his epic cinema output was in full swing.
p3746
aVThe story takes place in 1943, in a POW camp in Burma, where the Japanese are building a railway line between Malaysia and Rangoon.
p3747
aVOr, rather, where British Army prisoners are building it, amid conditions of utter brutality and slavery.
p3748
aVFor Colonel Nicholson (Alec Guinness) the broad canvas of the war narrows to this particular task - and he and his men pour their energy into it as a means of maintaining their discipline, but also holding on to their marbles.
p3749
aVThe question is, how far will Nicholson go to protect his bridge, which stands as a symbol of British military efficiency and excellence, even as it makes a vital contribution to the Japanese war effort?
p3750
aVIn the meantime, the Japanese camp commandant Saito (Sessue Hayakawa) is privately humiliated by his captives' superior engineering skills: the British are building a better bridge than the Japanese Army could - ironically thanks to the extra efforts of the British officer in charge.But further irony - there's an Allied plan to blow it up, which poses a terrible dilemma for Nicholson: will he expose the sabotage and save the bridge, or see it destroyed?
p3751
aVAs a soldier, the choice is clear, but incredibly he seems ready to ignore his duty to Allied interests.
p3752
aVWhether this is really a film about the complex reality of war, or a melodramatic scenario tacked on to real events is a moot point, but Nicholson's dilemma certainly makes for compelling, spectacular cinema.
p3753
aVAnd Guinness and Hayakawa are excellent as the Japanese and British colonels at odds with each other, but united in their goal of completing the bridge.
p3754
aVIt's the ironic complexities of the story, together with Lean's trademark epic visual style that places The Bridge On The River Kwai among the best British war films.
p3755
a.